If the Valkyrie could speak, then she undoubtedly would whisper that.



――*Bang-, roll roll-*



The two suddenly flopped to the side and without pause they insulted at each other while rolling over. They stood up again at slight distance away and then continued quarreling as though nothing happened. The spear that should be stabbed for certain kill was wandering vainly at the place where the two were at.



Her Valkyrie comrades were watching. The Valkyrie lancer showed a gesture as though she was clearing her throat, and then she pulled herself together before assaulting Yue and Kaori once more.



This time she wouldn't cut corner, she would bring down one person with certainty! Her aim was Yue. She would pierce the temporal region of her head――



「The yandere, is you Yue!」



The slap that struck along with such words dealt a clean hit on Yue's cheek. The lance attack passed through right beside Yue's head that was forcefully snapped away.



The Valkyrie hurriedly pulled back her spear. She didn't fail or anything. She was only testing the water a bit. That was just a practice swing. Now this is the sure thing attack! It stabbed toward Kaori's side!



「……I'm not ill. It's only my dere that is overflowing!」(TN: Dere = affectionate)



Kaori fell from neko damashi that was continued with a tripping up. The sure kill (lol) attack passed through above her head. (TN: Neko damashi = a sumo move, where you clap your hands in front of the opponent's face to surprise them)



「That is what is called yandere! You don't know? Sometimes Shia will subtly flinch away from Yue. Yaa~i, you yandere girl who is feared by your best friend.」



「……Shia doesn't fear me. There is no way that's true. Shia love me! Kaori yourself, you said that even though you were feared by Shizuku before this. Yaa~i, genuine yandere girl who even make Shizuku whose fortitude is maxed out to get creeped out.」



「Shi, Shizuku-chan isn't scared at me or anything! After all Shizuku-chan will accept any kind of me no matter what!」



「……Indeed, I won't deny the depth of Shizuku's broad-mindedness. Her figure is already like everyone's mother!」



「That's right! What's more, if I have to say which then she is the type of a gutsy mother of a big family! She is everyone's beloved and reliable mother!」



Yaegashi Shizuku――an active female high school student. She was She was a busybody who was being dissed in a sense before they knew it. Surely if she was in this place, she would resolve herself to participate in the fight from getting hit by the unexpected stray bullet.



By the way, even while these two were making this conversation, spear was wielded against them many times. The Valkyrie changed the angle of the spear, used feint, she used sweeping attack and the butt of her spear, launching attacks from every position like a surging waves.



But everything was evaded.



What's more, everything was evaded only with extremely natural movement from the scuffle.



Somehow it looked like the Valkyrie lancer was looking like she was going to burst crying anytime.



Perhaps thinking that was pitiful, her Valkyrie comrades surrounded the two and lunged. It was the beautiful friendship of Valkyries.



They wouldn't let their might getting humiliated even further than this by method that looked like gag scene. They wouldn't be ignored!



It was a perfect encirclement. There was no place to escape. It was impossible to dodge.



This time for sure, death in the shape of sword and lance assaulted from all directions toward the two who were in the middle of scuffling.



――*SHaaAAN-*



A clear sound resounded. It was a tone that was played by metals scraping each other. The scream of the targeted two people didn't mix there.



Rather,



「-!!!」



「a, a――」



「!?」



The wordless scream, came from the Valkyries.



The Valkyries took distance all at once. However, there were three people who didn't retreat from there, no, they couldn't retreat. The Valkyrie lancer, and two Valkyrie saber who were carrying beautiful sword.



The reason was simple.



Because the Valkyrie lancer's lance pierced the heart of a Valkyrie who should be her ally, and Kaori's sword was digging into the neck of that Valkyrie lancer.



And then, the one other Valkyrie saber got her beautiful face――more accurately her right eye literally turned into a wind hole. It was a round wind hole that was carbonized black.



Looking closer, in the center of the Valkyries, there were the unmoving figure of Kaori with her iron long sword in an unsheathed state, and the figure of Yue laying down face up between the legs of such Kaori while her fingers were making gun shape could be seen.



The posture of the Valkyrie saber whose right eye was shot through turned limp and she was falling. Without hesitation Kaori smoothly took away that Valkyrie's sword and without pause she handled that sword casually, yet with an astonishingly elegant motion and mowed the neck of the Valkyrie lancer with that stolen sword.



Different from the iron long sword, Kaori's sword attack this time slipped through Valkyrie lancer's neck as though she was cutting butter. Blood didn't spurt out, in exchange red particles whirled while rising to the sky.



「Yep, this is a good sword as expected. Though I'd like it better if it's thicker and bigger……」



「……Kaori, lewd. That's why you are going to be called a hidden pervert eternally.」



「No one call me that! Or rather, I don't understand what do you mean by lewd!」



The two resumed their quarrel as though nothing happened. Yue stood up, and Kaori shrewdly stole the sword of the other Valkyrie saber and now she used two sword style. It was at that time the two defeated Valkyries also scattered red particles while disappearing.



The Valkyries were still spreading out as though they were hesitating to resume their attack.



Perhaps their battle program couldn't judge how should they attack after witnessing the offense and defense the two displayed just now.



The two's method to get through the attacks from all direction just now was simple.



Kaori who understood that she wouldn't be unscathed if she honestly fight from the front seeing her physical strength and also sword quality merged her sword with the approaching enemy's sword and twist its trajectory. As the result, the averted sword hit the sword beside it and averted that other sword's trajectory too.



Furthermore, Kaori rotated her body and used her bare hand to avert the lance and caused a friendly fire, by doing that she even evaded the third sword too.



And then, regarding the fourth sword that Kaori couldn't dealt with, it was dealt with by Yue that sniped at the weak point that was commonly shared by living thing using a super compressed flame bullet that was fired from Kaori's blind spot.



The Valkyries combat thinking rejected close combat against the two who in a glance looked like they were full of opening from being absorbed in quarreling with each other. If the visible opening wasn't actually opening, then they would make opening that coincided with their convenience.



The Valkyrie archer and Valkyrie mage launched a pincer attack!



Long range physical attack from arrows that were enveloped with light to increase its destructive power, and long range magic attack using invisible and swift wind blades became countless fangs that were like an intense rain, attacking Yue and Kaori.



Abruptly they rotated. Yue and Kaori were.



The two were facing each other and quarreling until now, but in an instant they executed their steps as though they were even dancing and stood back to back. With a matching elegant turn, golden and black hairs spread out softly like a dream.



Kaori's swords instantly drew countless trajectories in the air instantly, cutting apart or averting all the flying arrows that were hiding terrifying power.



Countless flame bullets instantly materialized like stars that were floating in the vast night sky, they obeyed Yue's slender finger and flew out like a meteor shower and blew away all the wind blades with the impact of destructive blast.



The two who were standing back to back didn't look like they were concerned at all against any threat that might come from their back. Even without looking back, they believed without doubt that behind them was an absolutely safe area.



The attacks suddenly stopped. The arrows and magic attacks that were fired consecutively ran out.



Right after that, Yue and Kaori danced once more. The sleeves of their one piece clothing elegantly spread out at the same time with their rotation using steps that looked as though they had been arranged beforehand. The two who were dancing as though mirroring each other swung one hand as though inviting the other party for a dance.



Although, it seemed the invitation was for a world of death.



What flew out like a bullet from the swung hands were a flame bullet the size of a pinball and a beautiful sword.



The flame bullet that was hiding a destructive power that rivaled a high class magic pierced the heart of the Valkyrie archer with unerring aim, and the beautiful sword also pierced the heart of the Valkyrie mage.



「Hm~m, what's this? Just as I thought even though they are all the same Valkyrie but there is difference in their defensive power depending on their class but……. Is it just because the sword is powerful I wonder?」



「……I think that's possible. But, no matter even if it's the enemy's weapon, I don't think that a sword thrown by the spec of a level 1 can easily pierce the armor of that close quarter combat type before. It should be seen that this one is weak against physical attack because of her mage class.」



「The flame bullet that I evaded before was deflected by the armor of the mage class wasn't it? But the flame bullet going through the archer means that even though their armors all look the same, but there is no doubt that this one's defensive power against magic is low.」



Yue and Kaori talked about their analysis result while still standing back to back. They were directing observing gaze toward the two Valkyries who were turning into particles and vanished.



The two remaining Valkyries were trying to take distance slowly.



*snap-*, Yue and Kaori's face turned toward the surviving Valkyries in a flash. It was awfully scary. As the proof, the Valkyries' body twitched seeing their gaze.



「……Kaori. You noticed?」



「About the level up? Yep, while fighting 'pirurin!' sound rang out several times. Also, announcing sound like 'such and such is liberated!'. Though honestly, I'm wondering if there is option to erase the sound.」



「……Certainly it's distracting. This will depend on the user's preference, so I'll suggest to Hajime if he can attach on/off function. But, for now――」



「Yep. For now――」



The Valkyries were slo~wly, slo~wly taking distance from Yue and Kaori who were conversing with each other. The moment the two's conversation cut off, the Valkyries turned their body adroitly and flew to the sky.



If it was said in game style, this must be a situation of「Valkyrie is running away!」.



A shadow loomed. On the Valkyries.



What the two Valkyries who quickly looked back saw, were the figures of the villager girl and apprentice sister who took their above with a leap that was higher than even themselves. The two readied overhead a sword that was gleaming from the sunlight and a flame bullet that was like the sun itself while looking down of the Valkyries.



「Let's try it out.」



「……Trying out.」



They wouldn't let go of the chance to test out their liberated ability.



Yes, if it was said in game style――this is the situation of「Failed to escape from villager girl and apprentice sister!」.



There was no scream of death agony.



However, there were only beautiful red particles dancing toward the sky right outside the village of beginning.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Just since when I was deluded that the subtitle of Yue - Kaori arc is one?



Next chapter, 「Welcome, I am the village chief of demon king village desu」





Chapter 254




It was a highway with wind blowing gently. The grasses as high as the waist were making rustling sounds. Dusts were gently rolled up to the air by the breeze.



Silhouettes of two people could be seen at the other side of that dust.



One person was a girl with the appearance of a villager girl, while the other one was a girl with the appearance of an apprentice sister. They looked unsteady somehow. Or rather, the apprentice sister was completely carried on the back of the villager girl. Her body was limply leaning on the villager girl's back.



The villager girl too, she was carrying the apprentice sister while using a beautiful sword as replacement for cane. Her shoulders were moving much from her rough breathing「zee zee」, so much so that it sounded like it could be heard from far away. If this area wasn't the highway that connected village to village, then she would be mistaken as a victim that was lost in the middle of mountain.



Her clothing also spurred on such impression. The two of them were tattered. Although the important parts were barely protected, the fringe part of the one piece had became a really original miniskirt state, the sleeves part was also in forced state of no sleeve that if it was seen from the side, the breast part felt a little bit dangerous.



The two's white smooth skin was exposed much, and those exposed parts were dirtied by dust everywhere, the two's hair also felt unkempt.



「……Uu. I'm really sorry for troubling you, Kaori-san.」(TN: Here Yue's speech sounded like an old woman)



「Yue-san, you promised not to say that right?」



The carried apprentice sister――the previously sister with a screw loose Yue was running on joke material even while being dead tired. The one who was fixing her grip on the slipping off Yue with 'yoisho-' while returning the joke material precisely was of course the village chief's regrettable daughter Kaori.



Now then, why were these two so ragged until they were in this state?



That was caused by all the happening since they were victorious in the battle against the wild Valkyries nearby the village of beginning "AAAAAAA" until the present time. To speak frankly,



――A wild Odin appeared!



――A wild Zeus appeared!



――A wild Susanoo appeared!



――A wild Indra appeared!



――Wild Artemis appeared in great numbers!



――A wild Zoroaster myth appeared in its entirety!



――A wild Odin took along his children and Valkyries and challenged a revenge match!



――A wild Zeus who joined up with a wild Indra appeared!



――A wild Ia! Ia! Masteerr! Fhtag――



The gist could be guessed after seeing how the lineup above was the mob enemy for the surrounding area of the village of beginning. The random pounding of mythologies was coming so extremely without any integrity. Or rather, no matter how much the game was in the operation testing stage with undecided story, the enemy setting was just too noncommittal.



Of course, the enemies' strength was in the level that didn't put shame to their name, they were boasting strength to the degree that the Valkyries looked cute. They were also properly equipped with their characteristic equipments, Yue and Kaori would surely meet a swift end if they didn't cooperate in the same beat for real.



Regarding the difficult to describe something that came out in the end, both Yue and Kaori didn't really have the memory of their battle against it. When they tried to recall it, they would get a headache as though their instinct was trying to stop them and they couldn't recall it. However, there was only the feeling as though they destroyed it with a deathly desperation remaining inside them.



Just what in the world was that……



And because of that, after repeating mortal combat after mortal combat, they were now in the verge of exhausting all their energy and willpower――that was the current state of Yue and Kaori. Yue was in an extreme state of magic power drying up and all the recovery item was also used up, that now she was entrusting herself to Kaori.



After a bit more advancing through the highway with staggering footsteps toward the save point of the next village, while they were making frivolous talk running on joke material with each other to take their mind off from their exhaustion,



「……Nn? Kaori.」



「Right, something is coming. But, this is……」



Kaori's walk stopped when she sensed a presence approaching from behind. When she tried to look behind, she could see rising dust cloud from ahead of the highway they had passed through. For a moment Yue and Kaori thought「Another wild god!?」, but that thought was immediately proved to be a needless anxiety.



「That's, a house cart.」



「……Nn」



Just as Kaori said, what was running on the highway toward them was a cart that was pulled by two chestnut horses. The figure of a plump man sitting on the coachman stand holding the rein could be seen.



Just in case Yue got down from Kaori's back and both of them stepped back to the side of the highway to open a path.



Not long after that, the cart arrived at where Yue and Kaori were at. The man on the coachman stand noticed Yue and Kaori and his expression went「Oh?」. The man pulled his rein and decreased the speed, and the cart stopped beside the two.



「My goodness, young ladies, what are you two doing in this kind of place? Although this area is relatively safe, it's still too careless for two young girls to be here you know?」



No ill will could be felt from his voice and expression. The two heard his words which claimed that this area was safe which caused the two to doubt this man's sanity, but if that part was put aside, this man's feeling that was purely feeling strange and also worried that a villager girl and a sister were loitering alone in this highway was conveyed to the two.



Seeing that it didn't seem like a battle event, Yue and Kaori looked and nodded at each other.



「Eerr, I am "AAAAAAA" village's……village chief's daughter, going toward the next village.」



「Oo, is that so. So you are the "AAAAAAA" village's village chief's regrettable daughter. I am a peddler Sarani Yunker. If you are going to the next village, I am also going toward there right now. If you want, you can come along with me?」(TN: The name Sarani here is written in katakana as though it's a foreign name. But in Japanese language 'sarani' could also mean 'even more'. This peddler's name can be read as even more Yunker)



The peddler whose surname was a name they had heard from somewhere was suggesting that kindly. Kaori was somehow feeling regrettable that even the peddler was calling her "regrettable", but honestly she was really happy that they could travel using house cart here.



「Yue, what to do?」



「……I think, this is perhaps a support event from the game. We can also use item to recover and change equipment by riding the back cart.」



「There is no problem then. Can we also purchase item while we are at it?」



As the result of the two's discussion, with their need to recover their stamina and mental strength and also with their lack of item, they decided to accept the suggestion of the peddler Sarani to help them. They were also taking advantage of the kind words of peddler Sarani who was smiling kindly while saying「Please, please. Get on the car behind. If there is anything that you want to buy then I'll sell it to you」.



Like that the horse cart departed. For a while the two purchased and used healing item and focused in recovering, and when their vitality returned the two sighed「Fuu~~~~」.



「I wonder if it really is over?」



「……Nn, I think so. Or rather, I hope that's so. If not, then Hajime is just too savage.」



「Ahaha……as expected, this cannot be helped isn't it? After all this game device is broken right? Right?」



「……Nn. Certainly.」



Both of them doubted the sanity of their beloved just for a bit, but they concluded they had reached a checkpoint and they relaxed. And then, Yue who finished purchasing recovery item rummaged around the cart and discovered clothing.



Among the items that were being sold, as expected the clothing that the two could equip was only the sister outfit and villager girl outfit, but it was still a league better compared to their clothing that was in half undressed state. They immediately purchased the clothes and quickly changed.



The two who finished changing clothes and also replenishing item calmed down and sat side by side at the back cart. They threw their legs to dangle outside. The small vibration of the cart that was transmitted to their body felt pleasant.



「……Come to think of it, Kaori. How far you have been liberated?」



「Ah, now that you say that we were leveling up with staggering momentum weren't we? My disintegration ability also came back, so I wonder if I have been liberated much? I didn't confirm because there was no leeway though.」



Saying that, Kaori summoned the individual information screen. Yue also summoned her own screen at the same time and they respectively confirmed their usable strength.



========================================



Name : Yue-pon



Rank : 75 / 2880 remaining until the next liberation



Job : Sister



Title : Sister Whose Name Mustn't be Mentioned



Skill : No Chant Imagination Configuration All Element Aptitude Combination Magic High Speed Magic Power Regeneration



Magic : Flame Magic Wind Magic Light Magic Water Magic Earth Magic Ice Magic Lightning Magic Darkness Magic Gravity Magic



※All magic name is omitted



Equipment : A set of apprentice sister outfit R'lyeh Text



Special mention : A criminal on the wanted list



Money : 5,546,030



========================================



========================================



Name : Kaori



Rank : 72 / 1880 remaining until the next liberation



Job : Villager Girl



Title : What is the Meaning of Villager Girl Name?



Skill : Villager girl-style Twin Large Sword Art Villager girl-style Close Quarter Combat Art



Magic : Villager girl-style Body Reinforcement Magic Villager girl-style Disintegration Magic Villager girl-style Wings Villager girl-style Godspeed



Equipment : A set of villager girl outfit Gram Ama no Murakumo no Tsurugi



Special mention : Yue-pon's accomplice



Money : 4,874,005



========================================



「……」



「……」



There were certainly a lot of places that could be retorted at. Surely it was the fault of the bug. But, there was one point that the two couldn't turn a blind eye at no matter what.



「Yu, Yue? Thi, this is……」



「……Wa, wait. Wait, a second-」



Yue who unusually was in her wits' end patted all over her own body and performed a body check. There was nothing particular strange and she let out a faint sigh of relieve. Right after that, Yue's ragged sister outfit that she put above the box beside her was slipping down unnaturally even though there wasn't any particularly noticeable vibration. And then, the falling clothe didn't make light rustling sound, but a thud sound instead.



「……」



「……」



Yue and Kaori twitched but they didn't move further, they were staring at the ragged sister clothes. They couldn't avert their gaze from the clothes that was strangely bulged up.



The house cart was going onward while making small vibrations *katakata*. The sister clothe was slowly, little by little sliding off because of the vibration.



What was certain was that when Kaori was carrying Yue on her back, Yue wasn't carrying anything except the clothes she was wearing. And they also didn't steal anything except the legendary swords Kaori stole from the previous battles. And then, when Yue took off her clothes just now and put it on the box, there was not "thing" or anything that would make that kind of bulge.



*slide*, *slide* The sister clothes was sliding off matching with the vibration of the horse cart.



Like that, finally, from the gap between the clothes, something like a book spine with strange color was……



「SOOOOOII-!!」



Yue's roar gushed! Before that thing that surely, perhaps must not be seen showed up its whole appearance, a kick with the body's whole strength exploded. The beautiful kicking leg that was performed like a pro soccer athlete also beautifully slammed flying the sister clothes along with the something inside it.



When the two saw it falling into the grasses and they couldn't see it anymore, they let out a long sigh and resumed their breathing that they were unconsciously holding.



And then, when Yue moved her hand impatiently and confirmed her individual information screen,



========================================



Name : Yue-pon



Rank : 75 / 2880 remaining until the next liberation



Job : Sister



Title : Sister Whose Name Mustn't be Mentioned



Skill : No Chant Imagination Configuration All Element Aptitude Combination Magic High Speed Magic Power Regeneration



Magic : Flame Magic Wind Magic Light Magic Water Magic Earth Magic Ice Magic Lightning Magic Darkness Magic Gravity Magic



※All magic name is omitted



Equipment : A set of apprentice sister outfit



Special mention : A criminal on the wanted list



Money : 5,546,030



========================================



It became like that.



Yue and Kaori looked at each other's face and nodded shortly to one another.



「……So, Kaori. You still cannot use healing magic, binding magic, and defensive magic?」



「Yeah. Even though my specialty should be in that field. But, just being able to use disintegration and godspeed is also enough. And the swords I stole are really sharp. Yue, you still only get gravity magic?」



「……Nn. I pray that next I'll obtain space magic. It's completely different whether I have it or not.」



It seemed they treated as though the "something" that was kicked flying had never existed. Surely it was for the sake of their mental health. They had to protect their SAN status as much as possible.



For a while the two were talking with each other about their respective ability as though trying to forget something and they spent time doing things like confirming their cooperation and so on.



It was unclear how long they were doing that before finally their feeling cleared up and the vibration of the horse cart was inviting sleepiness, when suddenly Yue felt magic power reaction and she reacted.



The reaction source was right nearby. Yes, from the coachman stand. The magic power wasn't directed toward them, but flowing toward somewhere else.



「……Peddler-san. Just now, what did you do?」



Yue's question caused peddler Sarani to twitch and his plumb body shaking for some reason. And then, he looked back with a smile that looked pasted on his face.



「No, it's really nothing important. Rather than that, it will still take time until the next village. It's better for the two of you to lie down and rest during this time.」



「……I see.」



Yue was relatively good at reading the heart of someone from their expression. It was because she was a former royalty and she had also met painful experience before. And so, she also immediately understood that peddler Sarani's words weren't honest.



It was really suspicious. Was this not a support event for player……



Perhaps guessing that doubt of Yue, peddler Sarani's forehead was starting to sweat.



Yue's fixed gaze was piercing peddler Sarani. It was a dreadful fixed gaze. It was a splendid fixed gaze.



Peddler Sarani was starting to sweat like waterfall.



「It's the truth you know? A merchant won't spout lie.」



「……I see.」



「No, it will really take time. I'm not lying. Hell will freeze over before I'm telling lie.」



「……I see.」



「……How about you take a rest?」



「……I see.」



「……」



Right now the face of peddler Sarani looked terrible because it was drenched with sweat like a fountain.



As expected, seeing it was getting stranger, Kaori also put her hand on Gram and Ama no Murakumo no Tsurugi and strengthened her vigilance, it was at that time,



「……-!? Kaori!」



「He? ――Kyah!?」



At the same time when Yue let out that warning voice which was filled with unease, *gin-* hard sound resounded from Kaori's neck. It was the impact voice of Yue's defensive magic that made it in a hair's breadth time to protect Kaori's neck from the rapidly approaching assassin's blade. The moment Kaori noticed that, she raised a scream while also using Villager girl-style Godspeed to leap out from the cart.



Right away, from the opposite side of the spot where Kaori was just at, a powerfully assaulting blade passed through there.



「Hmm, on top of noticing the invisibility of this me, even the following blow is dodged……. I see, it seems you two cannot be dealt with ordinary means.」



Yue landed lightly beside Kaori who jumped down. It seemed an attack was also launched at Yue simultaneously with the second attack against Kaori. Yue jumped down from the cart to dodge that.



Yue and Kaori were staring dumbfounded and open-mouthed in a da~ze seeing the black shadow who was looking down on them from above the cart. Whether it was the surprise attack that slipped through Kaori's guard, or the flowing consecutive attack, this wasn't the time for being dumbfounded……however, the character that appeared was just too unexpected.



「Tha, thank god! You finally arrived! It's those two! Those two are the wanted criminal Yue-pon and Kaori! Please capture them quickly!」



「Merchant-dono. You did well using the magic item to contact me. Not only that, you even bring them until here to not let them escape……my gratitude to your bravery. Leave the rest to me, go on ahead!」



「Yes, may luck be with you!」



It seemed it was something like that. This merchant-sama noticed from the start that Yue-pon and Kaori were criminal, he pretended to not notice while guiding the two toward the boss character (perhaps the mid-boss). It seemed that he was a character for that.



What betrayal. But, thinking really really carefully, these two were wanted criminal so if this was said to be the proper treatment for them then no one could deny that. This was the karma that was following the two to the bitter end.



The two were able to purchase things like recovery item and so on, so to speak it was something like the recovery place and save point that was usually provided in front of the boss room. Of course, they couldn't save though.



But, what was more important than such things was regarding the person in front of the two's eyes.



Yes, for some reason this person in black clothes was making a cross with his two hands that were holding short swords while meaninglessly turning his body several times in a stance of half body. The two recognized this person very much. The person was wearing a sunglasses, but the two completely recognized him.



「Listen well, criminal Yue-pon! Accomplice Kaori! Now that I'm here, this place is the last stop for you two. Lament your own misfortune while carving this name into your bone! My name is Abyssgate! One of the four heavenly kings of demon king village, and an apprentice doctor! I'm the man who will consign the two of you to oblivion!」



Yes, it was Abyssgate-san desu.



Just what is the four heavenly kings of demon king village, how can an apprentice doctor saying things like "consigning to oblivion", for the time being Kaori put aside those straight-man retort and she whispered into Yue's ear.



「Yue, why is Endou-kun here? Seeing his act, he is in Abyss-san state isn't he? Is this the real thing? Or program?」



「……Come to think of it, before this Endou was called by Hajime and visited the home, but after a while I remember he rushed out while crying.」



「Ah, I can guess.」



「……Nn. Endou who said『NAGUMO YOU STUPID IDIOOOOOOOOT』while exiting the home was then chased by Hajime who was making expression that couldn't endure being there while saying『Sorry! As expected I went too far! Even I got damaged!』……」



By the way, Abyssgate was a boss like four heavenly kings for Hauria training mode. Of course, it was a program. Though he was constantly in Abyss Lord state.



「Fuh, you two finished your discussion? You can strain your wisdom to the utmost and wield all the strength that you have. If not, the abyss will swallow everything without even any time for you to blink you know?」



A turn. An upward push on the sunglasses. And arms crosse――d!



「……Endou. How far will he go.」



「I'm thinking once more. Emily-chan who is fighting hard alone is really not half-baked.」



Inside their heart, Yue and Kaori sent their salute with streaming tear toward Abyssgate's lovable lover who surely even now was refining her Hauria correction plan.



Recently, her very act of trying to stop the chuuni with all her might itself became Hauria clan's amusement. Their affection toward Emily was rapidly heightening but……the pure Emily-chan who was happily saying「Recently, it feels like they became slightly better!」didn't notice it.



With faraway look, Yue and Kaori was recalling Emily who several times before this was coming to play to the home, coming to consult, coming to grumble, coming to consult, coming while crying, and coming to consult.



「Then, it's time for judgment. Kousuke E Abyssgate――here I come!」



The two quickly returned to their senses when they heard those words along with feeling the presence vanishing like a mirage.



It was mostly something that was done in subconscious level. It must be because of Kaori's deep battle experience. When she noticed, she had already turned the unsheathed Ama no Murakumo toward her back.



Instantly, a metallic sound resounded and a light impact ran on Kaori's arm.



「Yaah」



What Kaori unleashed along with that short yell was the horizontal sweep using divine sword Gram that she let out simultaneously with her defense. The attack with its travel time shortened using Godspeed that was let out immediately following the enemy attack normally would become the height of counterattack and bisected the opponent.



However, the attack Kaori unleashed ended up slashing empty air in vain. Not only that, what entered her sight was something black――no, it was Abyssgate's kicking leg. His body leaped midair at the same instant when he attacked and he unleashed a midair spinning kick.



Even when taken aback by the tricky movement, Kaori wasted n time to lower her head and dodged. But, from below that lowered head, the opposite leg of Abyssgate approached.



「Abyss-style Assassination Martial Art - Hi'en Renkyaku(The bird of abyss resurrected three times)」(TN: Swallow Tempered Leg)



Midair he used the spring of upper body and twisted to unleashed three consecutive kicks.



Kaori's eyes opened wide. It was impossible to dodge. But, perhaps the kick would just barely graze her chin. If that happened, in front of Abysgate who likely had prepared the next move she would be attacked in a state where her brain was shaken.



「――【Wave Cutter】!」



「Muh」



A super compressed water laser flew from the side of Kaori who was bending backward in her attempt to dodge the second kick of Abyssgate. That laser was flying in a straight line toward Abyssgate who was midair, however, it only grazed his side and passed through because his body unnaturally slid to the side.



Looking closer, the steel string that stretched out from Abyssgate's black glove was connecting his torso with a kunai that was stabbed on the ground unnoticed. It seemed, he pulled on the steel string for emergency evasion and moved his body midair.



Abyssgate performed ukemi while landing. Kaori approached such Abyssgate using godspeed and the divine sword Gram lunged in a vertical slash. *GOU-!* The sword that was swung down made the wind roared and mercilessly split Abyssgate into tw――



「Naive」



「Ah!?」



The moment when Kaori thought so, the Abyssgate who seemed to be split into two divided into two clones and rushed passing through Kaori from her left and right sides.



Yue tried to rapid-fired wind blades in order to snipe the two Abyssgate, but a thrown Kunai approached Yue faster than she could attack. Furthermore, another kunai that had also been thrown unnoticed behind Yue was also flying using its trait as artifact that would return to its owner's position.



Yue who was aimed with a pincer attack from the front and back wasted no time to use gravity magic to fly and dodged the kunais. But, her offense magic was interrupted just like Abyssgate intended and his approach continued unmolested.



「I won't let you!」



「That's why, I told you that's naïve.」



Kaori spread fired silver feathers to one Abyssgate while she tried to strike at the back of the other Abyssgate with her sword, but a clone that suddenly appeared *poof* used its body as shield to block the silver feathers.



And then, Kaori suddenly lost her balance because her ankle was suddenly grasped. Although she at least avoided tumbling down, but she let the two Abyssgate approaching Yue to get away.



When she looked at her foot,



「――Doton - Shin'en Ryuusha」(TN: Earth Escape - Abyss Quicksand)



The figure of Abyssgate who was speaking his technique name with a smug face was underground with only his face and hand protruding out. His hand was firmly grabbing Kaori's ankle. It seemed that he had made a clone hiding underground unnoticed.



Kaori who for some reason was strangely irritated used Ama no Murakumo no Tsurugi to slice half the face and arm of Abyssgate like mowing down grass. Abyssgate-san vanished with *puff*. Seeing that was also somewhat aggravating.



The Abyssgate that approached Yue charged from the front into super gravity space where the gravity was multiplied that Yue laid out to stop the approach. Normally any person that entered the area would be crushed by the pressure and became a stain on the ground.



But, even Abyssgate was a user of gravity magic. His body was instantly clad in black mist and he plunged deeper as though there was nothing in his way.



「……But, Endou is unable to invoke multiple gravity magic.」



「Correct. That's why I'll do this.」



Abyssgate's capability to neutralize attack of super gravity was something that Yue was aware of. Her aim was that by using gravity magic then Abyssgate would use his own gravity magic that was his most dangerous skill to neutralize her attack, thus sealing that repertoire of his. Yue estimated that she would be able to cope against any other magic and physical attack other than that no matter what he tried to pull.



But, that was only if it was really the case that Abyssgate had the intention to attack Yue directly.



「――Doton - Shin'en Dairyuusha」(TN: Earth Escape - Abyss Great Quicksand)



Abyssgate stabbed his short sword on the ground, at the same time the ground caved-in for about the diameter of ten meter. The ground that was turned into a quicksand was crushed down because of Yue's super gravity space. Her balance crumbled and her legs only sunk down even when she tried to find her balance.



A slight opening was created. The main body of Abyssgate didn't let go of that chance.



A sword flash approached smoothly from behind Yue. She didn't feel any presence. Before she knew it her attention had left the Abyssgate that was attacked with spreading silver feathers. Even though she certainly recognized that there were two Abyssgate approaching her rapidly!



Yue's eyes opened wide. Right now when her space magic was being restrained, she couldn't use the instantaneous space teleportation "Divine Existence".



「This is the e――afuh!?」



「……Nnn!?」



'Will I get hit with an attack in this kind of place……' The moment Yue thought that, a flying Ama no Murakumo no Tsurugi cut Yue's head skin just for a tiny bit while stabbing the Abyssgate behind her.



Abyssgate just barely avoided having his vitals pierced, it was his shoulder that got hit and he got blown away.



Kaori who flew toward Yue with her silver wings unfolded took Yue out from inside the quicksand.



「Are you okay Yue?」



「……I'm not okay. My head got cut a bit. It was cut by Kaori.」



「I, I'm sorry. The gravity magic is stronger than I thought and the sword shifted. Is your soul affected?」



「……u. Nothing particular.」



「I'm glaaad. For now I'll pour restoration medicine okay?」



Yue's eyes turned a bit teary while both her hands were pressing on her head. Come to think of it, she recalled that in the past when she met Hajime, when she was controlled by a monster Hajime fired without any hesitation and her head skin was also scratched a bit by the bullet.



'Both Hajime and Kaori are merciless on my head', Yue leaked out a complaint inside her heart. Although, it was the fact that she was saved so she couldn't forget to say thanks.



「Nevertheless, this is the first time I fought him but……Endou-kun, he is really troublesome.」



「……Nn. He is completely making the best use of his own special characteristic. It's not just for show that he dealt a wound fighting a serious Hajime.」



Yue and Kaori were watching Abyssgate who was pulling out Ama no Murakumo no Tsurugi from his shoulder while quietly talking about their impression of him at each other.



Both of them would have received lethal attack if they didn't cover for each other.



What was terrifying was his stealth. Even though they were clashing against him right from the front, before they knew it he had abnormally slipped off from their consciousness. It wasn't in the level of presence isolation and the like. It was a divine skill that should even be called as erasure of presence, no, existence. ……It was truly sad that this hereditary trait wasn't something that the person in question wished for.



Abyssgate once said. It was the best he could do to make a single wound on the demon king. That he wasn't even able to win against the wives.



That statement was certainly not mistaken. With the exception like Liliana or Aiko, if they fought seriously, Abyssgate wouldn't be able to win against Yue, or Kaori, or Shia, or Tio, and also against Shizuku even though it was just barely against her.



However, in that statement there was these additional notes.



In the case of Yue, she would win if she bulldozed through using her automatic regeneration.



In the case of Kaori, she would win if she used disintegration ability in apostle mode while ignoring any impact on the surrounding.



In the case of Shia, she would win if she used body hardening and blood manipulation to use the strategy of stabbing each other at the same time.



In the case of Tio, she would win if she used vast range annihilation in black god dragon mode.



In Shizuku's case, she would win if she created a sword world of several hundred black katana in Limit Break state.



Yes, anyone, even the veteran cheat group couldn't fight directly against Abyssgate's stealth tactic and his greatest trump card――attacking in waves using a thousand clones. There was a high possibility that they would be defeated before displaying their power if they didn't used something cheat-like like blowing away the whole surrounding area in one go or bulldozing through using specs difference.



Therefore, he was the right-hand man of the demon king. Therefore, he nonchalantly got categorized among mankind's strongest class.



The expression of Yue and Kaori who got that fact thrust before them once more was bitter.



Abyssgate faced those two and sneered「Fuh」. He must be wanting to say that this was the beginning of the second round. Clones were materializing. The number was increasing than before. His strength and the painfulness of his speech and act were increasing following the depth of the abyss.



He was really a troublesome boss character.



And so, the two chose to annihilate the whole area.



「Mu? Where are you two going?」



Ahead of the gaze of Abyssgate who was looking up, there were the figures of the flying Kaori and Yue. Their hands were full with the MP recovery medicine that they had purchased by quite a lot.



What materialized at the next moment were five heavenly dragons and innumerably number of silver feathers. In addition, a silver sun and a sun of azure flame materialized overhead.



――He couldn't be defeated without bulldozing through by force. Speaking in reverse, if they were in an environment where bulldozing through was possible, he could be easily defeated.



「……I'm glad this is a game.」



「You're right.」



The silver feathers and flame bullets for air bombing kept increasing without end. The five heavenly dragons growled while the sun of silver and sun of azure flame were enlarging.



Abyssgate who saw that was,



「No, aren't those a bit no good?」



The next moment, the scene of the end of the century manifested on the ground.



The earth that was plowed by the saturation attack could be mistaken as the scene of hell. The figure of the collapsed Abyssgate smoldering with rising smoke was lying there. He was dispersing into red particles just like an enemy character. It seemed that he was completely knocked out.



Yue and Kaori landed down beside such Abyssgate and they walked near his head to examine the situation.



「…..He is twitching.」



「It's amazing he still has complete limbs even after all that.」



'If this is in reality then he will be scattered all over the place', Kaori said such gang-like line with a cute face.



Abyssgate who was still barely conscious because of the game mechanism turned his gaze toward such two and he opened his mouth.



「Ku-ku-ku-, I'm the weakest one even among the four heavenly kings. I'm merely a disgrace of the demon king village……」



「Eh, you are saying such thing yourself?」



「……Hajime, brutal.」



Hajime-san who set this up was seriously savage, retorted Yue inside her heart. Surely this was the fault of the bug.



Abyssgate wrung out his last strength and pointed out with a trembling hand.



Yue and Kaori were on guard in case he was planning something at the end, but Abyssgate's fingertip was pointing ahead of the highway.



「If you circle around that forest along the highway, you will be able to see the demon king village.」



It seemed he gave them the road direction.



The hand fell down limply. Abyssgate was vanishing into dust.



「Anyway, let's go there for now.」



「……Nn」



Both of them started walking. They didn't look back.



About five minutes since they walked following the highway, when they circled the forest, it was just as Abyssgate said, they could see a tranquil village that was surrounded by wooden fence.



It was a small scale village with a calm atmosphere. It had scenery that was fitting for the next village after the village of beginning.



If there wasn't the figures of people in front of the entrance that looked like a lovely arch made from wood.



「……」



「……」



Yue and Kaori shared the feeling of 'somehow, I really don't want to go there huuh'. But those people over there were looking here. They were looking awfully intensely here.



Yes, the rabbit eared person leaning on the pillar of lovely wooden arch with arms crossed and face sporting a nihilistic smile for some reason, and a masked pink, and a black dragon who was there for some reason despite the place being a village, and a man riding on the back of that dragon sporting a smile that looked like a demon king, they all were looking really intensely at Yue and Kaori.



For the time being, they tried to approach.



An intense pressure and *GOGOGOGO-* sound were emitted from the man. An atmosphere that gave the skin goosebumps was drifting in the area. The wind of battlefield was flowing viscously. A monstrous presence that wasn't inferior even compared to the real thing. By the point of time one confronted this man, don't mention defeat, that person would instead be given the premonition of death.



This was without a doubt, the last boss. The demon king.



Yue and Kaori who were made to understand that whether they wanted it or not finally arrived nearby, and the demon king opened his mouth with an expression that looked mocking toward the challengers.



「Welcome, I am the village chief of the demon king village.」



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I watched Sniper: Special Ops.



Seagal-sama……



Anyway, I got a better opinion of Under Siege and Under Siege 2.





Chapter 255




The demon king village was a tranquil place that was surrounded with splendid wooden fence. The entrance that depicted a lovely arch could be seen as casually conveying the will 「We greatly welcome other people than villager too」 of the village chief.



As for its scale it was about twice as big as the village of beginning. There might be around three hundred people living there. There was a conspicuously large tower at the middle of the village, a cross was attached at its summit. Surely that was the church. That was Yue and Kaori's destination.



But, they wouldn't be able to reach there that easily. There was one reason for that.



Because the demon king village's village chief-san and four heavenly king-san were standing in their way with a somewhat awesome atmosphere!



「I won't let you two lay your hand on the village. Criminal Yue-pon and accomplice Kaori. You can choose, will you surrender obediently, or get punched flying.」



The village chief who was meaninglessly emitting pressure *GOGOGOGO-* on the back of the gallant black dragon was saying that. It seemed in order to protect the villagers, the chief village was planning to punish the two criminals scheming bad thing right here.



It seemed the village chief of demon king village was treasuring his village and villagers.



The black dragon cried 「Gu~ruru♪」 in agreement looking like she was somewhat having fun. The rabbit eared girl fluttered her rabbit ears *fuaasaa-*, and the pink ranger……the pink ranger was standing still without even a twitch. It was as though she was saying 「I want to be a shellfish」.



All of them were in a really motivated state!



Yue stared at the fearlessly grinning village chief and for a moment she showed a gesture as though thinking of something, and a beat later, she rolled up her sleeves completely looking as though she wanted to say 「Just bring it on~」 while returning back a fearless smile.



Seeing Yue walking forward, Kaori stopped her in panic.



「Geez-, Yue. Why are you that belligerent since we came here! There is an option of surrendering here, and by any chance perhaps we will be able to go to the church without fighting isn't it?」



「…………Fuh」



「Just now, why did you laugh? Heey, why did you laugh I wonder? I wonder?」



Kaori's Hannya-san almost came out looking at Yue scornful laugh that was making fun of her, but there she swallowed back her anger with an effort and she cleared her throat while pulling herself together. And then, she faced the village chief and opened her mouth.



「Err, Haji――not, village chief-san. If we surrender can you let us go to the church? If possible, we don't to fight……」



For the moment, Kaori attempted to negotiate in accordance with the game's setting but,



「…………Fuh」



「Just now, why did you laugh? Heey, Hajime-kun. Just now, why did you laugh I wonder!?」



She was laughed at scornfully and made fun of with an expression that was exactly like Yue. Kaori-san was enraged with her forehead sporting a blood vein.



「No negotiation against criminal. Death or Destroy-! That is the international common sense!」



「The village chief of a remote village talking about international common sense is……」



Kaori became despondent when she heard the unhesitating declaration of the village chief-san.



「……Kaori. Stop being so unsightly by trying to negotiate after this late. We are criminal! Blowing up anyone who stand in our way and devoting ourselves to plunder until exhaustion are our duty!」



「I don't think that I'm someone so nasty to the level of a defiant criminal. Or rather, can you stop casually saying "we" to include even me as a criminal I wonder!? After all it's Yue who is the culprit for all the charges isn't it!?」



Kaori's straight-man act was well executed. However, Yue-sama paid it no mind. She took a step forward and held up one hand forward, then her fingertip bent and made a challenging gesture as though to say 'come and get me'.



Ignoring Kaori who was holding her head, the members of demon king village also showed their motivation in respond to the provocation.



But, there, the rabbit eared girl came forward alone.



「Chief-sama. Chief-sama himself doesn't need to be troubled only to keep company bunches of this level. I'll take care of them. Together with pink ranger!」



「!?」



It was the common pattern. For some reason pink ranger turned her head to the rabbit eared girl in a flash with an air as though to say 「Eh, me too!?」 though.



「Hou, not a bad idea. Then I'll leave it to the rabbit ear and pink ranger. Teach them that the nicknames 『Or rather, this girl cannot get hit with bullet though, seriously. This buggy rabbit』 and 『The most wicked urban legend of the empire』aren't just for show.」



「Roger desuu! ……Eh, just now, was I nonchalantly got dissed?」



「……」



The rabbit ear girl reflexively stopped moving and looked back, while pink ranger was covered with dark cloud absentmindedly as though she was remembering a black history. The village chief sent a brief glance at such two before the black dragon flew to the sky with him still riding it. It seemed that he would treat himself with being a spectator from up high.



The rabbit ears and pink ranger pulled themselves back together and they each took out a huge war hammer and black katana and they took their stance.



From looking it seemed that pink ranger wasn't motivated, but the strength of these two was the authentic article. From the point of view of Kaori who thoroughly knew that, it made her got cold sweat that they were fighting these two in this condition where they had no number advantage.



Naturally her expression stiffened while she pulled out Gram and Ama no Murakumo no Tsurugi.



「These are, powerful enemies.」



No reply came against Kaori's words. In exchange what could be heard was 「Sooi」 a stupid voice of throwing something. What was flying was a super compressed flame bullet the size of a fist. The speed was as fast as a bullet in contrast with that throwing voice.



「How cheeky desuuu――uu?」



The rabbit eared girl must be trying to sent it flying with her war hammer attack. The rabbit eared girl faced the flame bullet and launched a horizontal full swing.



But, the flame bullet showed an unexpected movement there. It put on the emergency brakes and the next instant it flew high to the sky.



The rabbit eared girl unconsciously showed an astonished expression wondering 'Just where could she be aiming at?', but right after that, her expression became twitching.



「Eh, ah, wait, Yue!?」



Kaori's uneasy voice resounded, but leaving that aside, the flame bullet drastically angled down and changed its trajectory even further and it quickly hit the target.



Grand explosive sound reverberated, a terrific fire pillar rose up.



――From a corner of the village



It felt like the time of the world stopped. Both the rabbit eared girl and the pink ranger, and the even the black dragon and the village chief, they were looking at the flame blast behind them with widely opened mouth. Naturally, Kaori was also the same. Screams were resounding from the village.



「……Fumu. Although this is a game, but even in a boss fight the village isn't turned into immortal object or no entry zone.」



A voice that sounded profoundly understanding, and lovely, and in a certain sense terrifying was resounding in the area excessively clearly.



Kaori who returned to her senses with a 'hah' made a grand straight-man retort without even hiding her convulsing face.



「Wha wha wha wha, what are you doing Yue!? Are you stupid!? Do you want to die!? This sister-san with a screw loose!」



「……Calm down Kaori. I only blew up a corner of the village a bit.」



「That wasn't a bit! You cannot throw away your ethics just because this is a game you know!? If you don't stop this, I'll get seriously angry here!」



Kaori raised an angry yell 'Ugaa――' that was unlike her, however, Yue shrugged her shoulders as though wanting to say 「good grief this little girl」. A pulsing blood vein emerged on Kaori's forehead. Hannya-san was standing by~.



With a gentle expression, Yue started to explain kindly, carefully, and thoroughly as though she was talking with a dull-witted child.



「……Are you listening, Kaori? No matter what kind of time and situation it is, it's no good unless you are thinking from the view point of your opponent.」



「At the very least, I understand really well the rage of the villagers who suddenly got bombed.」



Yue-san beautifully ignored Kaori's retort. She pointed her index finger straight up and began lecturing. Kaori was directing a fixed glare that was at the same level of Yue. As for the village chief followed by the four heavenly kings, they were also listening carefully in interest.



「……Even if it's a demon king that show up in a game, but why is he fighting? What is his objective?」



「Eh? That's……if it's normally then it's to conquer the world, something like that? In order to become a ruler is the royal road isn't it?」



「……Exactly. In order to obstruct that, the hero and his party will try to defeat the demon king. Sometimes they will do illegal entry into civilian's home, they will rummage around as they please, steal, if there is anyone who stand in their way they will murder them even if it's against their fellow human, in a boss fight they will lynch the single opponent with numbers. Under the name of justice! Under the name of justice-! You are mistaken! I am in the right! Because this is justice!」



「That's a terrible prejudice……but I cannot say anything seeing I cannot completely deny that.」



Perhaps recalling of someone in the past, pink ranger looked up to the sky.



「Eerr, I don't dare to believe this but, if it's for the sake of defeating the village chief of demon king village then doing anything is fine because you are justice――don't tell me that's what you want to say?」



「……Do you think I'm a hero? How impolite. Cough-. We are off topic, but in other words what I actually want to say is, fighting from the front is not the only way to exterminate the demon king.」



「Sorry, I completely don't get what do you want to say.」



'You still don't get it……', Yue-sama lifted up both her hands like westerners in exasperation. Kaori was a child that had self-control. She unconsciously lifted up her Gram but she immediately lowered it back down.



「……If you think from the viewpoint of the demon king, the demon king want the world and that's why he will fight even the heinous hero squadron alone. Then, in order to win against the demon king without fighting, you just need to erase his reason for fighting.」



「……Yue. Right now, I'm feeling so much goosebumps here. My feeling is like someone who have discovered a madness inside their friend here.」



Kaori who was feeling astonished hugged herself with both hands as though wanting to say that she was looking at a scary person. The rabbit eared girl and pink ranger, and the black dragon were also having the same reaction from hearing this talk. Their expression was like someone who had seen the darkness deep inside the heart of their loved one. Even the village chief-sama was holding his head at his wits end.



Amidst that, Yue created countless explosive super compressed flame bullet while speaking her conclusion with a smug face.



「……The demon king said. I want the world. In that case, it's fine if the world is just destroyed beforehand.」



See, there wouldn't be any reason to fight anymore after that right?



Yue puffed up her chest 'ahem' with a cute face, but her idea was extremely disturbing. I won't let you conquer the world! Before you can, I will destroy the world first without fail!



Indeed, the village chief of demon king village said it. 'I won't let you two lay your hand on the village'. He fought for that. That was why, if the village was destroyed then he would lose any reason to fight. This was truly a stylish demon king extermination. Crush not the body, but the very purpose itself!



Anyway, first thing first Kaori, rabbit eared girl, pink ranger, and the black dragon, they all simultaneously,



「Yue you demon-!!」



「Yue-san you psychopathhh!!」



「Rather, you are an evil god!」



「The husband is like this, and the wife too!?」



Hurled their straight-man retort.



Yue-sama wouldn't listen to mere words of the rabble. She floated up with gravity magic, made countless exploding super compressed flame bullets floating around her, and she spread out her hands widely.



She was truly overflowing with majesty like a demon king, with a fearless smile on her lips, and clear sadistic glint in her eyes. Like that she said,



「It's all peachy if you just win-!!」



Meteor shower rained down to destroy the world(village).



The rabbit eared girl and pink ranger screamed 'WAAAAAAH' while running around to intercept the flame bullets, and then the black dragon hurriedly participate in the battle. Seeing them like that, it seemed that it was really as expected that if the village which was a protection target was destroyed then it would be the defeat of the village chief's side.



「…….Take this and thi~s, and this this and thi~s♪ The village will perish if you don't try harder you know~. If any of you dodge or charge forward, then I'm sorry but I'll happily use the opening to destroy the village! Fu-fufu~nofu~~♪」



「Yue-san you fieeend! You bruteee!」



「Aaahm geez-. That's why I don't want to do this~~~」



「Oooi, Goshujin-sama! Thy first wife art rampaging here! Do something about it!」



Flame bullets that were carrying terrific power densely approached like a voley of gatling gun, furthermore every single shot was flying randomly following complicated trajectory. If they dodged then the village would be blown up, if they charged forward and the defense line was broken then the village would instantly return to ash.



If Yue used one hit kill attack, the lightning dragon for example to send flying the rabbit eared girl, during that time pink ranger would rush to bring the battle into close quarter combat, but because Yue understood that she attacked with barrage of bullet.



She was merrily firing around like crazy, but the storm of magic she unleashed was delicate and possessed lethal destructive power. It was an artistic special move.



The village chief was going to join into the battle soon, it was at that time,



「Sto, stop screwiiing, AROUN~~~~D!」



「……Nmii!?」



The vertical slash of Gram (flat side) from Kaori-san who was flying in godspeed burst on the crown of Yue's head. The magic dispersed and Yue fell while making a strange cry. Perhaps she bit her tongue because her hands were pressing on her mouth and her eyes became teary while she was rolling around on the ground.



「……Ka, Kaoriii. What are you doinggg!」



「That's my line. This is too fiendish! Even though this is a game, but this is still too problematic for a human!」



The black dragon glanced at the village chief. Village chief averted his eyes.



Kaori huffed in anger, but even while in that state she carried Yue who was still teary eyed under her arm.



「Even without doing that, we can still go toward the church without fighting! We can enter the village with my godspeed!」



It seemed Kaori planned to breakthrough using super speed. She was determined to shake off the enemies and slipped into the church.



Yue opened her mouth to say something, but Kaori's godspeed was invoked faster than that.



This skill that made it possible to shorten the very time to move from point A to point B itself so the user could move in super speed, if it was in a straight line it could surpass even the speed of railgun bullet.



Against this speed that was beyond the pale of the perception ability of living thing in general, it would be beyond anyone's power to lay their hand on the user without using external aid like magic or artifact, or preparing a special plan beforehand.



Once, even the apostles of that god were unable to even perceive this speed. The cheat of this skill was already proved……



(Eh, no way-)



(……Even though I was going to say that it was impossible)



In this world of godspeed, putting aside Yue who was sticking close to Kaori, any outsider should be unable to perceive her.



With the exception of just one person.



Indeed, pink ranger didn't even twitch, the focus of the black dragon's eyes were also still fixed at the spot where Kaori was at before. Though the village chief was looking at far away melancholically, but anyway, he wasn't following Kaori's movement.



But, it was only the gaze of the rabbit eared girl――that was following Kaori.



A chill shuddered through Kaori's body, in that moment the ground under the rabbit eared girl exploded. The rabbit eared girl rapidly approached as though in a frame-by-frame playback!



If this was a race in a straight line where the two started from the same starting point, there was no way for the rabbit eared girl to win against godspeed. But, if it was just cutting into the path of an opponent that was approaching from the opposite side, it wasn't something impossible.



As though to proof that, when Kaori noticed there was a war hammer's hitting surface approaching before her eyes.



「Fuwah!?」



Kaori unconsciously raised a strange scream while bending backward like a limbo dance to evade the war hammer. The war hammer passed above her head along with the sound as though the air exploded. Kaori's expression was twitching grandly.



But, she dodged. She immediately returned her posture from the limbo dance state and without paused she rushed……



A shadow loomed above. Obeying the warning her instinct was ringing at her, Kaori leaped to the side using godspeed. If she escaped forward, she judged that surely she would be hit by shockwave from behind and got blown away.



That was the correct move. It was unclear how, but after Kaori dodged using limbo dance she should have taken distance of several meter in an instant with her godspeed, yet the rabbit eared girl who seemed to have catch up swung down her war hammer from behind Kaori.



The impact smashed the ground and the shockwave surged forward like a tsunami.



It was a bad move for Kaori that her legs unconsciously stopped moving. *DOU-* When she could hear that sound of the ground exploding, the rabbit eared girl was approaching toward her front with a movement that was exactly like an instant teleportation.



(Godspeed――!?)



Kaori evaded while at the same time moving toward the village without pause. Certainly the rabbit eared girl was fast, but now they were side by side. If she could keep rushing forward toward the village like this, she would be able to shake off the rabbit eared girl. Kaori thought that, but the moment her leg stepped forward to advance, she caught sight of an iron ball approaching right from the side toward the position she would be going to and her legs reflexively stopped.



Just from where in the world it came from? Naturally the rabbit eared girl kicked it out almost at the same time when Kaori stepped forward. The iron ball that moved from the explosive leg strength was already the same like a cannon.



It was natural for Kaori to stop moving from the sense of danger, and then, as long as there was just that one moment it was enough for the rabbit eared girl.



(Ah, this is, no good――)



(……I think it's pointless though.)



She got caught. Kaori who was convinced so resolved herself and she lifted her hand to use Gram as shield. There, Yue whose aura seemed resigned churned her magic power.



The next moment, Kaori and Yue's figure vanished and then materialized a few meter ahead.



It was Yue's instantaneous space teleportation magic "Divine Existence". Actually the skill was liberated after they got the better of Abyssgate. Although, because the skill was only liberated just now, it was affixed with use limitation and the distance it could possibly travel was around 5~7 meter.



This time too they moved to a spot five meter away from the rabbit eared girl but……



「Eh, Shia is――」



「-, Divine Existence-」



The rabbit eared girl wasn't at the previous spot, and instantly, a shadow loomed overhead. Yue instantly invoked Divine Existence and teleported further five meter to the side.



And then,



「Whyyy!?」



The rabbit eared girl-san was right before their eyes. The war hammer was raised up.



「Nnn-, Divine Existencee」



More teleport! However, they were circled by the rabbit eared girl.



Further teleport! But rabbit eared girl was beside them!



Desperate teleport! Failed to escape from rabbit eared girl-san!



Even though they should be teleporting completely randomly, it was as though the opponent understood where would they teleport to right from the start, the distance of five meter was instantly filled and they were circled around!



「Ah, I see, it's Future Sight!?」



「No? I'm not using it you know?」



Kaori pointed out that the method of calculating their current position was using the rabbit eared girl-san's characteristic magic, but the person herself simply denied that while swinging her war hammer. It was barely dodged using teleport. Although this time there was a slight distance between them, but it didn't change that their path was blocked and they were circled around.



「Then, how do you know our position!?」



Kaori reflexively asked so, to which the rabbit eared girl-san smiled cheerfully,



「Instinct-!!」



And answered so.



Reacting against a speed that surpassed railgun bullet speed, and calculating the materializing position of instantaneous space teleportation using only instinct before circling around that position.



「……This is the bugged rabbit's way of doing thing with the bugged rabbit's characteristic after all.」



The eyes of Yue who was saying that tiredly was looking at far away as though she was escaping reality somewhat.



Kaori had never fought Shia directly. She sometimes saw her training, saw her easily dodging Hajime's bullet and had easygoing thought 'how amazing~', but now that she faced her for real she understood well her dangerousness.



Try to imagine this.



A heavily armored tank that possessed a destructive power that was literally a one hit certain death, able to trickily move around with a speed that could dodge even electromagnetically accelerated bullet. In addition, that tank was equipped with automatic repair function, could jump around until the sky, and able to accurately find enemy position whether they were trying to hide or teleport. To say more, a future prediction would automatically activate in respond to an attack that would directly connect to its death, so surprise attack wouldn't work at all.



It was a nightmare.



Even that demon king was made to lament like this, 「I don't want to earnestly fight only against that girl. There is no way to defeat her other than using plan to checkmate her. Or rather, when I accompanied her training before this, Donner's bullet got caught barehanded by her……now that she doesn't even need to dodge, just what should I do huh」.



By the way, after that training Hajime was improving his artifact's specs bit by bit. A demon king that was desperately increasing his strength because he was cornered by his wife……it was really surreal.



「……It's suicidal to do something like fighting Shia and others in this state where our ability is restricted. That's why, I thought to checkmate her while the game's setting is still in effect. And yet, Kaori you stupiiid」



「Uu. But, Yue was just too much of a fiend, that was why……」



If it was Yue in full power going all out then she would still manage somehow against Shia. However, right now she was in a state where finally Divine Existence could be used with limit. It was also difficult to declare that the space magic itself was fully usable.



The point was, it was a situation of "level insufficient to clear the stage".



However, there was no way the enemies would give anymore opening that would let them make an unavoidable attack by taking the village hostage. The enemies weren't that naïve that the same method would work more than once.



'Is this stalemate……'



When Kaori was thinking that, she heard a sigh that leaked out from Yue.



「……I don't want to use this move though.」



「Eh, you still have some kind of plan?」



The reliable Yue-sama. Kaori's eyes shined.



「Uh huh」Yue nodded half-heartedly, however, she was making a really lovely smile in contrast of that. It was a lovely smiling face that was sadistically bright.



「……Some time ago, Shizuku secretly tried on frilly gothic Lolita clothes.」



「!?」



The sudden words caused pink ranger to move her face in alert toward Yue as though to say 「How did you!?」. Everyone else were directing their gaze to pink ranger as though to say 「Eh, seriously?」.



「……When it was Shia's turn for washing laundry, she would sniff Hajime's laundry once without fail before putting it inside the washing machine.」



「!?」



The rabbit eared girl's rabbit ears stood up straight as though saying 「How did you!?」. Everyone else were directing their gaze to her as though to say 「Eh, seriously?」.



「……Recently, Tio was starting to write poem.」



「!?」



The black dragon's eyes opened wide as though to say「How did you?」. Everyone else were directing their gaze to her as though to say 「Eh, seriously?」.



Yue smirked broadly while declaring toward the girls who were like that.



「……I am Yue. The first wife who grasp everything of the wive~s.」



She was implicitly saying, 「If you don't want the happily embarrassing this and that get exposed even further, you understand what should you do, don't you?」.



In that place where dead silence had returned, it was pink ranger who made the first move.



She plucked off her own mask and then threw it away strongly toward the ground. And then, she collapsed all of a sudden.



「Pink ranger received critical hit. Pink ranger died.」



She even said such narration by herself.



The rabbit eared girl who saw that was trembling while raising her voice.



「Uu, Yue-san you cowaaard! Fight fairly and squarely desuu!」



The rabbit eared girl pointed sharply with her finger, in respond to that Yue-sama,



「It's all peachy if you just win-!」



She answered so while puffing up her chest. The rabbit eared girl collapsed spread-eagled on the ground. 「I won't forget this desuuu」Such curse could be heard from her.



Yue's gaze caught the black dragon.



「Nu, nuguu……」



The black dragon moaned and hesitated of what to do. Toward such black dragon, Yue-sama averted her gaze a bit, and she spoke with her cheeks slightly reddening.



「……Tio, you was cute. You are really a maiden.」



「Thou read it!? Mine book!?」



「……Honestly, I'm sorry. But, before this you have the previous offense of reading my diary as you pleased, so we are even with this.」



「NuguoOOOOOH, it's just so embarrassinggg」



The writhing black dragon then laid upside down and used both her front legs to cover both her eyes and then she stopped moving.



「Wha, what violence of words……this is terrible.」



Kaori turned a shuddering expression toward her partner. Rather, an uneasy thought 'Does she know something embarrassing about me too?' was descending on her mind.



Yue-sama glanced at Kaori. She smiled pleasantly. Kaori grabbed at Yue while saying「What's the meaning of your smile!?」, but even when she shook Yue's body back and forth, Yue was only smiling. Kaori's unease was only swelling up instead seeing that smile.



「Aa~, somehow this development is completely different from what I imagined……but in a sense, perhaps I should say as expected of Yue?」



The village chief-san finally came out. His voice came from the sky sounding like he was exasperated, but also in admiration, with a really speechless expression filled with complicated feeling.



「……Nn. As expected I cannot fight everyone. It's only natural that I will aim for a victory without fighting. The leftover strength that I can preserve――can be used to fight Hajime to my heart's content.」



「Nn? You want to fight me? I completely thought that you will also target me with verbal attack that I'm really staying on guard here though.」



The village chief-san tilted his head in puzzlement, which in respond Yue grabbed Kaori's hand and she answered.



「……Nn. This is a rare chance, so a battle for the last. I think it's also fine to test how far can I go in a tag team with Kaori.」



「Eh, Yue?」



Kaori looked at Yue in surprise. Yue turned her gaze toward Kaori and asked 「What do you think?」.



「……Hmm, I guess. We also don't need to worry about anything already, let's go all out for the end!」



「……Nn!」



Yue and Kaori touched their fist at each other in a display of their motivation. Their words caused the village chief to notice that the two had noticed and he made a wry smile.



Seeing Yue and Kaori who looked like they were having fun as though they were going to participate in the event that would be the last enjoyment of the day after this, the village chief started to manipulate the floating display near his hand.



Yue and Kaori were enveloped in gentle light. Next, two large swords materialized in front of Kaori, they stabbed smoothly into the ground. They were a black demon sword and a white holy sword. They were Kaori's exclusive artifacts――【Demon Sword of Circle Calamity Anima Ernte】 and 【Holy Sword of Gospel Bel Rexion】.



Yue herself felt her magic power overflowing from her body which became a golden undulation that whirled visibly outside. Her hairs that were fluttering gently and her shining eyes that looked like garnet wordlessly displayed that she was in her perfect state.



「Originally this is a space for training. There is no need for even a shred of reservation or mercy. Well then, let's play a bit grandly before the dinner.」



*jakin* What was taken out with such sound was Donner & Schlag. Their form that was emitting crackling sparks was truly ominous.



「Come, sister with a screw loose, and the village chief's regrettable daughter?」



The provoking words of the demon king village's chief caused the two to have blood vein pulsing on their forehead and,



「「Bring it on-!!」」



They replied with words that also sounded belligerent.



The stage was the sky.



The village chief who was flying around in the air with crimson ripples spreading from him was cornered by the splendid combination of the villager girl who was flying in godspeed with silver wings spread out, and the apprentice sister who had three layers of halo ring behind her and five heavenly dragons obeying her command.



Meteor shower of bullets streamed like a shower in the sky, giving rise to the profuse blooming of flowers of flame blast.



「Oo, Hajime-san is not just using Cross Velt, he even started using Grim Reapers.」



「Everyone is going at it seriously. Even though they understand that they won't die, isn't this a bit too extreme?」



「Sometimes going wild like that art also necessary. After all they couldst not really cut loose in earth.」



Shia and Shizuku and Tio had gathered before anyone knew it. They were watching the battle while sitting on the ground while grasping their knees. They were absentmindedly staring at the battle of the three.



Just as Shizuku said, they wouldn't die in this space, even so the extremely radical battle caused them the spectators to be in suspense with their heart pounding, but……



They understood from watching.



「……They look like they are having fun.」



「……Right.」



Both Yue and Kaori looked like they were really having fun. On top of that, the combination of the two was harmonizing further into godly level. It was as though they were practicing dancing to the same beat for real, which made anyone who watched would want to shout 「Oooh」 in admiration, the two were exhibiting such artistic techniques and tactics one after another.



Actually, from some time ago Tio had been going 「Ooh, amazing! There! Go!」 completely as a spectator.



But, both Shia and Shizuku seemed to be in a slightly different state,



「……Muu, I will be able to match the rhythm more skillfully there. For Yue-san, doing it like this, like boring inside will be better.」



「……Yue is also too soft there. In that setting Kaori have the habit of going to the right. Even though if it's me I will be able to do it in the way that makes it easier for Kaori.」



For some reason the two where pouting a bit with an expression that didn't find the show enjoyable. Perhaps they were jealous toward someone. And from their words it could be easily guessed who was the target of their feeling.



Even while there was a fierce battle going on the sky, the voices of 「Kaori you stupiiid~」, or 「Yue you idiooot~」insulting at each other could be heard from below. Each time they found something to be dissatisfied about from each other's movement, they would quarrel with each other, but even that quarrel itself looked like they were having fun somehow.



And then, each time Shia and Shizuku saw that, they would pout 「Muu」 again.



「It's really wonderful that they art getting along well.」



After glancing at Shia and Shizuku, Tio turned her gaze toward Yue and Kaori in the sky. Tio who were looking at both sides in order then whispered with a gentle tone.



A while after that, the showy extreme game continued until the magic power and bullet that were prepared by the setting ran out.



The hazy consciousness surfaced from the pleasant shaking and the voice of their beloved calling their name.



「……Nnu」



「au?」



Yue who opened her eyes slightly absentmindedly looked at the face of Kaori which was in front of her eyes. Kaori was also staring in a daze at the face of Yue who was in front of her.



「……I'm sorry, Kaori. I have no interest of that way.」



「That's a terrible misunderstanding. I also don't have an interest of that way. Yue you idiot.」



Perhaps they were slightly half-asleep, it seemed they were thinking that the other was crawling into their bed.



「Don't sleep talk, wake up.」



When their gaze followed the direction of where the voice came from, there was the figure of Hajime looking down at Yue and Kaori there. The two blinked their eyes repeatedly and then when they looked around, they understood that they were in Hajime's underground workshop. Not just Hajime, there were also Shia, Shizuku, and also Tio there.



Hajime laughed a bit while talking to the waking up duo.



「There should be no problem, but both of you, do you feel anything strange in your body?」



「……Nn. Nothing particular.」



「Yep, I'm also fine here. ……I see, we came back.」



They had returned from the world game back to reality. Kaori who took in that fact let out a sigh of relieve.



「Yeah, that's right. I was surprised you know? When I came home, both of you were sleeping in this kind of place, you two wouldn't wake up, and when I investigated the game was activated.」



「Uu, I'm sorry Hajime-kun. Looks like the game device broke because of our carelessness. When we noticed we were taken in already.」



「Looks like it.」



Hajime shrugged his shoulders to tell her to not mind it. Yue looked over the workshop and asked.



「……As I thought, only Endo was a program?」



Hajime answered positive to that question.



Actually, Hajime, Shia, Shizuku, and Tio who appeared at the end of the game were the same like Yue and Kaori. They were the real people who were diving into the game.



It seemed Yue and Kaori weren't really conscious of the time, but the time was already evening right now, Hajime who was in the middle of going home accidentally met up with Shizuku who had taken care of her family business and was heading toward the Nagumo residence. The two of them then went home together. Right after that, Tio's group also returned home.



They woken up the droopy Shia who was still sleeping like a log even when the sun had set, searched for Yue and Kaori who weren't anywhere and when they tried looking at the underground workshop, they found the two collapsing on the floor.



When they investigated, it became clear that the game device was malfunctioning and taking in the two.



At that point, it was when the two had finished their series of random encounters and were walking on the highway. At that time Hajime was pretty much able to quickly make the two returned to reality if he wanted but,



「Why didn't you do that then?」



「The two of you looked like you were having a lot of fun. Besides――」



Recently Yue's use of magic (offense magic instead of handy magic) was remarkably few, perhaps it was because of that her trigger of offense magic inside the game became really light.



When Hajime investigated the game log, he saw that Yue destroyed the church right after she entered the game. Hajime thought that perhaps, was she stressed out from living inconspicuously in earth although it didn't show up in her surface? Thinking that this was a chance that was hard to come by, Hajime decided to continue the game so Yue could cut loose once in a while.



To say more,



「About this game device, I'm especially paying attention to its safety. That's why, originally it's impossible for it to absorb the surrounding people by its own just from it falling a bit. And yet, for it to malfunction and get bugged like this――Kaori, you are the cause.」



「Eh!? Me!?」



「Yes. This is just my guess, but when this device hit you, I think you unconsciously used your disintegration ability at that time. You used it for just an instant, and it was really only a slight activation, but a part of the safety mechanism along with the magic power in it were dispersed because of that.」



「Wa, was that true?」



「Yeah. Even for just an instant but it was still disintegration magic. Even though it was an incident, but you unconsciously activated that kind of atrocious thing, to put it another way your control was sloppy――Kaori, you are too much of a peace idiot.」



「Hauuua!?」



Hajime's exasperated pointing out caused Kaori to crouch in guilt and shame. Yue poked at her repeatedly while dealing additional blow 「……Kaori is too loose~, your stomach is also too loosee~」. 「My stomach isn't flabby-」 Kaori objected back in reflex.



And so, in order to disperse Yue's possible stress, and admonished Kaori's peace complacency, Hajime used Abyssgate program in order to buy time while he and the others finished their preparation and dived in inside the game.



「Well, though it seemed that Yue saw through that we weren't program right away.」



「……Nn. Naturally. A program and the real Hajime, there is no way I'll mistake between the two even just for an instant.」



「Uu, even I noticed it right away.」



By the way, Kaori noticed after she saw Hajime's reaction against Yue's violence. Kaori's expression turned complicated. perhaps she felt vexed of losing against Yue.



Seeing such Kaori, Yue rubbed the salt on the wound once more, Kaori made her rebuttal against that, and then they started going into a fight like usual.



But, there an amused chuckle interrupted them. When the two who were glaring at each other turned their gaze over there, they found the figure of Hajime chuckling with a really pleasant expression looking at them.



「No, really. The two of you get along well huh.」



Even though they were going to start quarrelling for real just now, but why was his impression toward them was like that instead? Yue and Kaori tilted their head in puzzlement, to which Hajime pointed at the hand of the two while saying.



「When you two collapsed, the two of you were hugging each other so strongly as though you two absolutely wouldn't let go of each other. Look, even now you two are holding hand without any sign of letting go.」



「……Nn?」



「Eh?」



Hearing Hajime pointing out so, Yue and Kaori gazed at their own hand. Indeed, they were tightly grasping each other's hand. What's more it was what was commonly referred to as lover hand holding with how their fingers were interlocked with the other's fingers.



When push came to shove they covered for each other faster than they could think, and when it came into battle they displayed action that was dancing to the same beat, and even when they quarreled they snuggled close to each other naturally.



What could these two be called other than intimate friend? Seen from the view point of a certain demography of people, there were already lily flowers blooming profusely at their background.



'This is involuntary-!' As though to say that, the two let go of each other's hand hurriedly, but before the two could speak out any complaint or excuse, the two were pulled backward strongly. At the same time, their face got buried *mofu-* into a soft place.



「Kaori-san, I'll say this in advance, but Yue-san is my Yue-san. I am her number one best friend! Be aware of that, thank-you-ve-ry-muchh! Desuu!!」



「Yue. Don't meddle with my Kaori too much. After all I'm Kaori's number one best friend. Be aware of that, thank-you-ve-ry-muchh!」



Shia and Shizuku sullenly glared at the other with Yue and Kaori who were gasping for breaths from their face getting buried into the voluminous chest of the two were in between them. It seemed they were respectively feeling a bit jealous that their best friend was going to be taken away.



「Nou, Goshujin-sama. While this sight art something commonplace, I'm feeling really alienated here, what shouldst I do?」



「……Should I step on you?」



「!? This damned Goshujin-sama-. I love thee.」



The underground workshop was somewhat in chaos, but right after that, a new character descended down from the ceiling. A part of the ceiling toppled over suddenly, and a little girl came down smoothly from the upside-down sofa.



「Muuh, leaving out Myuu like this! How unfair nano! It's dinner nano! After eating Myuu will also play that nano!」



The princess of Nagumo family seemed to be helping Remia and Sumire while her papa and others were playing. What a well-behaved daughter.



Urged by Myuu who didn't forget to call them for dinner even while huffing in anger, the decisive battle for the seat of number one best friend ended for the moment. They all climbed up the stair while Yue and Kaori were pacifying Shia and Shizuku respectively.



「Nn? Myuu doesn't go?」



「I'll return by 'pyon-' nano.」



「……You really like that huh.」



Hajime chuckled while exiting the room.



By the way, what she meant by "pyon" was the shortcut to the living room. If the sofa toppling over was the shortcut to fall into the underground, the 'pyon' was a mechanism to leap to the living room from the underground. It was like that thing singer used to leap up to the stage in a concert and so on.



The princess of Nagumo family didn't like normality!



Myuu moved to the floor tile where she could 'pyon', and that time she was about to activate the mechanism, *thud* a sound came from deeper inside the workshop.



'Oh?' When Myuu tilted her head and took a look, there she found a book with strange colored front cover.



Myuu took that book with her hand.



「Hm~m, Myuu cannot read this nano……. Well, doesn't matter! Rather than that it's dinner nano!」



Myuu wasn't bothered and jumped into the living room using 'pyon'.



With her hand still carrying the book.



The living room of Nagumo residence was overflowing with liveliness. Yue and Kaori was still quarreling with each other stingingly like always even in the dinner table, however Shia and Shizuku could only see that as the proof of them getting along well and they were blazing with strange rivalry, Shuu and Sumire yelled 「We are home―」, Tio was raising voice of ecstasy from getting stepped on, and the neighbors were startled.



The little adventure of the two love rival(friend) that happened from a little happening ended, and today the common day of Nagumo family ended peacefully and safely too.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Now then, in the middle it felt like I don't understand anymore what I'm writing, but for now the small adventure of Yue & Kaori is over.



Sorry that in the end I put a strange groundwork.



I just put it in for the time being, thinking that someday I might be able to use it for the material of an extra story, something like that.



Come on, Myuu has the property of being liked by strange existence after all.



By the way, perhaps the material I dropped was a bit unfamiliar, so I'll explain lightly.



A fictitious grimoire that appeared in Cthulhu Mythos. It might be able to summon something bad. Possibly the reader would be called by something bad.





Chapter 256




AN: Short story. This isn't an introduction for a long arc.



As expected, it's impossible to make a long arc with these guys w



*zudon*, an impact sound that resounded until the bottom of stomach shook the air.



A thunderous sound and vibration that even felt as though a demon king somewhere had launched a bombardment didn't stop ringing at just once, the sound and impact were occurring in succession.



At the same time, in the rust colored world――in the great desert Guryuen, a large sand pillar rose up and the rolled up sand cloud obstructed the sunlight.



Although, what obstructed the sunlight the most wasn't the sand cloud. If there was a person here, they would undoubtedly open their eyes wide and doubted their own sanity, or escaped from reality by convincing themselves that this was a mirage characteristic of the desert.



An object that could cause any person to be like that was dancing in the sky, higher than the sand cloud and locally obstructed the sunlight.



Yes,



「「「GYUOOOOOOOOOO」」」



By the killers of the great desert that were screaming while getting launched up to the air――the sandworms.



Originally, they would lurk underground and detected their prey through sound and vibration, then suddenly leaped out from underground and swallowed their prey into their mouth that was like an excavator. That was sandworm's trait. Their difficulty to be detected and their surprise attack were the greatest target of precaution for people who were going through desert, they were a symbol of terror.



Such killers who wouldn't show their figure above ground except when preying on the prey, why would they now dancing not just above ground but even in the sky.



Of course this wasn't because they had evolved and learned the ability to fly in the sky.



The cause of that was this.



『GO DIEEEEEEEEEEE-』



Higher than the sandworms that were launched up, was an existence that was dashing to the sky. It spoke sharply like a yakuza while it descended with its rabbit ears fluttering.



The rear legs that were abnormally developed accelerated each time they kicked on the air, finally it broke the wall of air and transformed into a white cannon shot. It was the kick rabbit that originated from the bottom of abyss――Inaba.



His rush that was jointly using gravity's acceleration, Air Force, and Explosive Ground Shrinker was just like a meteor. There was no way the launched up sandworm had any way to evade, it received Inaba's heel drop kick and the middle of its body burst.



Faster than the rain of blood and flesh, Inaba kicked on the air and rapidly altered his path, without pause he performed forward somersault and pulverized the head of the sandworm that was further below.



When he rushed passed the sandworm midair his body twisted and launched midair roundhouse kick. The fluttering of his rabbit ears due to the breeze of wind was beautiful. But, the result that was brought about was the very definition of gruesome. A shockwave that flew out following the trajectory of the kick exterminated one sandworm that was beginning to fall.



In addition, when Inaba swung his leg upside down in reverse as though he was break dancing, a slash that should be called as foot sword flew out from there, cutting apart the last sandworm into two.



Inaba who landed on the ground lightly flicked his rabbit ears *fuasah* with his front leg. Right after that, flesh and blood and the corpses of sandworms rained down around him. Inaba was standing with composure in the middle of the squall of flesh and blood.



『Do you think I don't notice? Come out already yeah. If you still has in you the dignity as the lord here.』



By the way, when Inaba-san talked normally, his talk would sound like 「Mokyu, mokyukyu? Ukyu. Mokyu~~kyumokyu」. It was lovely. He is a lovely bunny-chan who in the end of his evolution had his appearance turned into pure white with his round and cute crimson eyes looking moist.



He was able to talk with human language because of the function of one of the ear cuffs attached on his rabbit ear. The ear cuff possessed the skill of "Language Comprehension" and "Telepathy", using the broadcasting function his words could be conveyed to his surrounding as though he was talking normally.



Of course, the creator was that guy.



The great desert Guryuen returned a silence like calm water at Inaba's questioning. A beat, two beat……no change appeared even after waiting.



『……Well, it ain't matter. I too don't really want to bully the weak. I only bought the fight that was sold to me. If you say you gonna tuck your tail and run away, then I won't follow. See ya.』(TN: Inaba's speech is using thick Kansai dialect)



Inaba quickly turned around and began walking toward west.



Right after that, the ground exploded.



The opponent that Inaba called out. It was a deser monster that was emitting especially strong magic power. It was a giant sandworm――to the degree that the sandworms before this looked like children. It blew up the ground and assaulted Inaba from directly below.



Inaba's figure wasn't there.



There was only the giant body of the sandworm that pushed out until more than a hundred meter instantly, it looked like a tower that suddenly appeared right in the middle of desert.



Was Inaba whose body as a monster was comparatively small swallowed whole in a flash by this sandworm……



Right after it looked like that,



『Not just your movement, even your instinct is dull huh. This is the end yeah! Lament your own stupidity――pass to the next life ya!』



A black spot was created inside the blazing sun. The true identity of that was obviously, Inaba.



The moment the giant sandworm leaped out, Inaba kicked on its jaw at the same time and flew up high to the sky.



The powerful leg that was swung down along with a piercing yell cut across the pointed up jaw of the sandworm along with an impact, without pause the cut and impact ran until the ground like breaking piled up roof tiles with a punch.



The rabbit ears of Inaba who stepped on the ground went *fuasah* once more.



A beat later, the twitching giant sandworm was cleanly split into two and collapsed to left and right.



『If you want to pick a fight with me, at the very least wait until you can win against the monsters running rampant at the bottom of the abyss's bottom……hey, you cannot hear me anymore huh.』



Inaba shrugged with his rabbit ears and turned around, this time for sure he aimed toward the western sea and rushed using Multi Ground Shrinker.



『Even so, as I thought the monster on the surface ain't satisfying to fight yeah. If it's like this, perhaps I should go to the palace even I gotta wait for a bit, so I can fight that cheeky rabbit or Ou-sama again huh.』(TN: Ou-sama = king)



Inaba was letting out her complaining of dissatisfaction while sprinting explosively in a speed where even the surrounding desert looked blurry.



Currently Inaba was separated from her employer and also friend Suzu.



In the first place she became Suzu's subordinate monster was to become stronger. But his wish wouldn't come true in the present-day Japan. Of course, if he actually accompanied Suzu to Japan, he would also be able to do mock battle against Shia or Hajime or others, but as expected there was no way he would be able to fight against them every day with how busy they were.



And so, Inaba was traveling from place to place that had enemy that seemed strong, like the deep part of the northern mountain range and the sea of forest, the interior of great canyon Raisen, the lowest level of abyss, and so on. But for the current Inaba, there was finally no more enemy that could give him a hard battle.



Training, and then growing from that itself was what Inaba was living for. Heightening his martial art and knowing his own limit was exactly his life work.



He wanted to proof that even a monster could reach the height of martial art in the end of hard work, that his kick was able to reach the top of the world.



For Inaba who was such a martial artist, his current situation where he found no battle that could make his blood boiled and his flesh danced, where he had to cross through the verge of death, was honestly a really withering situation for him. It was to the degree that his rabbit ears were completely limp compared to usual.



『Boredom and stagnation are exactly the greatest enemy. Yosh, if I cannot find anything after searching for a bit, I'm gonna head to the palace and wait until Ou-sama open the gate. It also has been a long time since I met Suzu-han. If that Ryuu person made Suzu-han cry……I'm gonna split open his head.』



After about a few hours of dry desert sound that fluttered his rabbit ears.



Inaba who crossed the desert with astounding speed finally arrived at the western sea. There was the 【Sea City Erisen】at the coast, but Inaba's destination wasn't there.



Inaba came here to meet someone. He was going to meet a friend that he suddenly remembered amidst his days where he was starting to feel boredom. 'Come to think of it, I haven't showed up my face to him for long already', he thought.



Inaba took a step forward from the coast. Inaba didn't fall to the sea. Dark red ripple was spreading under his feet, making a firm foothold midair.



Like that Inaba rapidly left toward offshore by walking above the sea.



And then, when he reached a spot where soon it would be hard to even see the coast, Inaba took a really deep breath, and he called loudly at the one he came to meet.



『BO~~~~~~~~SS, LE~~~~~~~~E!!』



The loud telepathic yell spread out like a ripple. The call that was filled with magic power and magnified by artifact would reach the radius of 100 kilometer if it was done seriously.



Inaba focused his rabbit ears for a while to look for any reaction.



And then……



『DON'T SCREAM, SO LOUDLYYY~~~~!! Which idiot is doing this huhhh!!?』



An angry yell of harsh voice came back. The voice sounded pointlessly dandy, but it contained sullenness as though the voice's owner had just gotten woken up from his sleep by someone screaming into his ear using a megaphone.



『Oo, it reached out just with a yell. My luck is really good yeah.』



A few minutes after waiting while saying such easygoing thing, *plop* what showed up its face out from the sea was a fish with a human face that looked like a middle-aged man――that person (?) Leeman. (TN: The katakana of Leeman can also mean salary man in Japan)



『What's this, ain't this Inaba. I thought it was an idiot from somewhere.』



『Really sorry, boss Lee. I picked the fastest way to find you boss. You were sleeping?』



The two congenially conversed.



Actually, these two were acquainted with each other. It was after the legendary decisive battle was over during the one month before the return to earth. Hajime went to show his face to Leeman and Inaba who accompanied him met Leeman at that time.



As fellow monster who had strong ties with human, especially with Hajime, the two hit it off and since then their relationship grew where they could call each other friend.



Inaba scratched his head while apologizing. In respond to that Leeman splashed around the sea surface while shaking his head.



『I didn't sleep. Recently, the west from here is a bit noisy, so I patrolled and straighten up the idiots who got too rowdy. After all my wife and children cannot feel peaceful because of their noisiness.』



『Nothing beats your family in good health. ……But, acting stupid in the turf of a friend of the godslayer……those guys really don't value their own life eh. Well, normal monster cannot think anything like that though.』



Inaba sat down on the midair foothold that he created within inches above the sea surface while saying that with his rabbit ears swinging in amusement.



Leeman who was lightly bobbing on the surface beside the foothold was also throwing his gaze in a relaxed gesture in order to enjoy himself in the idle talk with his friend that he finally was reunited with after a while.



『I'm not that much of a big shot. If it's not for Ha-bou's meddlesomeness, my strength is only to the degree where I can command the dweller of sea a bit. I'm just a trivial old man. It's uncomfortable that a lot of people, including you are strangely paying me respect, so stop it.』(TN: Ha-bou, the bou is like calling the other person sonny.)



『That's because boss Lee is Ou-sama's lifesaver after all. It's natural that you were paid respect about that much. As the proof of that, ain't boss got gifted with a lot of artifacts? There was even some human who schemed or got loud tryin' to get their hand on boss's artifacts but got their just desert in the end, ain't that right?』



Just as Inaba said, the human faced fish Leeman's name was actually relatively well-known among the humans.



After the legendary decisive battle, naturally the historians and poets were making a lot of tales and poems that extolled that godslayer demon king. Amidst all that tales and poems, they identified the true identity of Leeman who Hajime meet during the one month before his return home, the interviewed a certain rabbit eared girl, and then they circulated the conspicuous service of Leeman far and wide.



When Hajime's party was about to get eaten by the monster lurking in the bottom of sea since the ancient time――the Evil Eater, he came running in their predicament, and by himself he bought time and gave them the chance to recover from the hopeless situation.



The historians said. If at that time Leeman didn't come running, the world would lose the mean to oppose the mad god and perhaps the world would perish.



――A human faced fish monster that was also the close friend of the godslayer demon king Leeman



It was recognized as a legend that spread far and wide through the continent.



Leeman let out a deep sigh, however, he then glared sharply at Inaba.



『You are prattling about artifacts or being lifesaver, but you yourself is also outrageous.』



Leeman's gaze turned toward the several ear cuffs fixed on Inaba's rabbit ears. Every single one of those ear cuffs was national treasure class artifact that ought to be managed by the palace, they were Hajime's quality product that currently were becoming super rare legendary artifact in Tortus.



And then above all else, was Inaba's popularity that was surpassing Leeman. After all,



『The only monster that became an ally of the demon king party by his own will, someone who fought through the Holy Precincts――Kicking King Inaba. Whether it was the hundreds of corpse beast soldiers, or the mighty and unequaled monsters of Holy Precincts, they weren't allowed to stand before his technique, right? Kukukuh』



『Sto, stop it already boss. I didn't do anything big. I only helped a bit so Suzu-han could talk with her friend. I'm the one who really didn't do anything much.』



Looking at Inaba whose rabbit ears folded down powerlessly with a troubled face, Leeman raised a pleasant laugh.



Both of them had the self-awareness that they were monster. Both of them ended up having deep relationship with the savior of mankind through a strange fate, but originally monster was the enemy of mankind. Both of them didn't even have a shred of hostility toward human, but even so, having praise and respect from those humans directed to them made them felt really awkward.



『And, what's your business here?』



Leeman asked to change the mood.



『No, I don't really have any business here y'know. There is no more enemy here that can fight me satisfactorily, so at the next chance I got I'm thinking to go to Ou-sama's place. At that time I won't be able to meet boss for the next while, so I showed up before that.』



『What a diligent guy. Well, thanks. When you meet Ha-bou, tell him I said hi.』



『Got it ya.』



After that Leeman and Inaba talked about the recent happening.



Two monsters getting heated up with old man talk in the middle of nowhere on the ocean. One side was talking with excessively dandy voice, spinning wording that was excessively suggestive, while the other side was using Kansai dialect. Boke & tsukkomi were bursting flowingly in their talk.



In the middle, hearing Inaba who was dissing Shia, Leeman smiled wryly while remonstrating Inaba 「Don't treat the missy like an enemy too much okay」 and so on, the time was flowing while they were getting heated up talking about Shia.



But a little while after that, Leeman-san suddenly muttered 『Nn?』 as though he noticed something and he turned his gaze toward faraway.



『Boss, what's up?』



『……The sea, is crying.』



It wasn't chuuni. Leeman wanted to say that the residents of sea that weren't sea monster were moving about in fear it seemed.



Inaba's eyes narrowed and he gazed at the sea at the west. Leeman also frowned while nodding.



『……Just now, I said that at the west it was noisy right? It seemed that it was flowing this way from really far away. I once went to investigate when the sun had set enough, but there wasn't anything particularly strange. But, it was curious.』



『Curious? What is?』



『The monsters straying this way. All of them, they felt like they were scared.』



『Scared……. Is boss sayin' that something is happening at really far away there? And that something made the scared monsters to wander this way, is that it?』



『It's just my guess in the end though.』



It was really suspicious. But, at the same time Inaba's heart leaped. If it was unknown then that was great. If it was a threat then that was even better. Boredom and stagnation was exactly Inaba's greatest enemy.



『Good thing I'm here, boss. The wandering monsters are coming here again right? Bring me along too ya. It's better the more helper there are right? Let's protect the peace of the sea with high spirits yeah.』



『……Good grief, someone like you. You are talking about peace with that kind of cheerful face? That's just your battle maniac in full force.』



『I ain't a battle maniac. I'm a martial artist. Fighting strong enemy is just what I'm lookin' for. Even if boss don't bring me along, I'm still gonna follow you.』



Leeman who shook his fin as though wanting to say 'good grief' in exasperation turned a glare toward Inaba.



『Can you fight underwater huh? I'm not going to babysit you okay?』



『I cannot fight underwater. But, if they want to kill me, they have to jump out from the sea. I just need to provoke them ya. Besides, look, I look delicious right?』



『You are rabbit after all. Your appearance that is.』



Inaba was laughing 'ha-ha-ha-ha', to which Leeman was making an expression that seemed like he was enduring headache as though to say 「I won't say any more」 while right after that, he let out a powerful telepathy.



That telepathy was to guide the living things in the sea. It was a measure so they wouldn't be vainly killed by the monsters pouring in from the far western sea, to protect the sea environment (Leeman's sphere of daily life).



At the same time, an abnormal pressure of fighting spirit was emitted from Inaba. His fighting spirit that was perfectly controlled reached out toward the west.



Inaba grinded his rabbit legs for warm-up while he was making a fearless smile and made his rabbit ears went *fuasah*.



『Come on, let's go yeah, friend of godslayer.』



『Good grief, can't be helped. Let's go already, kicking king of holy precincts.』



Saying that, the two rushed toward the chaotic west.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Recently, I'm thinking that middle-aged old man is nice huh.



Harsh old man, cool old man, absurdly strong old man.



Old man who is unperturbed no matter what happened, and can deal with it like adult.



I want to try to write story with that kind of old men as the main characters someday.



That's all from Shirakome.



PS



The latest chapter of comic version Arifureta is updated.



Yue is cute. I can see various Yue.



If you are interested it can be seen at the homepage of Overlap-sama, so please try to have a look.





Chapter 257




AN: Even though I'm making good on my words, why do I feel like I'm betraying the expectation……



There were two silhouettes dashing to the western ocean.



Both had strange appearance. Rather they were a bizarre phenomenon.



One was a rabbit running on the sea. More accurately, the rabbit was using dark red ripple spreading midair forming an energy platform as its foothold but because the rabbit was extremely near the sea surface and it was moving with abnormal speed, its dash caused sea spray to rise in its wake as though the sea got split.



But, Inaba whose rabbit ears were going *fuasah fuasah* from the sea breeze was a monster that possessed that kind of characteristic magic, so putting aside the reason of why he was at sea, there was no doubt that this was still within range that could be comprehended.



The problem, was about his companion.



『……Boss. Isn't that foul play?』



『Shut up. It's convenient so it's fine.』



Inaba glanced aside at his companion――the human faced fish Leeman. His straight-man soul that was welling up the moment Leeman took that out was finally breaking through and leaked out.



*KIIIIIIIII-* Such unique sound was resounding. Even though Inaba was holding back, but it still granted Leeman the speed to follow Inaba's speed.



The thing's appearance was closely resembling a delta shaped fighter jet. Its terrifyingly smooth body that was colored with sea camouflage brought the sea resistance to nearly zero. The ripple that was flowing backward was beautiful. The picture of a shark exposing its fangs painted on its prow showed the playfulness of the creator.



There was a spot that seemed to be the cockpit near the center of the ship frame. The inside of that cockpit was filled with water where Leeman was snugly settled there. A part that seemed like the propulsion device was installed at the stern, for a glance it could be seen like the propulsion method of water jet, but what was jetting out from there wasn't water but silver particle. Without a doubt it wasn't normal from that point.



――Small submarine with dual use for water and sky Triana (v.2)



It was the strongest and fastest artifact for open sea that the demon king gifted for his lifesaver (?).



『You are already a sea monster through and through boss. You are flying. You are sparkling. A flying human faced fish, that's just too surreal ya.』



『I told you, shut up. This is more or less a submarine. It can also fly. I am a man of sea.』



Perhaps feeling somewhat awkward, inside the cockpit that was filled with water Leeman-san averted his gaze toward faraway.



By the way, this Leeman's exclusive submarine (?) was linked with Leeman's telepathy, from its activation until its steering could be performed with only Leeman's thought. In addition, a part of Leeman's scales was transformed into living mineral using metamorphosis magic and regeneration magic, those scales themselves were artifact that possessed the function of "Treasure Warehouse".



『I never thought that boss's own body would also get demonically remodeled……Ou-sama, how terrifying.』



『I already told him that I don't need it. But Ha-bou said『Lee-san is the type to get dragged into something troublesome, so just think of this as something for reducing my worry and accept it』 and requested on me. Even though it was me who was in the receiving side. Good grief, our position is all messed up. If Ha-bou requested me that far, uncle just cannot refuse it.』



'What else is there other than gratitude that I can show to him huh?', Leeman shrugged his fins with that thinking looking somewhat troubled.



Inaba shrugged his rabbit ears「Indeed」 in agreement. The ear cuffs that were attached on that fluttering rabbit ears were also not something that Inaba asked for, all of them were Hajime's thoughtfulness for Inaba who was continuing his warrior journey to become strong.



The demon king-sama was comparatively harsh to human, but it seemed he was really kind to his monster comrades.



『By the way, what's that sparkling things? That ain't magic power right? Made in earth thing? Somehow I felt absurdly strong power from it though……』



『Nn? Aa, this thing. I also don't really get it. A few years ago you see, that chap Ha-bou got lost in different world that isn't this world or earth. It seemed to be a world of sky and dragon, and this energy seems to come from there. He improved it a lot, and then he said that for this kind of vehicle this thing's convenience is better than gravity control and improved it only recently.』



『Hohee~, a world of sky and dragon huh……as expected from Ou-sama. He will go anywhere yeah. As I thought being at Ou-sama's side will be the most interesting huuh.』



Inaba-san and Leeman-san didn't know. How the energy of that world was fundamentally limited. How Triana's energy strangely wasn't running out at all despite of that. How the cause of that was the "small planet" loaded inside the ship……



After several years of research, that demon king finally completely grasped one of mankind's great problems and made it possible to miniaturize and mass produce it!



By the way, the former battleship that was similarly demonically remodeled like Triana had been reborn as an extravagant passenger ship that could fly anywhere whether to the space or the dimension sea, and it had also been unveiled already in front of a certain queen and her group.



At that occasion, the grown up queen-sama was overcame with emotion from her reunion with the demon king-sama and did this and that, then there was a dispute with the introduced wive~s but……



With the mediation of the workaholic princess-sama who for some reason seemed to be excessively getting along with the queen-sama, they all managed to avoid further problems.



And then the former classmates who were also boarding the ship and came along together said 「He didn't stop with just having mistress, now he even have local wife!?」「How far the demon king is planning to go……」 with a shudder when they witnessed that.



Now then, Inaba and Leeman were absorbed in their carefree talk while there was something strange happening in the ocean, but the next moment, they withdrew from that place at the same time.



Inaba was making water pillar from the impact of his step. While Leeman took a sharp turn.



――OOOOOOOOOOOO-



The place where Inaba and Leeman were at a moment ago was assaulted from inside the sea by a giant sea snake with its mouth greatly opened just like the sandworm before this.



The jaw closed with a snap in vain without catching any prey. The leaping out giant sea snake monster turned its fierce gaze toward the pre――



『CHESTOOO――!!』



『We got an energetic guy here. Here』



What came flying was a white cannon ball. Inaba's flying kick that accelerated with a sound as though the air was bursting the flank of the sea snake until halfway, snapping that huge body into '<' shape.



The sea snake was going to scream unconsciously, but before it could there was a projectile flying with fire line trailing behind――a small missile that hit its head directly which gave rise to the blooming of flame blast and flesh and blood.



『A hot blooded fellow huh――uoh!?』



『Chih. What are these guys?』



Inaba was about to land near the sea surface while making his rabbit ears went *fuasah* as usual, but the next moment, a monster that looked like a swordfish fiercely flew out to stab toward him.



Leeman struck using Triana's machine gun and blew it away from the side, but then a lot of monsters of the same type assaulted Leeman.



Inaba's shockwave and extending kick slash turned the monsters into minced meat one after another, Leeman was using telepathy to use the weapon loaded in his submarine――an ultrasonic wave impact and scattered the monsters.



But, Leeman frowned. It was just as his leaked out words said, the monsters' action was obviously abnormal.



There wasn't just swordfish type monster, all kind of monster were attacking toward Inaba and Leeman above the sea surface without balking at their disadvantage.



『Wait, boss! I felt horrible number of reactions with my senses though!? Is this how it always is!?』



『There is no way that's true! This kind of number is the first time! Geez, just what kind of troublesome thing is happening this time.』



Even while Leeman was spitting out his complain, monster types that was related with sea like shark, snake, squid, and so one were appearing in succession.



There would be no way Inaba would fall behind the sea monsters in an air battle. Thinking that it was safe to leave Inaba, Leeman left the front line for a moment and went underwater, there he let out an even bigger sigh.



Inside the sea, it was jumbled with a variety of monsters spiraling up like a fish swarm. Fellow monsters with different species were in a close formation without even killing each other, originally this should be an impossible sight.



In addition, monsters were marching in one after another from the west.



This was like a stampede by sea monsters. A tsunami of monster marching from the west.



『These guys are bad news. If this number pushed in all at once, even Erisen won't hold although they have Ha-bou's defense mechanism.』



『Monsters marching forward without figthin' each other――this is really, this is a nostalgic phenomenon huuh.』



Inaba was exterminating all monsters that he could possibly attack from above the sea without letting even one getting away, as though to perform one kill per second. He answered at Leeman's telepathy with a voice filled with complicated feeling.



Indeed, it was as though this was the monster army at the legendary decisive battle.



A bad premonition crossed at the back of Inaba and Leeman's mind.



『I don't know what is going on. But, at the very least it's clear what we ought to do right now. Am I wrong?』



In respond to Leeman's question, Inaba's mouth split open into a fearless wide grin.



『I'm not thinking of protecting the human until that much. Yeah but, kuku-. This is a battlefield. This is my battlefield where enemies of all choices are crowding so much. I'll kick them all flying. I'll be the last one standing. If as the result the humans are saved, well, that's fine ya.』



『……Haa. Got it, got it. I'll just casually take care of the bunches that slip through, so do whatever you like, you damned battle maniac.』



Leeman launched a line of torpedo with an exasperated expression.



When Inaba heard Leeman's words, he laughed in even more good mood.



『Hahha――!! As expected from boss! You get what I'm talkin' about! Well then, sea monsters! Let's decide a bit, just who is the strongest monster yeah! Now, COME AT ME FROM ANYWHERE ANYTIMEE~~~~~E!!』



The war cry of the battle rabbit echoed. It broadcasted to four directions and up and down accompanied with dark red ripple!



――Characteristic magic Dance Battle Frenzy



Originally one monster species should have one characteristic magic. The characteristic magic of Inaba who was a kick rabbit was "Sky Step". It was a magic to create foothold midair, moved in high speed, or increased the kicking power, producing shockwave or extending kick slash and so on, it was a characteristic magic that was related with movement and kick attack.



But, under the strange fate, Inaba who achieved a unique evolution later on managed to master several characteristic magic.



One of those skills was "Dance Battle Frenzy". So to speak it was something like "Provoke" in RPG game. It magnified the hostility of enemy and directed it to the user.



The ripple of provocation that reached until the bottom of sea invited the monsters aiming at the delicious looking rabbit into battle frenzy.



――oOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO



――GAaAAAAAAAAAAAAA



――GIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII-



Countless roars shook the ocean and burst the sea surface with pressure.



Aiming at Inaba who was intentionally standing near the sea surface, the swarm of monsters spiraled and assaulted all at once.



The sea surface bloated up. It looked like it could be mistaken as a volcano eruption. Right after that, monsters were charging all at once from all directions.



『SHAORAAAAA!!』



Inaba performed a handstand but using his rabbit ears while rotating in high speed to perform roundhouse kick to all directions. The technique that looked like a break dance blew away the surrounding monsters in radial area. The monsters were sent flying like pinball.



A giant shark monster flew out from right below him.



『I'm gonna send you back downnn-』



The rabbit ears went *pyon!*, the recoil made Inaba's body reversed with a beautiful front midair somersault. A heel drop kick was launched from there.



The head of the leaping out shark split. Next even the sea was split open. The monsters that were within the impact range had their body's inside whipped up and blood vomits scattered around.



『ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA ORA-!!』



Monster leaped out and got sent flying, monster leaped out and got sent flying. On the sea surface with Inaba at the center, monsters were flying like machine gun strafing to all direction. They all were turned into sea scraps while skipping on the sea surface *splash, splash* like rock skipping.



Countless tentacles surrounded Inaba from all direction and enveloped him. It was a genuine monster that should be called a Kraken with body length of thirty meter.



『Bring it on-』



From the encirclement of the tentacles, Inaba leaped out――not. He jumped up a bit and then reversed his body upside-down. He kicked on the energy foothold and aimed toward the sea!



Inaba who by his own decision flew into the sea where he would be disadvantaged made a foothold inside the sea and using the skill above "Ground Shrinker" and above "Explosive Ground Shrinker"――the "Ground Shrinker - Divine Piercing Leg", he forcefully blew away the water resistance inside the sea and passed through beside the Kraken.



The Kraken was trying to turn around with a sluggish movement to chase after his prey but,



『This is my service ya. Your first sky travel since you were bornnn, enjoy it to your heart's content yaah!!』



Inaba kicked. At the Kraken. Along with the sea.



The sea surface undulated. Right after that, *GOU* the sea flew to the sky along with an explosive sound. No, more accurately what was launched up was the kraken along with sea water clinging on it, which caused the hallucination of the sea flying up, but because it was launched up faster than the water could be shaken off, seen from the outset it looked like as though a part of the sea was wholly sent flying to the sky.



――KUEEEEEEEEEE~~~~



The kraken's scream was surely something it raised for the first time since it was born.



Aa, the sky is really blue!



『Did you enjoy it? Your life will be enough for the payment ya.』



Oh? Before it knew it at its side a rabbit-san was……



The kraken's consciousness was blew away to beyond the sky.



『Ooi, Inaba. How long you are going to play there? A lot is also straying here you know? There are also bunches that are ignoring us and going toward Erisen. If you can only finish them off one by one, then I'm going to take care of it okay?』



『Mu? Even though I had especially picked a fight, but it didn't really work? As I thought this is strange huuh. Well fine. In that case I'm going to pick a fight even more seriously yaa!』



From Inaba, a valiant war cry『MUKYUU~~~~~~~~~~~!!』 came!



――Characteristic magic Dance Battle Frenzy Derivative Skill "Survival Frenzy Battle"



One of the ear cuffs. This derivative characteristic magic was limitedly generated from the ear cuff's ability that brought strengthening effect from sublimation magic. Its effect was several times the Dance Battle Frenzy, it made the enemy seethed with fighting spirit that made them threw their body into a banquet of battle.



A part of the monsters heading toward Erisen while ignoring Inaba and Leeman who was holding back their invasion underwater changed their route and gathered toward the sea surface right below Inaba.



The monsters were clamoring like carps flooding under water surface demanding food.



『My trump card ya. Eat to your heart's content and then head to the next world.』



Dark red magic power surged. Inaba's pure white fur was starting to be colored with dark red line faintly pulsing.



Inaba kicked on the air and dashed even higher to the sky. Far above the sky he suddenly rolled around. With an upside down posture, he activated "Ground Shrinker - Divine Piercing Leg". Inaba instantly broke through the sound barrier and further rolled around midair. His leg was directed to below――



『Blaze bright red, and burst open』



Just as those words said, Inaba's both legs were being wrapped with hell fire!



――Characteristic magic Myriad Clad Leg



It was the second characteristic magic that Inaba obtained later on. It enchanted Inaba's kick with elemental magic to reinforce his strength while also enchanting the element's characteristic effect.



From really high altitude, while falling down in the speed of sound, with the super heated kick attack Inaba――



『Bla☆st!!』



the enemy!



The sea warped. A moment later, a terrific shockwave blew up the air and sea in circle shape, a fierce heat wave instantly evaporated the sea water.



A temporary crater was created in the sea. It was truly the fall of a meteor.



All the monsters that were near the sea surface were blasted by the shockwave, even the monsters who were quite deep inside the sea had their internal organs crushed by the penetrating impact and they writhed in agony.



Even the monsters that were luckily quite far away and avoided deadly wound, a part of them lost consciousness, or else they lost their will to fight and desperately escaped to the north or west.



The crater of sea that was suddenly created was finally starting to recover its former appearance with the sea water at the surrounding flowing into it. The sea was fiercely undulating in a rampage. Dark red flesh and blood were coloring the whirling sea.



『Fumu. So so I guess.』



The rabbit ears went *fuasah*. Inaba-san whose whole body was dripping wet flew out from inside the sea and then he basked in self-esteem midair.



There,



『This stupid idiot-!!』



『Abeh!?』



The Triana that Leeman controlled rammed at the back of Inaba's head hard. *gochin-* A painful sound rang out.



『Whether it's Ha-bou or you bastard, I think it's better if both of you will be a bit more considerate to this uncle's safety. I thought I was going to die.』



『Ah……I, I'm ashamed, boss. Don't tell me, was the submarine broken somewhere!?』



Inaba's previous dignity vanished without a trace. He immediately became all shook up with trembling rabbit ears. Seeing that Leeman let out a deep sigh and went 'good grief' with his fins.



『Well, I'm fine though. This will make a tsunami like this. Ha-bou was also installing tsunami countermeasure in Erisen so just this much won't be a problem but……I'm telling you there should be a bit better way of doing thing.』



『……Well, it's not like that's impossible. But, see, ain't my soul a blazing one? Then the finishing move must be a flame one ain't it?』



『Who cares.』



Leeman's cold straight-man retort burst. Inaba's rabbit ears withered.



『Well, let's just say it's all right in the end. Everything is mostly taken care of, the rests are also running away.』



『Hm~m, even so, just what in the world happened ya?』



A stamped of sea monsters. If Inaba and Leeman weren't here, surely Erisen would be attacked. This was something that had never happened before.



『We lack information. But, the scale of this is different compared to the sporadic attack by the "straying monsters" until now. Perhaps we better inform the humans too about this for now.』



『Guess so. Especially Erisen, because that's Myuu-dono and Remia-dono's birthplace ya.』



'Anyway, let's go back for now.'Inaba and Leeman were of the same opinion like that with an exchange of their gaze, however, their monster instinct notified them of "something". The two turned their gaze to the west at the same time.



『……What's this?』



『……I wonder』



From the direction of the open sea far away, there was a small black spot that looked standing out. No matter how they looked, it looked like it was floating in the air.



Inaba and Leeman looked at each other's face and then they advanced toward the black spot while heightening their vigilance.



Before long the thing became clearly visible. It was a mechanical object with the shape of a rectangular pyramid. There was nothing supporting it from below, it was floating still two meter above the sea surface.



『Somehow it look similar with Ou-sama's item huuh.』



『Ha-bou's artifact, is it? But, this is……』



If talking about a floating mysterious object, what came to mind was the artifact of a certain demon king. But, both Inaba and Leeman didn't assert that. It was only a vague feeling, but their monster instinct sensed that "this thing is different".



Just like how Inaba and Leeman was observing it, the quietly floating mysterious rectangular pyramid also felt like it was somehow observing Inaba and Leeman.



『Boss. What should we do with this? I'm only guessing, but this might be related with the monsters just now don'tcha think?』



『Must be. Something like this is best if we left it to Ha-bou. Anyway, how about we collect it for now?』



Right after Leeman said "collect", a change appeared at the mysterious rectangular pyramid.



「――ｙこｒｒにもｋｗｐ？ ――ｈｐお、ｐｇ～――ｒうｄEhitoｂｌｌあ」



Right after it let out that gibberish language, Inaba rabbit ears stood straight from shock, and Leeman's listless half-opened eyes――it was like that from the start though――looked somewhat surprised. Then the pyramid ignored them and started to move smoothly toward the west.



『Wha, what was that? It talked ya.』



『Chih. Troublesome. It's making me letting go a bit more of the service time for my family like this.』



The mysterious rectangular pyramid moved away with really high speed.



Inaba's eyes that were seeing that were gradually getting brighter. That shine was exactly the curiosity to the unknown which exterminated his boredom. He was sensing the presence of strife at the destination where this rectangular pyramid object that was related with the monsters stamped was going.



『My bad boss. I'm――』



『I got it. You are going right? Can't be helped. I'll go with you.』



Not letting Inaba finished talking, Leeman consented of accompanying him with an atmosphere that if he was a human this would be where he took a smoke.



『No, it's better if boss stay behind yeah. This might be dangerous.』



『If it's really dangerous, then I have to bring back the information of what kind of danger it is. If I let you go alone and you don't come back, what am I going to do then? If I and you go together, even if we meet danger one of us can hold back the danger while the other escape isn't that right?』



『No, but still ya, what are you gonna do with your wife and child boss?』



Leeman sent a glance at Inaba who was scratching his head before turning his gaze to the east. Seeing how he was sending magic power to that direction, he must be activating telepathy.



After talking about something for two, three seconds, Leeman's body rocked and the white of his eyes was bared as though he got hit by a shockwave.



『Bo, boss!? What's the matter!? Are you okay!?』



『I, I'm okay. No problem. I only touched my wife's sore spot a bit.』



『Sore spot……what did you say?』



『No, I told her I'm going out for a bit. I don't know when I'll go home so take care of the rest please. That's all.』



『……That, even I who don't have a mate think that way of telling her is too insensitive. And, what did boss's wife said?』



『……Even if I go home, don't think that your room will still be here. This useless husband, something like that.』



『……As I thought how about going home? Right now.』



Leeman's mouth formed a small grieving smile before saying「Now, let's go. We are going to lose sight of it」 and chased after the rectangular pyramid.



It seemed the wife's stock of patience had ran out against the husband's wanderlust. In the end when Leeman went home, would he be welcomed back by his family……



By the way, Leeman's home was built by hollowing out a rock at the reef area nearby Erisen. It was a splendid home. In a human sense it was unmistakably a stately mansion of a celebrity.



Seeing the back of Leeman who was going ahead, Inaba's expression looked really complicated, but he then shrugged his rabbit ears and chased behind him.



The two monsters advanced forward through the ocean in order to ascertain the unknown object and the unknown something.



Their figures before long vanished at the other side of the horizon.



After that, Inaba and Leeman's whereabouts became unknown for a few years.



Because the two by nature had wanderlust habit, no one were especially concerned but……



One day, due to a notice that suddenly arrived, a turmoil that started from the incident this time as the impetus dragged in the demon king family and it developed into a great tumult where hell broke loose.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



The story this time is for the extra story that I'll write someday.



For now, I'm thinking that it will be a story where Nagumo family second generation will also show up but……well, it's still in the future.



The artifact presented to Lee-san……



This is Lee-san who was once taken out from aquarium by flying cross, so when thinking that now he became able to control that by himself, it's normal isn't it? It's surreal though.



Inaba's sure kill move.



Everyone, did you recall that person from One Piece?



But, Shirakome wrote by imagining that person from D-Gray. I like the scene of Falling Technique 「Iron Shac○」.



Twin tail is also not different then rabbit ears. Both are justice.





Chapter 258




Evening. The time after school when the light of the sun was starting to be dyed orange bit by bit.



In a place a slight distance away from the school building, there was the spirited yells of the students resounding.



That place was a building that was separately built from the gymnasium and was exclusively used for martial arts type club activity. The students were calling the building as dojo building. Clubs like kendo, judo, karate, aikido, jeet kune do, ninjutsu, naginata, kodachi two sword style, wrestling, boxing, and so on did their activity here, its spaciousness was more than the gymnasium with three floor in total, the completion of the building was really rare even for a private school.



People said, that it was the result of the hobby of the first generation board chairman surging out……



At the place in the first floor of that dojo building that was allocated for the kendo club, unique spirited yells that sounded a bit different from other club were resounding. Surely, most likely, the club members were yelling 「MEE―NN」, but even when the yell went well「eE―NN」, when it went bad 「EAAAAAHNH」, and if things didn't go well 「ENDEEEEERR」. Like that it became an hour of mishearing. (TN: In kendo, the athlete would usually used 'men' in their yell)



Of course, that was the result of the gushing out fighting spirit.



Though about this kendo club, they were showered with a lot of attention from the karate club, judo club, and aikido club that were also allocated the first floor as the place for their club activity. It wasn't something blatant, but there were quite a lot of glances flying toward the kendo club.



The cause of course wasn't those yells, but a beautiful girl with a trademark of a black hair ponytail.



The excellent style that could be seen clearly even across the loose kendo uniform and the dignified atmosphere that also gave off kindness. She was someone who even before her disappearance was evaluated as a composed girl, but now she appeared like an adult woman from where a core far stronger than before could be felt from her.



「Haa~. Yaegashi-san, she is seriously amazing. I wonder if I should join kendo club even after this late.」



「What are you gonna do even if you join huh. Rather, if you try to do something, you are gonna get done in by her seriously scary boyfriend you know?」



「Right right. Taking glances from afar is just right toward that kind of person.」



The target of the glancing looks――Yeagashi Shizuku. When a boy of the judo club who was taking glances at her was whispering ecstatically, his friends retorted with expression and voice that were filled with resignation.



If one looked around, it could be somehow understood that even the karate club and aikido club were also making that kind of conversation. The extraordinary mystery of her one year disappearance and her atmosphere that changed for some reason were raising her charm and degree of attention by a lot.



「Aah, sheesh. How irritating. Even though the match will be soon.」



「Really. If I remember correctly, the karate club will also have their match next month though……. They are lacking spirit.」



When one member of the female kendo club grumbled that with a frown, another member also showed her agreement while wiping her sweat.



It was at that timing Shizuku came with a drink in one hand and an apologetic expression on her face.



「What should I say……I'm sorry. As I thought, isn't it better if I don't come here so much? I'm also not a club member anyway.」



「Eh!? Wai-, that's not it! We weren't saying that with that kind of meaning!」



「Yep yep! The bad one are those guys who aren't concentrating at their training, it's not Shizuku-chan's fault!」



「Or rather, we are the one begging you to come here, so you don't need to be that considerate I'm telling you!」



「That's right, Onee-sama! If Onee-sama like it, I'll ambush those peeping bastards later today from the darkness!」



Shizuku had quit the kendo club after her return to school. That was because her physical ability and kendo skill had became cheat level from her experience in another world.



She was literally unbeatable by anyone if she didn't hold back. Shizuku judged that if she faced students who were seriously putting their heart into kendo and participated passionately in a match, and won when she wasn't serious while holding back, she would only bring harm to those students, and that was why she resigned from the club.



However, the club members who thought that Shizuku who returned to school would naturally also returned to the club wanted to somehow stopped Shizuku from leaving the club, however, their persuasion ended up in vain and Shizuku still wouldn't return, that being the case, they consulted the club adviser and created a position of "manager that could also coached the members" to keep Shizuku in the club.



Long story short, 'it's fine even if you aren't a member, if you have time come playing her while also coaching!' it was something like that.



Shizuku was tearfully pleaded at by her juniors, and clung at by her friends of the same age as though they were konaki jijii, and even the seniors who already retired from the club were wordlessly pressuring her everyday with their sad gaze.



Regardless of how the society and also the students' parents were vaguely keeping distance from the "returnees", Shizuku's comrades from the kendo club who tried to maintain their connection with her as though to say 「Who gives a damn about something like that!」 made Shizuku felt bashful and tickled.



In the end it was Shizuku who yielded and like that she was coming to coach especially in the days before a competition.



Thinking that it would be terrible if such Shizuku stopped coming because she was considerate of her surrounding, the female club members simultaneously gathered toward Shizuku who was looking apologetic.



It was also because they were simply fond of Shizuku, but it was also because Shizuku's coaching was actually fruitful, the students who received her coaching were without a doubt growing in skill. At the following month the qualifier for the national kendo meet would start, so the kendo female students didn't want to let go of the greatest coach that was Shizuku for that reason too.



「Hm~m, I guess. It will be irresponsible for me to stop helping midway in this kind of period isn't it? That's why, stop it with the ambush when it's dark. Also, it will make me happy if you can also stop calling me Onee-sama.」



「No way-. Onee-sama is disqualifying me as your stepsister(soul sister)!?」



Kohai-chan staggered with an expression of despair. The kohai-chan's friends of the same grade supported her 「Get a hold of yourself!」「Hang in there!」. Furthermore, it seemed that all the juniors here were "soul sister". The soul sisters multiplied while Shizuku wasn't looking……. Consider there are thirty in the dark if you see one in the open! (TN: Japanese's saying that if you see one cockroach, you better consider there are thirty that you aren't seeing. And kohai mean junior.)



The soul sisters were looking at Shizuku. Their moist eyes were pleading, 'please grant mercy to our comrade soul sister who is connected by the bond of soul-'.



「……Geez, it's fine if you call me Onee-sama, that's why don't look at me with those eyes……」



It was always the Onee-sama who gave in. The crumbling kohai-chan recovered her posture with a bizarre movement like a video being rewound. Perhaps these girls were already something beyond stepsister already.



When the practice that was fairly hard even with those things happening was over, all the female club members other than Shizuku were dead tired while changing clothes in the changing room. At that time a club member asked something that had been asked almost every time.



「Then Shizuku. When will you return back to club?」



「No, that's why, I told you already I won't.」



While ignoring with all her strength how the moment she undressed from her kendo uniform the bloodshot gazes of all the kouhai-chan were stabbing all over her body, Shizuku replied to the question of her friend of the same grade with a wry smile.



「But still, even though you are that strong. You were the champion all those years even when you were in middle school and also in the first year.」



「It's really a waste.」



Because Shizuku showed up in practice to give them guidance, the club members were satisfied to a certain degree just from being able to be together with Shizuku. However, purely as a kendo practitioner, knowing the skill of Shizuku (only to the extent of common sense), they felt it was really a "waste" no matter what that she didn't participate in competition.



Shizuku's wry smile deepened while she quickly wore her clothes to hide her body. All the kouhai-chan leaked out 「Chih」 from clicking their tongue.



「'm already satisfied enough with kendo. Besides, even though I stop doing kendo, I'm still continuing kenjutsu. Rather, right now I'm busy with that, about various things.」(TN: Kenjutsu = sword art)



Shizuku couldn't say that it was because she now knew the truth about her family.



However, getting suspicious about various things from hearing that "various things" part was how girl worked.



「Various things, is it? I see, it must be something like trying to have your boyfriend getting recognized by your family.」



「I won't hand over my daughter as long as you cannot win against me! Something like that?」



「Ah, so it's as I thought, Nagumo-kun is training in the dojo of Shizuku's family then.」



It seemed such rumor was spreading. The eyes of the fellow club members in the same grade were shining bright with curiosity.



「And, recently, what's going on with the boyfriend in the rumor?」



「Our classrooms are separated after all, so it's hard to get any information. Or rather, Shizuku, are you okay? You aren't two-timed? From what I heard other than Kaori-chan, he is also getting served by other amazing members right?」



Concern could be glanced at inside their curiosity. The woman relationship of the man who Shizuku got close to wasn't normal at all, and it was a well known fact in this school. Someone who was laying his hand on two extraordinarily beautiful transfer students, was even getting served by Kaori who should be Shizuku's best friend, and he was even knitting love relationship with their important friend Shizuku……the kendo club members weren't holding a good feeling about such thing.



「Thank you for worrying about me. But I'm fine. Kaori, and also Yue and Shia, they are important people for me, and we are staying at his side fully comprehending how it look like. Though it's certainly not something commonplace. But, it can't be helped.」



The thing about a person in love was the loser, and Shizuku's happy expression without even a shred of bitterness in it, and how she spoke fondly of her love as though showing it off, while all these also happened every time, the expression of the club members still turned speechless every time.



Incidentally, there were sounds of grinding teeth *grit grit grit grit-* ringing. Everyone tried to not bother about it, but of course the source of the sounds were from all the kouhai-chan. Dark conversations which would make one wanted to retort 'You guys, just what kind of secret society this is huh' like 「As expected, we have to ambush that man in the dark is……」, or 「However, several people already had the table turned on them……」, or 「We need to draw up something, some kind of new strategy……」, and so on were secretly spoken among them.



「Well, if Shizu said that it's fine, then it's not also our place to say anything……」



「Just what is so great from Nagumo?」



Almost all the club members had finished changing, but there was no sign of the girls talk ending even while they were putting their appearance in order. This was something usual.



The cheeks of the questioned Shizuku faintly blushed red. It was a cute expression that she had never showed even once before her disappearance. The club members' expression turned even more complicated because whether they wanted it or not they were made to realize that was how serious her feeling toward Hajime was.



Several of the kohai-chan were starting to beat up their fist onto a doll they took out from somewhere. *zudon, zudon* The punches were making unpleasantly nice sound. Those were wonderful punches that would make anyone wondered if they were more talented in clenching their fist rather than swinging shinai. (TN: Shinai = bamboo sword used in kendo)



「Even if you ask that……there is a lot.」



「If you are forced to give one example?」



「uu………………like, how he always protect me at all times, I guess.」



Shizuku's answer that she spoke while acting bashful made her friends of the same grade said 「Aa~」 sounding like they understood but also didn't understand.



When speaking about Yaegashi Shizuku, she was "onee-sama" for all the kouhai-chan. For other girls, she was a reliable knight-sama that would protect them. Even for the boys, they evaluated her as a gallant beauty that would somehow manage by herself no matter in what kind of situation.



It was difficult for the boys and girls at the same grade to hold impression toward Shizuku as a target to be protected. After all she was actually an owner of specs far superior then all of them.



But, people who were especially close to Shizuku knew that Shizuku liked cute things and her personality was really girly. The female club members of kendo club were included in those close people category.



Therefore, they understood what Shizuku said. Although they absolutely didn't want to understand the disgusting man who wouldn't see Shizuku as his only one.



「Really, just what in the world happened while you disappeared? From everything before this, I thought that Shizuku might go out with Amanogawa-kun.」



Several girls looked startled hearing that question and they turned their gaze toward the girl who said it.



Asking the "returnees" about what happened during the time they disappeared was considered as taboo right now based on their tacit understanding. At the beginning, everyone was really curious about that and kept asking, but even through the commotion in the society and abrupt quieting down, the answer of the "returnees" was always the same, and because that answer sounded preposterous, a recognition that the topic was "something that mustn't be asked" was spreading.



Shizuku was firmly aware of the atmosphere that was containing slight nervousness while speaking an answer that was unchanging from before.



「I already said it before this right? We adventured in another world, and fought the underlings of an evil god.」



「「「「「……」」」」」



Sure enough, the schoolmates of the same grade were at loss for words in hesitation of what should they say. All the kouhai-chan were staring at Shizuku with worried gaze that looked vaguely pained.



'It depends on you whether to believe it or not……' Shizuku's relationship with the kendo club members were a bit too close for her to say that. She didn't want to deal with them the same like how she dealt with mass media, government officials, and outsiders who were only curious. Even if what she spoke was the unvarnished truth itself.



And so, Shizuku winked playfully and added her words.



「Also, I punched Kouki until he cried and apologized. Kouki who lost some teeth with his face swollen all over while sobbing 'I'm sorry, I'm reflecting, I won't do it anymore' was really a sight you know?」



「Ooou……that's really……」



「I, is that, true?」



「Just what happened there. I'm absurdly curious here!」



The small tension from before vanished somewhere. The female club members started going 'kya-kya'. What kind of situation that would make that perfect superhuman number one handsome boy in the school to apologize while crying? And then, what was the circumstance that would make the caring and gentle Shizuku to be that angry? Their girl's indefatigable love delusion power was tickled to rise up high.



Shizuku was calming down her exited friends while,



「This is also about Kouki's embarrassing past, so I cannot speak the detail but……at the very least, when I wished for help from the bottom of my heart, the one who responded to that wasn't Kouki, it was always――Hajime at those times.」



Shizuku was saying such suggestive thing with intensely charming expression looking like a dreaming girl, or perhaps more like an adult woman who knew what was the meaning of love. Even her friends who were the same sex unconsciously felt their heart jumped seeing that expression.



This time, a different silence descended. The expression of the female club members was somewhat dazed, as though they were charmed by Shizuku. There was 'buhah' sound. It was the sound of the feeling that thought about Onee-sama spurting out from the nose of kouhai-chan.



Shizuku who noticed the situation around her looked down in embarrassment from her own words and she attempted to change the topic.



「Ra, rather than that, the preliminary next month. Do your best you all. Everyone has shockingly become strong, so I'm looking forward not just at the group match, but also the individual match. Our kendo club will dominate the top ranking of the individual competition.」



「That's quite the pressure on us though.」



The figure of Shizuku who was plainly changing the topic while busily finishing her preparation for going home with bright red ears made the female club members to look at each other's face and exchanged small smile. And then, following their friend who had became far cuter compare to before she disappeared, they finished their girls talk.



Next month.



Shizuku's figure could be seen at the spectator seat at the second floor of the joint gymnasium of a large city at the neighboring town.



Below the kendo club of her school was competing ruthlessly against the kendo club of other school. The loud yells that were filled with fighting spirit, and the sound of shinai striking the opponent, and then the cheering voices were echoing inside the spacious gymnasium.



「Our kendo club is strong huh. Especially the girls. Shizuku's influence on them is tremendous.」



Hajime who came together with Shizuku to watch whispered that with an admiring expression. Hajime personally wasn't interested with kendo match, but today was Shizuku's turn for the "holiday of just two people", so Hajime accompanied Shizuku in the form like rooting date (?).



The competition had progressed almost to the end, the group competition left only the final, and the members of the group competition were also mostly undefeated through all the matches until that stage.



Even in the individual competition, the third place had already clinched by a student of their school, Shizuku's schoolmate was also going out to the final match that would start after this. Even all the kouhai-chan won their first match without anyone losing, that was why this was actually something big.



「This is the fruit of their hard work.」



Shizuku said that not only from being humble but also because she really thought so. But, Hajime tilted his head and objected.



「Is that so? Sometimes my ears picked up words that sounded like 『Onee-sama is watching! With the title of soul sister in the line, I cannot show anything unsightly!』 though. It feels like it's only our kendo club whose morale is in different level.」



「……The, they are all cute kohai aren't they.」



「Cute, huh. After they looked at you Shizuku, they then looked at me and a lot of them were making yakuza face that seemed to say 『Sitting beside Onee-sama with a smug face like it's only natural-. You bastard-. I'MMA KILL YOUUUUUUUUU-』 though……. I think it's not a face a girl should make you know? Look there, that girl's opponent, she is trembling even before the match begin.」



「……」



Onee-sama averted her gaze.



But, her averted gaze suddenly met the eyes of another. The final of the individual competition would begin after this, but the opponent athlete was looking at Shizuku. The person was already wearing the protector mask, so it wasn't like their eyes were exactly meeting, but it was clear that the person was focusing on Shizuku.



That was how strong the emotion that was filling that gaze. In addition, if pushed to say, it wasn't a positive emotion like the respectful and affectionate gaze of the soul sisters, but the opposite――an emotion of denial.



(That build……also that school……)



The referee called out to the athletes and the opponent athlete's strong gaze moved away from Shizuku. Shizuku tilted her head and pondered whether she had done something, but she couldn't think of anything.



The match began while she was doing that.



At that moment,



「OOOOOOOOOOOOH!!」



The gymnasium shook. It was a roar so loud that made one hallucinated so. The loud yell of fighting spirit surged and electrified the skin. The audience seat became deathly silent.



Right after that, a sharp sound *paan-* rang.



While everyone was dazed, the referee suddenly returned to his sense with a 'hah' and gave his verdict 「Clean hit」. Yes, in just an instant, Shizuku's friend who was unmistakably top class even within the school got one point taken from her. (TN: Here the referee said 'Men ari', which mean a clean hit on the face I guess. Tell me if anyone know a better translation for it.)



Both sides immediately returned to their original position and then the match resumed. A loud yell of fighting spirit surged once more.



This time Shizuku's friend barely blocked the vertical slash from above aiming at her mask protector. However, that one attack must possessed sharpness and weight that didn't betray its appearance. The blocking shinai almost fell off from the hands holding it.



Without overlooking that opening, the opponent athlete began to hammer in with a flowing motion. Shizuku's friend was also a top class as expected that she continued to defend only just barely, but the opening she showed at the beginning became a big shackle that made her unable to stop the consecutive attacks, she wasn't able to return even a single counterstrike.



「Oi oi, that girl, is she really a girl?」



「He, hey. That's just too rude.」



The opponent athlete that was cornering the athlete of their school with an intense pressure caused Hajime to reflexively say such thing, which was chided by Shizuku in respond even while her cheeks were twitching.



Indeed, the yelling voice sounded deep, and the volume could even shake the gymnasium, it was really unthinkable that such voice came from a girl.



In addition, the body build of the opponent athlete was also out of norm. Her height must be over 180 cm. Her big boned body that could be clearly seen even across the protector was just like a heavy weight class judoka, muscle fibers were jutting out from both her hands that were holding shinai.



Looking objectively, that body build was something splendid that would make anyone couldn't help but ask 'that's really a high school girl?'.



While Hajime was blinking in surprise and Shizuku was drawing out her memory regarding the opponent athlete, the match showed the end.



Finally the athlete of their school couldn't endure the fierce attack, and the moment her shinai strayed away, *pashiiin* such clear striking sound rang along with the shinai striking the mask protector.



Shizuku was looking worriedly at her friend who was standing still looking dumbfounded. When the referee urged on the girl she seemed to return to her senses and bowed once before quietly returning to her own area. She took off her mask and clenched her fist tightly in frustration with her faced still looking down.



The kendo club members gathered around her one after another and talked to her.



「She got dealt with a bad match there. If the opponent was merely pushing on with brute force the would be able to still manage somehow but……」



「Yes. Indeed, the opponent……isn't simply like that. But, why is she in the qualifier here……」



It seemed Shizuku knew something about the opponent athlete.



「Nn? Looks like they are quarreling there. Is it all right there?」



「Eh?」



Shizuku who was pondering something returned her attention to the match venue from Hajime's words, and there certainly the opponent athlete just now seemed to be in some kind of argument with the female club members of her school.



「……What, is she your acquaintance just as I thought? I'm hearing Shizuku's name mentioned from there.」



「As, as I thought it looks like she has some kind of business with me.」



Hajime's inhuman ear wasn't as amazing as the rabbit ear of the rabbit clan, but it had really high performance in its hearing ability. Using that, he could hear that it seemed the opponent player was questioning the female club members about why Shizuku didn't appear in the competition.



The female club members looked really nervous against the really dangerous atmosphere, but when they saw the opponent athlete who still hadn't taken off her face protector lowered her voice tone and asked if by any chance Shizuku was seriously injured, they calmed down a bit and managed to somehow answer.



But even though they now could answer back, there wasn't a lot that they could say. It seemed they told the opponent that Shizuku simply quit kendo club because of personal reason and not because of injury or anything.



Surely the female club members were thinking that this person was an acquaintance of Shizuku who was a regular at the national meet, and she was worried why Shizuku didn't participate in the competition. They said to her that Shizuku wasn't injured so there was no need to worry, however, the opponent athlete then showed an unexpected reaction.



She suddenly took off her mask as though tearing it off, and then her gaze turned toward Shizuku with a glint as though saying that she would kill her. No matter how anyone looked, that expression was of anger, like a volcano in the verge of erupting. It was also an appearance with extreme intensity.



Hajime unconsciously got reminded of a certain guy haunting a certain clothes store in the other world to the degree he put himself on guard.



The square features, thick eyebrows and beastly eyes, large nose split chin, they were all impressive.



After the opponent athlete glared at Shizuku, she moved looking like she was going toward her. The female club members who guessed that tried to stop her, but she pushed them aside and moved to exit the venue.



Feeling the dangerous atmosphere, even the teammates of the opponent athlete came to stop her, but perhaps she already had lost all her cool that she couldn't even hear their words. She was advancing while dragging her teammates clinging on her body with her.



「……Looks like she couldn't get talked with unless I go there. I'll head there for a bit.」



「Okay. Just in case, I'll be nearby.」



Hajime also stood up following Shizuku who stood up from her seat.



No matter how abnormally big the body build that person had, it was impossible for a high school girl of the present day Japan to do anything at Shizuku.



However, what could hurt a person wasn't just simply violence. Looking from the other party's abnormal state, she might throw "words" that could hurt Shizuku.



Words were magic. Depending on the situation, it could be greatly powerful even compared to the highest level of magic from another world.



From the standpoint of a "returnee", they already heard a lot of inconsiderate words until now, if they could finish this business without hearing anything from the other party then that would be the best.



Because Shizuku possessed a strong heart she could endure a lot more than most people, but because of that her heart was easy to be wounded. Therefore, depending on the situation, Hajime was prepared to release "Pressure' that would make the other party fainted while foaming on their mouth without any hesitation.



The demon king-sama was increasingly getting indulgent toward his relatives since he returned back to earth.



「Err, I'll really be fine you know? That's why, don't do anything too reckless okay?」



「……I'll consider it optimistically.」



The extremely unreliable words of the overprotective Hajime tickled Shizuku and also troubled her.



Like that, when the two got down to the first floor and approached the entrance toward the venue, the aforementioned opponent athlete appeared while dragging behind her teammates and Shizuku's friends.



Even the tumult around her that was trying to stop was only trivial matter. With a look that caused a hallucination as though the Fudou Myouou had descended, the opponent athlete ran her gaze fiercely and caught the appearance of Shizuku. (TN: Fudou Myouou = Acala; Acalanatha Vidya-raja; The Immovable, a manifestation of Mahavairocana)



While somewhat desperate yells like 「Run awaayy! Shizukuu, super run awayyyyyy!」, or 「Onee-sama! Please leave this place to me and go on ahead!」could be heard from the female club members, the female opponent who was emitting an intensity that even resembled Ashura……



「Yaegashiii! You-, you are calling yourself a samurai like that!?」



Said such thing with unexpectedly cute voice that would make anyone wondered just what with the war cry at the middle of the match.



Anyway,



「I'm not a samurai.」



Toward the girl who surely was at the same grade with her, Shizuku returned back words of correction with a serious face and polite language.



Shizuku component was insufficient, so I wrote her just now.



When this is over, I'm thinking if I should write the 'Kouki get summoned too muchh'.



When I saw the thought column or the messages, unexpectedly there are a lot who said they want to read it, Shirakome who when flattered will indulgently get on board, as expected, feel like doing it.



But seeee, this is Kouki after allll. Anxiety whether I'm going to have fun writing it is coming and going…



But when I write, there is also the feeling of wanting to write properly too……



If the writing of the 'get summoned too muchhh' arc feel like it become slovenly, surely I will be revived if I can receive yell 'Shirakomeee get a hold of yourself!' from you all.



Please take care of me.





Chapter 259




Dead silence filled the lobby. The cheering for other match and other voices came in from the match venue, but even with all those noises it felt like silence had visited this place, it must be the fault of the atmosphere that was brought about by the two high school girls staring at each other.



"You are calling yourself a samurai" "I'm not a samurai" It was only those words. It wasn't a conversation that high school girls would generally make, but the atmosphere of the two was too serious to call it a joke.



The asking side even now was exhaling out wild breath that was accompanied with vapor from her mouth, with an atmosphere where it was as though her bloodshot eyes might even emitted mysterious beam, while the replying side wasn't even making an astonished expression that said「Just what is this girl saying?」, rather a desperation of「You think I'll let anyone attach anymore strange attribute on me more than this! I'm not a samurai, believe it!」 could be peeked at from the gap of her expression.



「I'll change how I said it. You, you are calling yourself a kendoka like that!?」



The kendo girl who boasted a huge body frame where people who seemed to be her kendo club teammates and Shizuku's friends from kendo club were still sticking on her, was raising an angry yell with a cute anime voice just like before. The gap between the voice and the Fudou Myouou face was terrific.



The first thing Shizuku did was to let out a sigh of relieve while stroking her chest hearing she was entered into a category that wasn't that strange for an active high school girl to be in while showing a perplexed expression at the indignation of the Fudou Myouou girl.



「I don't understand what do you mean by "like that" but……at the very least, right now I'm not even in kendo club, so I cannot say that I'm a kendoka.」



「-, then, it's as I thought, you are saying that you resigned? You are not just taking absent?」



Her aura of anger was still unchanged, but the Fudou Myouu girl asked with an expression that somewhat feeling shocked.



「Yes, I have formally resigned, and I also don't have plan of coming back.」



「……I know that you encountered a serious incident. Is that the cause? I heard that you aren't injured, but do you have a circumstance that make you unable to return?」



*grit* There was such sound. It was the sound of Fudou Myouou girl clenching her fist tightly. The kouhai-chan that was clinging on that arm to stop the girl stared still at that fist while her expression was starting to go pale. Her tear gland looked like it would burst crying anytime.



「No. Both my mind and body are healthy. It's not that I "cannot" return, but I "won't" return. That's what I decided.」



「-, Yaegashiii, you are-, -……wha, what is, your reason?」



Kouhai-chan's arms were repelled away! By the inflating arm muscle! Kouhai-chan fell on her butt and she trembled all over! The friends of Shizuku, and also the teammates of the Fudou Myouou girl too, they were seeing the vision of the girl's rage aura and shivered in fear!



The Fudou Myouou girl desperately repressed the something that was overflowing out from inside herself and tried her best to be calm. Hearing that question, Shizuku scratched on her cheek awkwardly while deliberating of how to answer.



If she said her reason honestly, it would be because in the world of kendo there was already no one that could become her opponent, because the specs she obtained in another world was a foul play, those were the reasons but……



By no meant she could say those things just like that. If she said such thing, perhaps Fudou Myouou would really descent to this world for real.



Now then, how to answer so that the matter could be settled peacefully……



Shizuku didn't even need five second to ruminate.



But, it seemed that little time instead gave the other party a conclusion.



「……I see. I get it. I didn't want to believe it, because I thought that there is no way that Yaegashi would, but――it's because you got a man aren't you.」



「Eh? Ah, no, it's not like――」



Shizuku noticed that the gaze of the Fudou Myouou girl turned toward behind her and she tried to say something.



But, before she could the Fudou Myouou girl threw a gaze that glinted with murderous brutality!



Not only the kendo girls right nearby, even the kendo boys and officials who became curious onlookers from afar were trembling violently altogether!



「Aaa?」



「–!?」



Hajime-san's glint reversal!!



What was overflowing out from those shrinking pupils was exactly madness! It caused everyone to feel shiver and their body locked up thinking「Those eyes, those are absolutely the eyes of a murderer aren't they!?」. That thing over there was a demon wearing the skin of a high school boy!



The Fudou Myouou girl quietly returned her gaze to Shizuku.



That thing was no good. That was something that a human must not got involved with no matter what. The instinct of Fudou Myouou girl-chan that made that judgment wasn't mistaken.



Now, let's get a fresh start.



「It's because you got a man aren't you!」



「For now, wait a little bit okay. ……Hajime, stop with the glaring. She is getting teary eyed, and several people collapsed already while foaming in the mouth. Look, like my kouhai over there.」



Hajime-san was looking.



When Shizuku looked back across her shoulder and asked Hajime to stop with a wry smile, Hajime obediently settled down his ghastly aura. He folded his arms once more and also closed his eyes. His atmosphere was turning back to a quiet one. The madness had left. Everyone's SAN value was protected!



Shizuku's friends let out whispers of gratitude「Shizuku is goddess」. Also, it seemed the legend of the school's two great goddess would increase. In a bit of different meaning than before.



「So, you are ignoring me. You are telling me that someone like me is not even worthy to be your opponent is it?」



「Err, you look like you are going to burst into tear anytime now you know? I won't ignore you or anything, so don't force yourself to progress the talk and wipe your……」



「Are you pitying me!?」



Looks like she was already in a state that couldn't withdraw back anymore. The rage that she harbored toward Shizuku for some reason and the glint reversal that a normal high school girl shouldn't get exposed at for their whole life seemed to cause her mind to be really at her wits end.



Shizuku was opening her mouth to calm down Fudou-chan who was picking a quarrel with that teary eyes while still emitting her great intensity, but the heated up Fudou-chan raised her voice angrily as though to drown out Shizuku's voice.



「I, in order to win against you! I'm giving it my all until now only for that! Whether it's in the middle school, or at the first year of high school, I was undefeated! Except against you! You were the one who always became the champion at the tournament! Even though defeating that you is my only objective, and yet!」



Angry voice, was it really? Her intensity caused the people there to feel that it was like that, but for Shizuku, she was somehow getting the impression that the girl looked like she was clinging to something, or perhaps as though she was lamenting because she understood that what she wanted was forever out of her reach.



「When you disappeared, I despaired at that time! I even thought for a moment to stop with kendo-. I transferred here was also because I thought, that if I do kendo at the district where you were at, then perhaps my feeling will cleared up a bit! That's why, when you came back, I was really happy, and yet……and yet, for you to abandon your sword just for a man!」



「Fudou-san, you……」



Surprisingly, the Fudou Myouou girl-chan's surname seemed to be "Fudou". What a match. Shizuku's whisper was faint and it only reached Hajime, but that Hajime was obviously shocked while saying 「What, did you say……don't tell me, her name is Myouou?」.



By the way, the girl's name was Fudou Akari. Hajime, consolation price for you. (TN: Fudou Myouou = , Fudou Akari = )



Fudou-chan rapidly walked toward Shizuku, leaving behind her teammates and Shizuku's friend who had let go of her due to her menacing aura.



And then, she pointed with a snap at Shizuku's nose, and with a blazing straightforward gaze she,



「Fight me, Yaegashi Shizuku. If you forget about me because you think it's something trivial, then I'll make you remember. This kendo of mine that you don't pay any attention to, I'll beat it into your body to teach you how formidable it is!」



……「」



Yes, it was a war declaration.



Of course, Shizuku had no duty or responsibility to accept. The other party was considering her as rival, feeling furious, and tried to drag her into a fight were all by her own convenience. It was completely unrelated with Shizuku.



But,



(――It will be easier if I can just ignore this, huh)



That was exactly why Yaegashi Shizuku couldn't ignore this. Her personality wasn't one that would let her choose the easy path.



To say nothing of how the other party didn't come at her with ill will, and seeing how the other party somehow gave her an impression as though she was struggling with her own heart, made her unable to refuse even more.



Therefore,



「I accept your challenge.」



「-」



She accepted that challenge gallantly. The sharp glint of the other party, was replied back with a deep gaze that looked like a tranquil forest.



That voice wasn't raised to be louder or displayed intense pressure by any means. However, the heavy and deep "something" inside that voice definitely made Fudou to unconsciously hitched her voice.



Seeing that, Shizuku's look loosened up slightly.



「However, is it fine with you if we do it at another day? Today, I'm coming to cheer for my friends. I cannot prioritize you here. Fudou-san yourself, you aren't planning to come at me by neglecting your teammates correct?」



「That's……」



Lured by Shizuku's gaze, Fudou looked back behind her. Over there, there were her kendo club teammates staring worriedly at her. A small groan 「u」 leaked out from Fudou. It seemed she recovered her senses for a bit after seeing her teammates.



Her expression turned awkward and apologetic, and then she shook her head as though to shake off something.



Shizuku handed over a scrap of paper to such Fudou.



「This is, my contact address. Please contact me when you have made your preparation.」



「……I get it.」



Fudou received the paper and she directed a gaze that seemed to want to say something to Shizuku for a bit, but then she returned toward her teammates.



「Shizuku! Are you okay?」



「Onee-sama, are you safe!?」



Shizuku's friends gathered one after another and talked to her with worried voice. Event the kouhai-chan who had revived before anyone knew also rushed toward Shizuku after glaring angrily at the back of Fudou.



「I'm fine, I'm fine. That person also isn't someone that I didn't know at all.」



「But, something like a match at another day……. This is something personal right? It will be against that kind of person you know? Won't it be dangerous?」



「I thought she is a barbarian from somewhere. That was scaryyy. The saying of a face like a demon must refer to that kind of person. Shizuku, I'm telling you this for your own good, it's better to report this to the teacher or someone.」



「That's right, Onee-sama! There is no way that lump of muscles is a normal high school girl! That must be a monster wearing the skin of a high school girl! Onee-sama is going to get eaten by that!」



It appeared that everyone was scared against Fudou's pressure and threatening aura, and also her atrocious body build and face. At the same time, they also seemed to be feeling great unease with this personal match where the rule might be ignored without the supervision of any adult. It was clear that they were worrying for Shizuku from the bottom of their heart.



But, the one in question here, Shizuku was instead frowning slightly.



She was happy that they were worried for her. But, if they then deprecated Fudou's appearance and body build because of that, even if that was because of the consequence of the girl's own action, what they were saying still wasn't something that felt good to hear.



Not noticing the inside of Shizuku's heart, Shizuku's friends were getting heated up even further with their criticism toward Fudou because seen from the side, it looked like Shizuku was only getting completely dragged into this.



「……Everyone, I'm happy that you all are worried for me, but putting aside criticizing her action, saying those kind of words toward her appearance that she was born with is a bit too much.」



「Eh, ah, Shizuku……」



「So, sorry……」



The friends came back to their senses suddenly when they saw Shizuku's expression that was enduring distress. Shizuku's friends knew about the personality of the busybody Shizuku who would feel other people's pain as though it was her own pain. At the same time, Shizuku's expression also vaguely looked sad seeing them speaking maliciously behind someone's back.



「Hmmm. I'll say it one more time, thank you for getting worried for me. But she――Fudou-san, just like I said just now, she isn't someone that I didn't know. I almost never talked directly with her, but she is a regular in the national tournament, and I had faced against her several times. She is definitely not a bad person.」



Shizuku said that with a wry smile, and then 「Besides……」 she continued while glancing behind across her shoulder.



「Even in the unlikely chance that she took unfair method, I'll still be fine. After all a sca~ry person is watching over me.」



「Aa……」



「……」



It went without saying who was it that Shizuku referred to. Shizuku's friends looked at Hajime who was quietly standing behind Shizuku, and then they trembled when Hajime glanced back at them in respond. Kouhai-chan was hiding by using all the senpai as shield.



「Indeed, it will be fine if Nagumo is there, I think?」



「In a sense, it feels like the person just now is still better.」



「Onee-sama, that person, he absolutely had killed two or three people before. You should rethink about going out with――hiihn!?」



To tell the truth, Shizuku's friends were thinking 「Is it really okay going out with that kind of boyfriend」, but when they recalled the glint and aura from before that resembled a devilish homicide, they couldn't think that Hajime would be really unreliable. Rather, they imagined the end of the person who tried to lay their hand on Shizuku and even felt sympathy welling up toward such person.



On top of that, if they knew that kouhai-chan's words was actually an underestimation…….



For some reason kouhai-chan felt an intense chill in the middle of speaking and she screamed. When Shizuku's friends looked at Hajime all at once,



「What did you say, about Shizuku and me?」



「You two are really a match made in heavennn! I'm sorry, please forgive me! Don't kill me!」



Kouhai-chan was trembling like a baby deer that was only just born. Shizuku's friends were getting cold sweat seeing Hajime's faint smile.



「Hajime. Don't bully my kouhai like that.」



「I'm not bullying her. It's punishment. It's including the admonition toward her usual strange gathering and action.」



「Do it moderately please?」



「Ou」



Shizuku's friends thought. 'Nagumo is totally a bad news', and then 'Shizuku is a wild beast tamer'. By the way, for some reason there was a person who blushed slightly hearing Hajime saying 'punishment' with his S face though…….



For the sake of friendship, Shizuku pretended to not notice that.



After that, Shizuku's friends returned to the venue in order to participate in the remaining matches, while Shizuku and also Hajime returned to the audience seat. Shizuku's friends splendidly took the championship in the group competition.



At the closing party, Hajime read the mood and he didn't participate in it. For some reason they were all getting excited talking about Hajime which caused Shizuku to be blushing from start to end. After the closing party, Hajime expressly came to pick up Shizuku which caused Shizuku's friends to get excited again and Shizuku's face got even redder from their banter. Such things happened.



Shizuku whose hand was pulled by Hajime to go home right away then looked back to give her parting greeting to the others. Her expression while doing that caused kouhai-chan to lift the slogan「Onee-sama reign supreme, Nagumo Hajime ought to die」. That expression looked so happy, to the degree that it would make anyone else envious seeing it.



A few days later.



Slightly after school ended, at the period when the last of the students would go home, there was the figure of Shizuku wearing kendo uniform and protectors inside the kendo hall.



The students of the other clubs had mostly gone home, the people there were only kendo club members who had specially received permission and Hajime who came for being spectator.



「……so you came.」



Shizuku suddenly turned her gaze toward the entrance. The club members who were continuing their practice because it was a waste to not do anything were making a wondering expression while turning their gaze following Shizuku's gaze.



About a few seconds later, a large shadow of a person slo~wly appeared at the entrance of the dojo building. Even though the shadow appeared quietly, *Dede-de-deden! Dede-de-deden!* the BGM of Termi○tor was playing in everyone's head.



Every single fingers grasping the door of the dojo building was thick, the legs that were stretching from the skirt were burly like rock. The upper arms caused the sailor uniform to look like it would burst open anytime, the uniform looked like it was a no-sleeved clothes like what the 'hyahhaa' group living at the end of century was wearing.



And then, her expression was also…….



He must be seething with fighting spirit. The deep groove carved between her forehead, her lips that were pressed on each other to form a straight line, sharp eyes that were gleaming brutally. The shinai bag and kendo protectors case she were shouldering looked like flail and metal rod.



This situation was truly 'The fierce god's descent!'.



Several female club members spontaneously screamed「Hih」 and fell back on their butt, but it must be a bit too harsh to reprimand them that they were being impolite to the opponent.



Speaking objectively, it was something that couldn't be helped, it was clear that for normal people, ten out of ten would say that she looked terrifying.



「Excuse me. I'm Fudou Akari. I came in order to have a match against Yaegashi Shizuku.」



With a lovely voice that like before had a terrific gap with her appearance, Akari-chan gave her greeting also following the decorum. For a moment she frowned seeing the girls who fell on their butt and the male club members backing away, but her expression soon returned to before.



She focused toward one thing. Only toward Yaegashi Shizuku. She decided that everything else was but a trifle.



「Please come in, Fudou-san. Welcoming words――are unnecessary isn't it?」



「Yes, I came here to fight after all. Your preparation?」



Fudou was approaching with a pressure that made it felt like the ground was shaking with each of her brisk step. Shizuku calmly stared back at her while nodding「There is no problem」.



Fudou was guided into the changing room and she changed her clothes there, and then she sat down across Shizuku and began to put on her protectors.



「Before the match, can I ask one thing?」



Shizuku asked while wrapping a towel on her head. Fudou nodded.



「You said, that your objective is to win against me. Is that really all there is to it?」



「……What do you mean?」



「No, it's fine if this is just my misunderstanding but……. No matter how, it feels like this is not simply you purely wanting to raise your skill in kendo further above.」



「……」



Being unable to have a match against the athlete that was her objective. That athlete completely stopped doing kendo. Would she display that much of a rage just because of that…….



An athlete that was considered as rival not participating in competition or retired from the club because of some kind of circumstance wasn't that rare of a story. Many people must had harbored dissatisfaction or tasted the feeling of being off their game regarding that.



But, Shizuku thought that the intensity of the emotion that Fudou showed was hard to be explained with just that. She felt from Fudou something more, as though her important thing was stolen away, a fervent something.



The expression of the questioned Fudou warped slightly. It was unclear whether it was directed toward Shizuku, or toward herself. But for Shizuku, if she was pressed to say, it looked like it was directed toward Fudou herself.



「……A person like you who have everything won't understand, the feeling of a person doesn't have. For me, I have nothing but kendo.」



After saying only that with a faint murmur, Fudou put on her mask protector as though to hide her expression.



Shizuku stared at such Fudou for a while, but urged by the gaze of Fudou that peeked out from behind the mask, Shizuku put on her own mask.



Both of them entered the match area while the kendo club members were watching attentively. They followed the etiquette with flowing movement and with the word「Begin!」 from the club member who took the referee role as the signal, the match began.



Right away,



「oOOOOOOOOOOOOOH!!!!」



A yell of fighting spirit that felt as though the air ruptured resounded. The club members simultaneously became paralyzed, while the window glasses were rattling for real, not just metaphor.



Fudou attempted to shake up Shizuku with fine sliding step that seemed to be flowing.



In respond Shizuku was only quietly standing still with her shinai readied in front of her. She didn't look perturbed or paralyzed at all.



「-, oOOOO-!!」



Like a large tree. That was how Shizuku seemed to be like. As though to blow away the weakness that she felt for a moment inside herself, Fudou clashed her dominating aura many time over toward Shizuku. She moved the tip of her shinai with small movement, she made feint with her gaze and footwork, all in order to lure in the opponent.



Images were emerging in her mind.



She would strike the face protector.



――Her torso was hit.



From the face toward the torso.



――Her forearm was hit.



From forearm to face. Even if it was blocked she would push in……



(-, it would get, returned-)



No matter how she ran her imagination, she could only image herself getting struck back.



Didn't she give up doing kendo? Didn't she stop participating in match and everything until now? Or else, was it that even with her only doing kendo in her spare time, even with her blank period of not doing kendo, yet she was still unable to even reach toward her feet…….



(Such thing-, that's absurd-)



An indescribable emotion welled up from inside. The image of defeat.



To crush down that feeling, Fudou tried to gush out a yell of fighting spirit that would be even louder than before――



「oOO――」



「yAAAAAAAAAAAAAH!!」



She was crushed instead by the sudden war cry running through her.



*shin*, silence fell. It was as though even the insects outside the building were holding their breath, a quiet world. Just with a roar, it was as though the world was overwritten with Shizuku's territory.



If it was just impact, then surely Fudou was above.



However, in "weight" that was hammered into the heart, Shizuku was overwhelming.



While everyone stiffened,



「-!!!?」



When Fudou noticed, in her field of vision, a shinai swinging down was……



She was able to move even faster than her mind could think must be the fruit of her everyday training.



*PASHIiiiIIN*, the sound of two shinai clashing resounded. There Fudou finally noticed that she was blocking against Shizuku's attack toward her face.



Fighting spirit that surpassed hers. A terrific step in that she couldn't even perceived. And then,



(It's, heavy-!?)



Weight that was unthinkable to be coming from Shizuku's slender body. Shizuku's pressure that was maintaining the sword-locking contest without moving into consecutive attack caused Fudou who should be superior in body build to reflexively step back.



「E, eh. That's, Shizuku right?」



「Should be, but……」



Bewildered whisper leaked out from the female club members. Shizuku's style was a "sword of finesse" that made use of variegated technique with elegant footwork and speed to the maximum, it was a common knowledge. They had never seen Shizuku bringing in the fight into a sword-locking contest by her own initiative, in addition she didn't unleashed her technique from there but instead pushing in with strength.



「Has your eyes opened I wonder?」



「-, Yaegashi-」



Hearing those words from Shizuku who was staring at her from point-blank range, Fudou noticed herself that almost got swallowed in. She clenched her teeth hard and pushed Shizuku back with a shout.



Shizuku didn't resist and gently pulled back. And then, she once again took her previous stance.



Fudou clenched her teeth grindingly seeing Shizuku's state.



「Not taking advantage from enemy but giving advice instead, you are really composed aren't you」



Fudou unconsciously let out such curse. Shizuku still only observed calmly.



「What is this match for I wonder? Right now, is not the time to exchange words.」



「-, I know that!」



The calm reply caused Fudou's face to flash red in shame and this time she fiercely assaulted.



Fudou was getting back to form her pointless exertion of strength and her mind that was shrinking back from her own image, she unleashed an unconstrained assault that was backed with weight that was unbecoming for a high school girl.



The strikes came consecutively and clear impact sounds that sounded like handclapping echoed inside the dojo building.



Against the blows that were like a storm, Shizuku sometimes dodged, sometimes, parried, sometimes blocked, and dodged more by even making use of that pressure. If Fudou's footwork was like a flowing water, then Shizuku's footwork should be called as a floating leaf dancing lightly in the air from receiving the wind.



No telling blow could land on her.



Even though normally the opponent's stamina and mental would be shaved due to the unceasing offense and overwhelming pressure, causing them to expose an opening, the one who was starting to breath roughly was Fudou instead. It was obvious even from across the mask protector. Shizuku was breathing without even the slightest disorder without even a drop of sweat.



Impatience caused Fudou's attack into something indulgent.



Shizuku smoothly stepped in.



「MEENN!」(TN: Go for explanation about yell in kendo.)



「aa……」



*zupaan* A sound that even felt pleasant to ear resounded. Without relaxing her alertness, Shizuku turned around toward Fudou's back and took her stance.



Fudou didn't move. That was because the hit just now was too beautiful. She could only opened her eyes wide in amazement.



It seemed that the all the other club members, the referee included were in the same state, everyone was paralyzed. They never even imagined that Shizuku who had never participated in a match even once since her return to school, far from not looking like she had no blank period, she even had become so strong to the degree that it was incomparable from before.



Strong, that word wasn't enough to describe it. In everything, what was called as the extremity was something that would make anyone felt beauty from it. This was exactly that. Shizuku's kendo already possessed "beauty" that would even made one felt moved.



「Referee.」



「Ah, err, me, men ari one point!」



Those words made Fudou to return to her sense too.



She still looked amazed, however right after that, seeing Shizuku taking her stance while calmly facing her, her expression greatly distorted. Her expression looked as though she was facing a reality that she didn't want to recognize, as though something that was hard to accept was thrust before herself.



「SEYAAAAAAH!!」



Fudou leaped forward. She began a fierce assault once more.



But, as expected her sword didn't reach, it was blocked, parried, and evaded with cruel calmness.



And then,



「MENN!!」



Once more, with a perfection that wouldn't allow even a single excuse, Shizuku's face strike landed. A clear impact sound echoed.



Fudou powerlessly fell on her knees. That wasn't because the strike caused a concussion or anything. It was because her heart broke. She crumbled down.



While the referee was troubled seeing Fudou who didn't look like she would carry out the etiquette for after the end of the match, Shizuku put away her shinai, took off her mask protector, and opened her mouth.



「Fudou-san. You see, this is the reason I resign from kendo club.」



「……」



Fudou slightly looked back across her shoulder. Shizuku continued.



「While I was missing, I wasn't playing around at that time. I was desperately polishing my skill in a struggle to the death. Because there was no other choice than that. Even though I stop doing kendo, but I'm still continuing the kenjutsu of my family even now. That's why, for "kendo", for the people of kendo club, my sword has become nothing more than a poison.」



「……In other words, you are saying it's because you are too strong, because no one is a match for you anymore? That I am not even worthy to be your opponent?」



「-, that's not it. I'm saying that even though it's the same path of sword, but the direction we are going toward is different. Even if you make me as your objective, it will distort your sword instead――」



Shizuku tried to find the right words somehow.



Shizuku allowed her friends in the kendo club to be present in this match too was also to divulge this reason to them who were urging her to come back to the club one way or another, but Shizuku had the self-awareness that she was saying something that also could be taken as her being haughty.



And so, even while she was talking to Fudou, a shadow of unease loomed in her expression wondering whether she would be hated by her friends.



Seeing such Shizuku, the club members were divided between people who understood what Shizuku meant, people who showed a complicated expression that didn't know of what to say, and people with eyes that got even brighter while saying 「As expected from Onee-sama!」. But, none of them showed a clear displeasure. Surely that was the result of Shizuku's personality and the friendship that she had built until now.



But, it seemed Fudou couldn't be like that.



「Why, just why-. There is only kendo for me! Even though I only have kendo! Even though I have devoted everything for it until now-. But why is it you who have everything that instead become this strong! You who easily abandon kendo-!」



「Fudou-san. What do you mean……」



Shizuku asked Fudou who was starting to leak out tears while she still hadn't taken off her mask.



「I'm envying you!! You are beautiful, stylish, and adored by everyone! On top of that, even in kendo where I have devoted my everything, you easily surpassed me! Even though you have everything that I want! And yet, and yet-, you easily abandon my important kendo for a man! Even though you abandon it, you are still stronger than me……such thing, it's just too much」



「……」



Such envious heart was thrown at Shizuku right from the front.



The body build and appearance of Fudou Akari were to the degree that it was fine to say anyone who met her for the first time would feel fear. It had been like that since she was a child. No matter how much of a girl her heart was, her outward appearance wouldn't let anyone see her as a girl.



Other people would make a complicated face, or in a terrible time they would laugh when she tried to be girly. Just by walking around, the people she passed in the way would send her a shocked expression. Even though she liked cute thing, she was ridiculed that it didn't suit her.



She already lost count how much her heart had been broken by clear malice. Just how much she had been wounded by insensitive words and deeds. How many times her heart was gouged because a boy that she liked was actually speaking ill behind her back. The heart of Fudou Akari was unmistakably a girl's heart. The world was too cruel toward such her.



What was the most painful for her, was when she saw her parents looking pained when they saw herself feeling pained. It wasn't that they didn't love her. Rather, it could even be said that they were doting on her. That was exactly why, seeing her parents getting troubled due to their troubled daughter fanned up her guilt.



Consequently, that must be why. Why she stepped into the path of kendo.



It was no use even if she kept getting troubled about her own look. In that case, she would try stepping into a world that would suit even someone like her. And then, so that she would able to approve of herself, she would become number one in that path.



She decided so.



But, she encountered her. Inside the world she stepped into, there was that girl.



「Why are you that beautiful? Why are you that strong? Why are you that loved? Even though I'm like this-, isn't this unfair!?」



It wasn't like Shizuku knew about the detail of Fudou's circumstance. But, Shizuku guessed it just from those words. The daily life that Fudou Akari had experienced until now. The bitter experiences.



Suddenly, the words that were always thrown at her in the past resurrected inside Shizuku's mind.



――Are you a girl?



Her chest tightened. Shizuku saw her past self overlapping with Fudou who was shedding tears. She was about to open her mouth following her boiling emotion.



However, before her feeling could turn into words,



「……You can just feel hurt. You should just taste the same pain like me!」



After saying such thing, Fudou whose eyes were giving glimpses of flame of envy and hatred deep inside rushed out from the dojo building without even giving anyone time to call at her to stop.



「Fudou-san-, wait――」



Shizuku immediately tried to chase after her, but her hand was grasped by a powerful strength and she was pulled back. When she quickly turned around, the one she found there was Hajime who had been silently watching until now.



Shizuku showed impatience and told Hajime to let go of her hand, but Hajime spoke back with a serious gaze.



「Don't worry, Shizuku.」



「Hajime……」



「I'll finish her off later. I'm not gonna lose to anyone in how to break the heart skillfully.」



It seemed that Hajime-san was planning to go and finish off the girl who was running off while crying.



Anyway,



「Stop that-, this demon king-!」



*zupaan* A raging shinai was launched in a straight-man attack to the face of the demon king. 「Ouch-」 Demon king-sama pitched forward while saying that.



Even the kendo club members who were dumbfounded by the chain of events also crept away, or even shuddered from Hajime's words.



Hajime stroked her own head while looking at Shizuku.



「You have calmed down a bit?」



「Eh?」



Hajime made a wry smile toward the astonished Shizuku and he continued.



「What is someone at her wits end going to do chasing after someone else who is also at her wits end? Calm down first for now.」



「Ah……」



「Besides, a beauty like you, no matter what you say toward someone who has complex about their own appearance, in most case it won't end well.」



If someone who didn't have confidence with their own appearance was then told 「It's fine, face doesn't matter!」 by someone who was recognized as attractive by everyone――it was guaranteed that the person would go 「You bastard, you are making fun of me huh!?」.



Strength left Shizuku's body. But, she also didn't look like she was accepting it.



「Then, are you telling me I should leave her alone because of that ? Such thing――」



「That's why, I'm telling you to calm down. What that girl is holding inside, is it something that light that words you thought up in the spot will be able to solve?」



「That's……」



Shizuku was at a loss for words. Hajime let go of her arm and in exchange his hand touched Shizuku's soft cheek and pinched there tenderly to calm her down.



「Isn't it better if you give her a bit of time? Like that, if that girl become shut in then you can visit her however many times you like, and if she try to do something then you can just stop her. Either way, doing it right now won't be anything good for both sides.」



The caution of Hajime who seemed to have seen through that Shizuku was shaken seeing her past self overlapping with Fudou, made Shizuku to hang her head down while nodding despondently.



「Don't make that kind of face. I'll also look out so that it won't become something that cannot be undone. That's why, you can think slowly, what kind of words you should say, and what kind of action you should take the next time you meet her. Come one, for now let's go back home for today. Go change your clothes.」



「Yes……」



Perhaps she was feeling regretful that things didn't go well, or perhaps she was worrying of what she should do. Shizuku was totteringly vanishing into the changing room looking somewhat dejected. Hajime saw her off while making a troubled expression. As for the kendo club members, they were writhing a bit seeing the figure of down-hearted Shizuku that normally she would never show to them.



「He, hey Nagumo. You won't stop her? You are her boyfriend right?」



「Tha, that's right. It's absolutely dangerous to go meet that girl or trying to stop her when she comes to attack! That person's state wasn't normal!」



Shizuku's friends were arguing vehemently at Hajime's act that seemed to push the back of Shizuku who was trying to do something about this matter.



Fudou's state at the end was certainly uncommon. Different from when she was pushing for a match, her strange atmosphere just now looked as though a stronger negative emotion was overflowing from her. No matter who one thought about it, she looked like she was going to do something bad to Shizuku.



Normally this would be where one ought to stop from getting involved. No matter how strong Shizuku was, there was no need to allow her to purposefully head toward danger. And if Hajime was her boyfriend, he should not let her lover to get involved with this all the more, was what the girls argued about.



But, Hajime indifferently declared to them who were like that.



「Her meddlesomeness and worrying habit are hardcore one. It cannot be helped right?」



「Cannot be helped you say……isn't that too irresponsible even though you are her boyfriend?」



「It's fine. If that's what Shizuku want to do that is. If she is going to be meddlesome toward other people and she is burdened with trouble because of that, then I'll take care of her and shoulder the burden twice of that, I'll also spoil her while I'm at it. That's my role.」



「……」



The expression of the girls went *munyuu*. It was an expression as though they were forcefully fed with a terribly sweet pastry. As for the boys, their expression was half admiring, and half jealous seeming to say 'Anyway, won't Nagumo just die already' in their own way.



「Putting that aside, there is one little problem though……」



「Eh, wha, what?」



One girl asked back while stuttering a bit for some reason. Hajime scratched on his cheek awkwardly while,



「That Fudou girl, she was running out still in her kendo uniform, or rather she was still wearing all her protectors. What are we going to do with her uniform?」



「Ah……」



When they looked at the entrance, her shoes were also left behind. In this time when the sun had already set, a huge girl wearing full set kendo equipment except the mask protector was running away with tearful face while barefooted……. It felt like a new urban legend would be whispered in the neighborhood.



「As expected Fudou won't come back herself to take back her things. Even if we want to return her things to the kendo club member at her school, it will be a problem if a male like me go there carrying girl uniform.」



「If it's Shizuku it feels like she is going to say that she want to return it herself but……from the talk just now, it will be questionable if we let Shizuku go do that.」



「Yeah. And so, oi, you kohai over there.」



Hajime's gaze locked on to kouhai-chan. Kouhai-chan reflexively jumped on the spot while giving a strange reply 「Yhess!」.



「Tomorrow morning, go deliver the uniform to Fudou's school.」



「Eh? Tomorrow morning……err, I have class normally tomorrow though?」



「Aaa? Then, you can just come here to collect the uniform first thing in the morning, go to her school, and then return here before class start. Ah, you cannot bring the uniform home okay? Just in case, what if that girl comes back here to take her things herself.」



「E, err, senpai. That person's school, is really far from here though……」



「Looks like it. And?」



「E, err, my house is also, quite far from here so, looking from the total distance it will take a lot of time……」



「I see. And?」



「……Uu. At least make it after school, is that no good?」



「Oi oi, what are you going to do if by chance Fudou doesn't have spare uniform? If you deliver it first thing in the morning, in the worst case she can change after arriving in school. But if you deliver it after school……you are a cruel fellow huh.」



「Whi, which mouth is saying thaatt」



Kouhai-chan grinded her teeth *gugigigigigi*. It was a rebellious attitude. Really inexcusable. Added with her usual mischief that was crossing the line, her attitude really wasn't good.



Hajime made a wide grin while stepping forward as though taking advantage of the gap of her consciousness and approached near, dealing an iron claw on kouhai-chan. *creak* An unpleasant sound rang……. (AN: Iron claw = a wrestling move? where you grasp the face of the opponent with one hand hard)



「Ouch-, ouch ouch ouch ouch-. Se, senpai!? My head, my head is splitt――」



「Oi, kouhai. I'm saying that if you clear this mission, I'll forgive all your mischief until now. You get any complaint?」



「Hahih, none at all! I'll work hard and complete the missionnn!」



The pitiful kouhai-chan was released, and then she crumbled down on the floor with her legs glued close to each other, that posture was as though she was a pitiful girl that encountered a violent hoodlum. In front of the kouhai-chan who was whispering「Onee-sama, is this also a trial for me?」, was Hajime-senpai who was standing imposingly without even a shred of guilt while dealing additional blow「If you fail, or if you play hooky……you understand right?」 to the downed opponent.



The gap of this with his act against Shizuku before this that was indulgent in various meanings was terrific.



While the club members were shuddering once more,



「……What are you all doing? Or rather, why is everyone not changing already?」



There, Shizuku who had finished changing clothes arrived with a dubious expression.



「No, there is nothing. ……Right?」



Hajime looked over the kendo club members with a smile.



「「「「Yes! There is nothing at all!」」」」



The hearts of the kendo club members were as one. They couldn't go against Yaegashi Shizuku's boyfriend.



Shizuku seemed to guess what happened somehow and she sent an exasperated gaze at Hajime while also making apologetic expression at the club members at the same time, but before she could say anything, 「Now, we are going home」 her hand was pulled by Hajime and she was taken away.



At the entrance, Shizuku looked back and somehow said only「See you all tomorrow!」 before fading out.



Inside the dojo building that became silent,



「Uu, how dare you do that to a girl's face. Is this grudge, ought to be left uncleared like this-」



There, the grudge of kouhai-chan who didn't learn her lesson echoed.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Shizuku arc will continue for a little bit more.



By the way, the scene where Shizuku returned a yell of fighting spirit, I imagined the awesome scene of Tama-chan of Bamboo Blade for that. Atomi○ Fire Blade……Shirakome was trembling in various senses.





Chapter 260




Author Note: I'll post one more chapter at 19:00.



The last of Shizuku arc.



The next day after the incident with Fudou Akari.



A short time before the morning homeroom started, Shizuku talked about the details of yesterday to Kaori, Yue, and Shia who had arrived.



「He, hee~. So there was something like that……. That must be terrible, Shizuku-chan.」



「Well, it's not that terrible though……. I'm thinking whether I should be able to handle that better. It's just a meaningless what-if though.」



Shizuku's shoulders dropped while saying such thing. Yue and Shia made a bit exasperated face while Kaori smiled wryly to such Shizuku.



Although, even though Kaori was smiling wryly, it seemed her attention was taken by something else, since some time ago her gaze kept glancing at other direction even while she was listening to Shizuku's story.



Yue and Shia didn't look like they were really bothered about it, but even the classmates who had arrived already were paying attention to it with cringing face「Uwaa」 or admiring face「That girl, she is a hero huuh」.



「Ouch ouch ouch ouch-, my head-, my heaaad」



「You're right. Your head is dumb huh.」



「It's painful-, let go you bastardd!」



「Aa? Bastard? Your way of speaking is improper huh, kouhai.」



「Hiih, I'm sorry! I got too cocky-! Don't grin on my foreheaad-, Onee-samaaa! Help meee!!」



A scream echoed inside the classroom.



「And then, I have a friend in Fudou-san's school, so this morning I tried calling her to ask, is she going to school. But, normally she would come early for morning training, but my friend told me that she hasn't come yet……」



「Tha, that's really worrying isn't it, Shizuku-chan. But, I wonder if perhaps it will be better for you to also feel worry about somewhere nearer to you for now?」



「Onee-samaaa! Help meee! Onee-sama!」



「There is also that thing that happened only yesterday, so I plan to wait and see for a while but……. I'm thinking of being the one to go meet her when the time is good.」



「Eeehh? Onee-sama? Onee-sama! Your soul sister is falling into a devil's hand right hereee!」



Shizuku-oneesama didn't turn around. Seeing such attitude from Shizuku and the deed that was being carried out behind Shizuku right now, Kaori couldn't help but let out cold sweat.



The kouhai-chan who was always hanging around Shizuku.



Right now she was receiving iron claw from Hajime first thing in the morning. Her face was being tightly held in an eagle grip while her forehead was nonchalantly getting grinded against with increasing strength, even watching from the side that looked painful.



Kouhai-chan was desperately tapping repeatedly on Hajime's arm while desperately seeking help from her beloved Onee-sama, but she was also casually insulting Hajime while doing that, so each time the grip's strength was increased and she was gradually losing momentum.



「Hey, Shizuku-chan. That girl is desperately calling at Shizuku-chan though……」



Shizuku's beautiful acting as though nothing happened which was unlike her made Kaori to finally ask while she raised her eyebrows with a troubled look.



「Aa~, Hajime? Won't you forgive her soon? I'll also speak with her later about it.」



「Well, fine then.」



Hajime casually tossed away *poi* Kouhai-chan. Kouhai-chan fell on her butt with「Ahih」. 「Uu, that huurtt. My head feels like they are splitting opeenn」 Kouhai-chan's face contorted looking like she was going to cry, but only after a bit she glared at Hajime fiercely.



「That's cruel, Nagumo-senpai! Just what I have done that made me deserved that!?」



「It's because how you were trying to post those blasphemous edited photographs.」



By the way, it was about edited photographs where Hajime was in a dreadful situation in them. In the photographs he was co-starring with macho onii-chan. As expected it was a doing in the level that made even Shizuku plainly snapped seeing the appearance of her lover that crossed the line.



Having a gaze that had crossed being chilly and even looked nihilistic like a black hole directed at her, kouhai-chan trembled with a sudden chill. She was drenched with cold sweat, and inside her heart she whispered「As I thought, have I overdone it I wonder?」.



But, in front of the hateful son of a bitch, the pride of a soul sister wouldn't allow her to apologize or anything.



In the first place,



「Uh, bu, but! This is because Nagumo-senpai's own fault!」



「Aa? Why is that huh?」



Against Hajime in his current mood as an opponent, even though it was only at the level like a puppy yipping *yap yap*, but Kouhai-chan was still taking a defiant attitude against such Hajime. A commotion was running through the classmates.



「Hey, is there anyone who has a fresh status plate? I'm gonna ascertain that girl's vocation.」



「It's obvious already even without doing that.」



「Yeah. One who oppose the demon king is always――a hero.」



Such conversation were done between Atsushi, Akito, and Noboru. The other classmates seemed to also in strong agreement.



Not knowing that all her senpai was looking at her as though they were seeing a hero, or perhaps seeing a rare beast, Kouhai-chan shook her twin tail wildly while pointing sharply with her finger.



「Today, I woke up at five o'clock you know! I came at school at six o'clock without even eating breakfast, and from there it was also terrible!」



「Terrible? What is?」



「The school gate, it wasn't open!」



'Well of course', everyone nodded. As expected, even the teacher who came early for morning training and so on wouldn't come at six o'clock.



「You came too early.」



「But, if I want to participate in kendo club's morning training even just for a bit, I won't make it in time if I don't come at least that early. After all, the other school is really far.」



All the senpai were in admiration, thinking 'she is unexpectedly diligent huuh'.



「And?」



「It couldn't be helped so――I had no choice other than trespassing in.」



All the senpai tilted their head, thinking 'she is diligent, right?'.



「But, our school, it was really a big deal for a period because of all of you senpai's disappearance remember? Because of that the gate and fence were also reconstructed for a bit……」



「Aa. The countermeasure for unlawful intruder. Well, it was made so that it's a bit harder to enter here, only to the degree like the school of the rich I guess.」



「Yes. And so, right from the morning I was copying wall climb sport. It was difficult to climb up the wall. There were few protrusions to use……」



「You must looked completely like a suspicious person.」



A high school girl doing wall climb on the school's wall at six in the morning……. The gazes of all the senpai were once more turning into eyes that were looking at a hero in a different sense.



「But, I accomplished it. I collected that girl's uniform and climbed the wall once more to escape, and then sped away with my bicycle.」



「No, use the train. Just how far do you think the distance is? If I remember correctly, it's about three, four station. Using bicycle to go there is……」



「Round trip cost 440 yen. You bourgeois senpai won't understand the value of that amount.」



「……」



Saving 440 yen by pedaling bicycle. Was it her lunch money for today? The eyes of all the senpai were really gentle. At the same time, there were also accusing stares piercing Hajime. Hajime-san whispered 「Perhaps I should at least pay extra for her expenses……」.



「And then, a hell was waiting for me……」



「Here is Japan isn't it? But for some reason I'm smelling the smell of adventurer from her though……」



「Yes, it was a heart-breaking hill! The school of that girl, the school building is located on top of a hill! Can you believe it! My legs were already like jelly! What's more, there was a bus stop at the hilltop, the people who were arriving for morning training or whatever were overtaking me using bus! In addition, they were staring at me across the window! It was like they were saying 『Eh, what's with that person? Why is a student from another school is desperately pedaling a bicycle until she got drenched with sweat like that? She is a bit out of place though~』! There were even people who pointed at me I told you!」



「……」



Not losing against the hill, not even losing against the curious stares, kouhai-chan climbed to the peak.



By the way, looking at kouhai-chan who finally arrived wobblingly like a ghost while breathing roughly 'zee―haa, zee―haa', a teacher that must be an adviser――a young female teacher welcoming the students at the front gate was screaming.



「I who safely accomplished my mission received a lot of water from a kind female teacher, after resting for a bit I left the school. Haha, that hill road, when coming it's like hell, but the return home it's really heavenly! The exhilaration was amazing! I rode the bicycle down while my hands let go of the steer handle you know! What a thrill!」



「You, are really enjoying life huuh~」



The classmates nodded 「Certainly」 at Hajime's whisper.



By the way, regarding kouhai-chan who was going down the hill road with a fierce speed while happily yelling 「Hyahoo―――」 with both her hands in banzai pose and her twin tails fluttering, currently it was becoming a hot topic at the school over there even now.



It was a terribly dangerous stunt, so good children absolutely must not copy it at home okay?



「After that, I sent a grandma who was tired from walking her puppy and became unable to move back to her home, and in the end I didn't make it in time for the morning practice……」



「Your trouble attraction rate is unbelievable oi」



Lightly ignoring Hajime's words, kouhai-chan suddenly opened her eyes widely in a flash.



「I have accomplished the mission that gave me enormous difficulty the first thing in the morning. And what did Nagumo-senpai say to such me after that!?」



「? Did I say something?」



「Yes, you said it! When senpai saw me drenched in sweat, 『Unebelievable. It was like you are a comedian wearing wig that produced water. Are you gonna participate in R-1 after this?』that was what senpai said! Who did you call a comedian! I'm not training for that just so you know! That was the result of my hard work you know! Praise me properly, you bastard!」 (TN: R-1 seems to be a comedy show in Japan. Anyone know more detail about it?)



All the senpai thought. That was a splendid tsukkomi. If she could find an excellent partner that took the role of the funny man, wouldn't she be able to participate in even M-1? Such thought ran through their mind.



By the way, right after kouhai-chan got her sweaty state pointed out at her, she rushed toward the dojo building with a fierce speed and properly put her appearance in order using the necessities for female club member that were constantly prepared in there. After that, she went to take the aforementioned edited picture from 『Soul sister's secret armory』, and when she tried to paste the photo on the door of Hajime's classroom she got the first iron claw of the morning.



「Now, praise me. While you are at it, apologize. Say 『You have worked hard. It's really inexcusable for me to bully such capable kouhai. As my apology I'll part from Shizuku right now. I won't come near her anymore from here on until the doomsday』. Now, quickly! Quickly say――ah, stop-. Pelase stop senpai! Don't tie my hair into a reef knottt! Onee-sama, save meee!!」



Hajime-senpai's technique shined bright. Kouhai-chan's twin tail was tied into a reef knot in the blink of eye, furthermore the tips were formed into heart shape. The hairstyle was then thoroughly fixed in place with rainbow colored wire with great detail.



The gazes of all the senpai who were looking at kouhai-chan struggling and squirming with teary eyes were lukewarm. Their gazes looked as though they were watching a frolicking small animal while they were saying 「She isn't learning huuh」 or 「She still haven't get enough huuh」. Kouhai-chan's petite body build also spurred that image further.



Shizuku smiled wryly while standing up to save kouhai-chan. The bell rang in a good timing.



「Come on, the bell has also rang, let her go already with that much.」



「Can't be helped.」



Kouhai-chan crumbled down on the ground with legs gluing close on each other as though she had just gotten assaulted by a hoodlum. Shizuku replaced Hajime and expressed her thanks to kouhai-chan regarding the matter of returning the uniform (Shizuku knew that kouhai-chan was ordered by Hajime to do that only this morning).



Kouhai-chan who were gifted with the words of thanks from the onee-sama that she loved and respected instantly made a loose expression that couldn't be showed in front of other people.



And then, after she stood up while trying to hug onee-sama which was casually dodged by Shizuku, she glared hatefully at Hajime.



「You better remember this!」



She said such thuggish line and ran away. The heart styled hair was bobbing up and down above her head. Was she planning to enter her own classroom while still like that? She was a kouhai whose soul of adventure was overflowing everyday nonchalantly.



「That photo is really too much but……so far as it goes she was doing it at the door of our classroom where no one other than the people of our class would see it, so forgive her already okay?」



Hajime shrugged at Shizuku's words.



Seeing such Hajime, Yue let out 「Nn~」 from her mouth while tilting her head.



「……Hajime. Actually, you are really pleased with that child?」



Those words toward the husband that came from someone who was acknowledged by everyone as the legal wife were basically recognized as correct by everyone in that place. If Yue saw it like that, then the possibility that it was actually like that was extremely high.



Not just Shizuku and others, but all the classmates also looked at Hajime feeling 「Eh?」. Hajime smiled wryly from getting seen through while he lifted both his hands in giving up posture.



「Well yeah. Somehow seeing her feels nostalgic.」



「Nostalgic? By any chance, did you know her from before?」



Shizuku asked. Hajime shook his head and denied it before his gaze moved toward Shia. Shia tilted her head because Hajime suddenly looked at her for some reason.



「That's not it, perhaps I shoud say it's that girl's regrettableness, or how she won't get discouraged, somehow those sides of her resembled Shia when I first met her.」



「……Heh? Resembled, me?」



It seemed everyone didn't get what Hajime meant, but only Yue nodded 「Aa~」 in understanding.



「Yeah. The you when we first met could only be called as a regrettable rabbit. What you did and your attitude, rather it was your very existence itself that was regrettable. If there is a race of regrettable rabbit, then you will get a perfect score of 100 without any objection.」



「Hajime-san, are you picking a fight with me?」



Right now anyone could see the vision of her rabbit ears that were invisible because of the artifact hairband she wore going *usaa-!!* in indignation. (TN: Usa => Usagi => Rabbit)



「Your face was terrible with snot and tear and drool, your important place was in plain sight, even though you were the one asking for help but you were strangely impudent, your forcible attitude……」



「Nuh, guu, I, I cannot deny that desuu……」



「Even when I elbowed you, kicked you, electrified you, sent you flying, but you absolutely wouldn't let go even while weeping.」



「When I recalled it now, Hajime-san was really a brute that time! Or rather, even when I asked for help when I almost became a monster's meal, you tried to desert me so nonchalantly!」



The classmates who had never heard of the story how Hajime met Shia made a shuddering expression at Hajime's deed at that time. They couldn't even imagine it looking at his current attitude toward Shia.



「But still, I think Yue also felt it but……you were that kind of regrettable rabbit, but even so you didn't get discouraged, looking at you energetically hopping around running over there, hopping around running that way, just watching you like that was really fun, that even us felt like we were also energized.」



「……Nn. Just looking at Shia was somewhat fun.」



「Aa, u……is, is that so……」



Shia shyly played around with her rabbit ears that must be there. Even while looking at such Shia with a gentle gaze, Hajime also wafted off an atmosphere that felt vaguely lonely.



「You who needed to get looked after when something happened, is now in the remonstrating side instead right? Like when Yue and Kaori quarreled, or when Myuu was going to do something reckless, or when I wasn't reading the mood.」



By the way, what Hajime meant by not reading the mood referred to the time when he was flirting with the wive~s (mainly Yue) without even caring of other people's eyes.



「……Nn. Shia is a firm person. Her housework is also almighty.」



「That's why, seeing that girl who even though is regrettable like that, yet still charging ahead without getting discouraged, it's like I'm facing Shia in the past, it's a bit nostalgic.」



「I see now. When we met Shia, it was when she was already transformed into the bugged rabbit.」



Shizuku and the classmates also nodded 「I see」 in comprehension. And then, thinking that they also wanted to try witnessing the "regrettable rabbit Shia", but seeing how such thing couldn't be witnessed anymore, many of them whispered 「how regrettable」.



Hajime also looked at Shia once more, and then he whispered 「how regrettable」 while narrowing his eyes fondly.



Yue looked at Shia with nostalgia, and she whispered 「……regrettable」. Kaori and Shizuku too, they were thinking of the no good Shia and imagined that such thing might be cute in its own way, but seeing that they wouldn't be able to see it already, they whispered 「That's regrettable」「It's regrettable」.



「E, excuse me, I think that perhaps all of you are saying that in a good meaning, but still, getting called regrettable, regrettable on and on so many times, it's a bit……」



「「「「How regrettable」」」」



「Stooop! Please stop looking at someone's face while calling that person regrettable earnestly like that desuu!! Auuu, my past self is resurrecting desuu~」



The rabbit who was still called as regrettable whether she was actually regrettable or not was trembling all over while falling down powerlessly face down on her own table.



Hajime and others were staring at such Shia with a lukewarm gaze.



Sunday.



Kaori was walking alone through a residential area toward the station in that day off. The time was just past noon. Her appearance was casual, but seeing her it was clear that she put her appearance in order while being properly conscious of her outing.



(Hm~m, I wonder if the time is fine? Nevertheless, it was shocking that that person is coming here. It seemed that person came when Yue opened the gate but……she said that it's a secret from Hajime.)



Kaori glanced at her arm watch while talking about such thing to herself. Today she had a plan to meet with a person who came from the other world secretly from Hajime. It appeared she was going to talk with that person a bit while also having tea but……



The point where it was a secret from Hajime gave off a really bad vibe. Although, it was just as Yue said, in this world there were things that weren't ought to be known.



Kaori fastened her pace while making a really complicated expression――it was at that time,



「……Who is it? Do you have any business with me?」



Kaori stopped still and said such thing toward the street where there should be no one else other than her.



After a while, there was only dead silence filling the street, but before long, from the gap between the fences of two houses behind Kaori, a person came out while making rustling sound from the clothes that rubbed the wall of the cramped space.



SSSHHH, HOHHHHH



「……」



A strange breathing sound resounded in the street.



Kaori who turned around was speechless. She was speechless, however, inside her heart she was greatly shaken.



The reason was,



(Da, ○rth Vader is here-!?)



Yes, what came out from between the houses, was someone wearing pitch black clothes, pitch black mantel, and then wearing a unique full faced gas mask, Lord ○ader! Even now he was breathing 'SSSHHH, HOHHHHH'!



If this was just a mere deviant, Kaori surely wouldn't be this shaken. She would finish it by normally defeating the other party. But, the opponent here was Lord V○der. She didn't understand how she should react!



As expected, should she praise 'what a lovely collection you have there!' like that here?



Even while Kaori was shaken and thinking of such thing,



「……If you're going to hate someone, then hate Yaegashi Shizuku for this.」



「Eh?」



Lord Va○er took out a shinai from his mantel. Seeing that what came out wasn't a light s○ber, Kaori went 'hah' and returned to her senses, however, her attention was diverted when she heard the name of her best friend spoken out.



Taking advantage of that opening, Lord V○der unleashed his shinai saber in a horizontal slash. The attack didn't aim at the head, but aiming at the shoulder blade. From that it seemed the attacker still had some rationality left, but even so there was no doubt that this was still a dangerous deed the attacker was doing.



If a delicate girl like Kaori got hit with that, it was possible her bone would break, even if that wasn't the case there was enough possibility she would get sent flying and got knocked somewhere on her body.



Well, that was if Kaori was just a delicate girl though.



「Eih」



「Eh?」



What was instantly taken out along with that cute voice, was a cleaving attack from a special security baton that stretched out from the centrifugal force when it was taken out.



Against that cleaving attack that was swung down like a guillotine, the horizontal slash of Lord ○ader was knocked down――not, far from that the shinai saber was snapped into two in the middle.



Lord Va○er was dumbfounded. A lovely voice 「Ei!」 came toward such him once more.



What entered his field of vision, was slender fingers that were clenched tightly, it was a fist that could even be called small. Although, the power was so heavy to the degree it felt like a gorilla was behind that punch.



「Buhee!?」



The Vad○r mask was smashed apart, and the person behind the mask was blown away. The person inside the ○ader rolled around on the ground before they fainted spread-eagled.



「Eh? This person, could she be……」



Kaori whispered that while she moved to restrain the person for the time being, and then she took out her mobile phone after making a thinking gesture for a bit.



And then, she began to contact her best friend.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Why am I writing kouhai-chan that much, that's because as the result of my self-analysis while writing, I felt nostalgic about the regrettable rabbit just like I wrote in this chapter.



The regrettable rabbit is no more……how regrettable.





Chapter 261




AN: This is the posting of the second chapter for today.



The previous chapter had been posted, so for those who still hasn't read it, please visit there.



「Kaori!」



「Ah, Shizuku-chan.」



Shizuku rushed with a worried look into a small park a slight distance away from the residential area from before. It seemed that Hajime was also nearby, because he arrived together with Shizuku.



「So she ended up causing a scene. What's more, she did it by taking a really nasty method.」



Hajime said such thing with a cold voice when he saw the person sitting down beside Kaori. The voice without a shred of warmth in it and the straightforward words caused the person's big body to twitch.



Shizuku thanked Kaori once more for contacting her and then she moved her gaze toward that person――Fudou Akari.



「……Fudou-san.」



「……」



Fudou didn't react and kept looking down. Her expression and eyes were dark. Not even the slightest bit of dominating aura could be felt from her large body. And above all else……the track of nosebleed Kaori-san's face punch was terrible. The smashed mask put beside her indicated the gruesomeness of that punch.



「……Just quickly call the police or whatever.」



After some time of silence, Fudou whispered those words with faint volume. Self-abandonment could be felt from that voice. There were also resignation and weariness mixed in it. It was as though she was a tired old woman despite her youth.



Indeed, although it was only an attempt but what Fudou did was still a criminal act. She was completely a suspicious person. After all, she was Lord Vad○r in the middle of day. She had no way to make any excuse.



But, Shizuku really hesitated when Fudou mentioned about calling police.



As though sensing that hesitation of Shizuku, Kaori opened her mouth with an expression that looked worried for both Fudou and Shizuku.



「You see, Shizuku-chan. From the start it didn't look like Fudou-san planned to actually hit me you know?」



「Kaori?」



「-……」



Fudou looked at Kaori with a taken aback expression, and Shizuku also faced Kaori with a questioning look that wondered what she meant.



「The shinai sabe――cough-. The shinai you see, it suddenly lost momentum just before it was going to hit. Perhaps, she might be intending to stop just barely before it hit. Even in the case that it hit me, I think it would only hurt me somewhat without any injury. She was also aiming at the shoulder just in case.」



Shizuku understood that Fudou still hadn't lost her rationality after hearing Kaori's words and let out a sight of relieve. On the other hand, Fudou was looking at Kaori with a shocked expression for some reason, but right after that, she made a ridiculed face as though exposing her whole sense of inferiority.



While that happened, Hajime was directing an admiring gaze toward Kaori.



「Even while understanding that it won't be a problem, you snapped the opponent's shinai, and in the end you even smashed her face……. Kaori-san, that's lovely yes.」



「Tha, that couldn't be helped! Because, it was Lord Vade○ right in the middle of town! Anyone would be shaken just like me! There was even the sound 'SSSHHH, HOHHHH'!」



「I think that sound is unreated though……」



Kaori was speaking her justification with bright red face. In respond Hajime was looking at her with a gentle and understanding expression while glancing at the pulverized mask and Fudou's face that was dyed with nosebleed, and then he snapped a thumb up at her.



Kaori-san rushed forward. She let out her protesting punches *poka poka* at Hajime.



Seeing such Kaori at the corner of her sight, Fudou raised a low laughing voice that was unmistakably self-deprecating this time.



「Fudou-san?」



「Just laugh at me, Yaegashi. My sword is completely seen through by a normal girl who doesn't even do kendo. Hahahah, I'm really laughable. Anything and everything I did is just pointless. In the end, the kid who have it will go above the kid who is have-not even without doing anything.」



Actually Shizuku really wanted to make denial at the part when Fudou said normal girl. Depending on the situation, Kaori was stronger than Shizuku. After all, her specs were that of a god's apostle. It was fine to even call it a foul play.



After laughing for a while, Fudou looked exhausted as though her soul had slipped out from her body, then she said one more time 「Just call the police already」. It was clear even without any words. She was broken right now. She had given up her own life as worthless.



Seeing such Fudou, Shizuku closed her eyes once and then whispered with a faint voice.



「――You are a woman?」



「-」



Fudou twitched and trembled. She thought that Shizuku was making fun of her. She thought that this was the payback for her trying to hurt Shizuku's friend.



But, Shizuku's next words caused her heart that should have been closed to unconsciously react.



「You see, at the past when I was in elementary school, I was once told that.」



「……Yaegashi was?」



It couldn't be helped that her gaze turned unconsciously suspicious. There was no way Yaegashi Shizuku who was praised as a beautiful girl by everyone would be gotten told that.



Shizuku made a wry smile and she then talked about her appearance when she was a child and the series of events related to that.



Fudou snorted at that.



「What? Do you want to say that by working hard you can become beautiful like now? That's only the talk if the person has a good base from the beginning. That kind of talk――」



「That's not what I meant. I'm not talking about look. I'm talking about whether you like yourself or not.」



「Liking, myself?」



Fudou's gaze turned even more suspicious from not getting what Shizuku was talking about, to which Shizuku nodded silently.



「I, hated myself. I wasn't aware of it myself, but I stifled myself, ran around busily for other people's sake, took only the role of protecting others……. Even though I actually didn't want to do something like kenjutsu, even though I want to be more girly, I want to lament and complaint, get protected like a princess…….. Even though it would be great if I could be like that, but everything was the polar opposite of that.」



「……」



The self she wanted to become, her ideal self, they all were the polar opposite of her current self――those words caused Fudou's eyes to widen slightly. It was as though she was hearing about herself.



「Even my current self is fine, there is nothing wrong with it, that was how I persuaded myself and pretended that I was accepting it, but one day, the day when I needed to pay the price from continuing to deceive and hate myself came.」



「Price?」



「I almost died.」



Fudou gulped. She wanted to laugh Shizuku down from saying such absurd thing, but Shizuku's expression and voice didn't even have the slightest bit of humorous atmosphere in them.



「Really, I was beaten up so laughably pathetically. My whole body was chopped up, I was also humiliated with words, if he was late in coming to save me just by a hairbreadth, a blade would have already sticking into my head at that time.」



「No no no no no, just what the heck with that kind of situation huh!」



Shizuku let out a dry chuckle when she recalled that time, while Fudou spontaneously acted the straight-man. As expected, it was a situation that was unimaginable to happen to modern person of this ear. Fudou thought that it was a lie, but it was just too out there for a nonsense talk, and above all her instinct screamed at her that it wasn't a lie.



「When I was at elementary school, I was saved by Kaori. During the time I disappeared, it was Hajime who saved me. Other than them, I was also always getting saved by someone. ……Fudou-san. You said that I'm someone like me is in the category of the have, but if I really have everything, then I wonder why is it that I'm always saved in the crucial time.」



「……Yaegashi.」



The perfect and dignified girl who was recognized by everyone. Shizuku who Fudou thought as such person was now making an expression that looked pitiful from the bottom of her heart. Fudou's expression turned into disbelief.



「It's the fact that everyone has difference due to things like their birth and upbringing. But, surely it depends on themselves whether they can make use of it or not. I who Fudou-san said to be someone in the have, was really no good that I almost died. I finally could affirm that after really almost dying and then getting saved again.」



Shizuku cut off her words for a moment there, and then she turned a nostalgic gaze at Fudou who was staring at her in astonishment.



「The national meet when I was just entered middle school. I faced a first year like me. An athlete that unusually fought with upper stance. Her skill was obvious even when that was the first time I faced her. Even though her first move looked slow, when I noticed "the invisible face strike" was already swung down.」 (TN: Upper stance = a stance where the athlete held the shinai with both hands above their head.)



「Yaegashi, you, remember……」



Shizuku got a faraway look in her remembrance of that time, however she then shook her head.



「I don't remember most of what happened in that match. My head became blank when I received the first face strike, I was simply losing myself in my thought. When, how did I get hit, how would I block it, how would I see through it! Those were all I could think. Your sword was really really scary……」



For Fudou, the first time she fought Shizuku, she could only see it as though Shizuku was perfectly handling her technique. It was a bolt from the blue for her to hear that unexpectedly, Shizuku at that time was fearing her.



「When the match was over, after I comprehended that I somehow won, when I looked back I couldn't recall anything……. However, after my excitement passed, the strongest impression that remained inside me was only――what a beautiful sword that was.」



「Beau, tiful?」



Shizuku nodded. Her gaze returned toward Fudou. It was difficult to describe the emotion that peeked out from deep inside her eyes. It was like envy, or respect, or perhaps fear, it was an emotion with such a mysterious color.



「It wasn't a cheap trick. An attack of certain defeat that doesn't need the second attack. Simply, swinging down the lifted up sword straightforwardly. It was direct, and resolute to the utmost. There were earnestness, sincerity, and resolve riding in it, it was a beautiful sword.」



Shizuku had never even dreamed that there was a girl the same age like her who could swing such sword.



Because Shizuku had done kenjutsu since she was little, the skill she had piled up led her to victory in the match, but Shizuku wasn't able to be happy at all with her victory. She won the match, but lost the fight. That was how she felt.



「After that, I became conscious of your figure each time I participated in the national meet. At our second match, as expected your sword was beautiful, but that time I fought without getting swallowed, executed the technique I trained to face you, and I was able to win……I couldn't do it in the match venue, so I secretly sneaked out ahead and made a guts pose outside.」



「Such, thing……」



There was no conceit in those words. The athlete who was her objective was training hard the same like her in order to win. And she felt genuinely happy from being able to win against her.



Fudou's sight became blurry after knowing that fact.



Shizuku picked up the snapped shinai of Fudou and she suddenly took a stance with in on her waist. It wasn't a stance for kendo match, but a stance of sword drawing art. At the same time, a heavy aura burst out from her body. Fudou's body froze spontaneously. The cause was because that aura was of killing intent. Even though a kendoka and a swordsman both wielded sword, but there was a decisive difference between the two sides.



Shizuku suddenly relaxed her stance and talked with a wry smile.



「I'll leave it to you whether you will believe it or not, but I, during the time of my disappearance, had cut living things.」



「Eh? Cut?」



「Yes. I cut down a living thing with real sword. Even now I remembered it. The sensation of cutting flesh, the smell of spurting blood. Doing that was necessary to survive, so I don't regret it. But, I'm already unable to continue kendo. Whether in strength or the meaning of wielding sword, even though I'm a swordsman, but I'm not a kendoka.」



「Not a kendoka, but swordsman……」



She had heard the rumor about Shizuku and her classmates. It was a story that was so hard to believe so suddenly. It would be strange to believe the story of a war in another world.



But……



The gaze of Shizuku that was staring at her, in the end was it something dishonest that could be washed away by "common sense"? Fudou didn't think so.



「I won't return back to being a kendoka anymore but……I want to keep watching it. That beautiful sword of yours. Perhaps this sound like sarcasm to you, but I think that you who swung that sword was also really beautiful.」



「……is that so.」



Fudou looked back at Shizuku, and then she looked down.



She clenched her fist tightly as though enduring something, and her body was a bit shaking. Tears were falling drop by drop on top of that fist.



It was unclear how much time passed.



Before long Fudou lifted up her face. Her expression was a refreshed one that looked as though something that haunted her had vanished away somewhere.



Fudou sat with seiza posture on that spot, and then her gaze met Shizuku and then Kaori straightforwardly. And then, she lowered her head hard and pressed her forehead on the ground.



「I had done something dreadful and caused trouble for all of you, I'm sorry. I'm really, sorry」



The words of apology of Fudou resounded inside the small park.



Shizuku's gaze moved toward Kaori. Kaori immediately guessed Shizuku's question to her whether it was okay to forgive Fudou, and she smiled while nodding.



Hajime moved his leg up and down. He was meaning to urge Shizuku to step on Fudou's head to make her repented deeply. Shizuku immediately guessed his meaning and she smiled while ignoring him.



「Promise me, Fudou-san. Continue with your kendo. Polish your sword, without getting influenced by someone like me.」



「Yaegashi……. Yes, I promise. ……It will take time until I can like myself. I also cannot declare that my unjustified resentment will absolutely vanish. But, I won't discard what I have piled up until now, that's the only thing that I won't do. I will work hard, so someday I can like myself.」



Seeing the clear eyes on the face that Fudou lifted up, Shizuku smiled and nodded happily.



Fudou also smiled seeing that expression. Even though her look was severe just like Fudou Myouou, her refreshed smiling expression looked somehow charming.



Surely, in a future that wouldn't be so far away, she would be able to grow to like herself for sure. That smile caused Shizuku to be convinced of that.



Fudou grasped the hand that Shizuku presented and she stood up. Kaori tried to wipe up Fudou's blood with her handkerchief, but Fudou hurriedly backed away. Kaori was unmindful of that and insisted, making the atmosphere to turn harmonious.



'Well, the case is closed with this', Hajime thought so leisurely. It was at that time,



「Uu~, what a nice story this iiis! Truly the springtime of youth! Onee-san is really moved!」



That deep but strangely charming voice suddenly resounded.



Hajime's spine instantly got goosebumps. His instinct rang the warning alarm loudly!



「Ah, Chrystabel-san! I'm sorry, even though we have an appointment.」



「Don't worry about it Kaori-chan. You had already contacted me beforehand after all, Onee-san doesn't mind at all yahn♡」



He couldn't understand the reality. Why was the monster haunting that clothes shop in Brook was here? Why was that guy talking to Kaori so naturally like that? Why was that guy wearing frilly one piece made in earth!?



The impact felt was as though a monster inside a picture book was encroaching into reality.



No, rather that was, an indescribable, blasphemous――



「Hajime-kyu~~n? I wonder if right now, you are thinking about something impoliteee?」



「–!?」



'Be cool, be cool, me.' Hajime desperately told himself.



「Why, are you here? How did you creep out from that world?」



「Nnmaa, how rude! It was like I am something that always crept out smilingly!」



The sudden invasion of monster――not, the appearance of the manager of clothes shop, Chrystabel, it caused Kaori to ignore Fudou who was flustered for the time being and she explained the situation with a wry smile.



It seemed Chrystabel was interested with the clothing and accessory of earth and he (TN: Or she? What should I use here?) consulted Liliana whether she could possibly learn about clothing and accessory in this side.



Liliana also took into account about the promotion of Tortus's culture and gave her okay sign, however, thinking whether Hajime who really disliked Chrystabel would easily let him passed through the gate, in the end Liliana then consulted Yue first.



Yue had close relationship not with just Chrystabel, but rather with the manly women group too. But although she readily agreed to invite Chrystabel to earth, but she didn't wish to give Hajime any worry.



There, when Hajime was busy and Yue took his place to periodically open the gate, she secretly called Chrystabel. After that Chrystabel's livelihood in earth was secured mainly by Remia who from the beginning had work related with clothing and accessory, and recently she even created an office for that in earth, and now Chrystabel was working hard in his study.



The first thing that Hajime who heard the circumstance did was――



「Okay, die」



Performing quick draw with Donner.



「Munh」



Shop manager Chrystabel repelled away the bullet with his chest!



By the way, the loaded bullet was a rubber bullet.



「How fervent nn♡ I'm feeling Hajime-kyun's love yahn!」



「Stop it! Don't look at me with those eyes! Or rather, weren't you taught that when someone is talking you should look at their eyes! You bastard, your gaze is shifting below each time you are looking at me!」



The gun fired continuously! The fired out bullets was repelled by the arms that shop manager Chrystabel crossed in front of his body. The gaze of the shop manager that peeked out from the arms' gap was locked on at Hajime's lower body!



Hajime's SAN point was shaved down!



「I don't understand what are you talking about hereee――fumu, that's a nice tight……」



「SHAORAAAAAH!!」



Hajime-san's flying kick burst! The ground under shop manager Chrystabel who received that kick scattered around in radial shape from the impact.



「Ca, calm down, Hajime-kun! This is in the middle of residential area! A lot of families are right nearby! Aah, don't fire your gun! Tha, that's right, I have to lay out the barrier!」



Kaori was laying out the barrier for sound isolation and recognition obstruction in flusters while charging into the battle in the attempt to stop Hajime who lightly lost his senses from feeling the danger toward his ass.



「He, hey, Yae, Yaegashiii? Your boyfriend is holding gu――」



「That's just a toy.」



「Eh, but, it's making loud firing――」



「Just a toy.」



「The concrete is split――」



「Just a toy.」



「……」



The thing Shizuku's boyfriend was holding was a toy gun. The final answer.



Though incidentally, the ground was smashed from his step and it also looked like he was stepping on the air and leaping around.



「It's just magic trick and acrobatic there. My boyfriend, he want to be magician in a circus at the future.」



No matter what there was a limit in forcing that logic. Akari-chan thought so, but the face of Shizuku who was smiling while staring still at her with her forced explanation looked scary somehow, so she just nodded.



Surely, that was the correct choice.



Even if for example, that boyfriend-san was suppressed by Shizuku's friend using extendable baton in two swords style while moving in a speed where her figure vanished. That too surely must be magic trick and acrobat. Surely.



When Kaori who hugged Hajime tightly and covered him from the sticky gaze of shop manager Chrystabel said 「If you don't quit with it, I will get angry here」, as expected even shop manager Chrystabel also gave up on Hajime and turned around.



Hajime gasped with a weird voice 「Ubooa」 from his mouth due to insufficient sanity point while Kaori was embracing him with a face that didn't look that dissatisfied as one would have others believe with her hands patting Hajime to calm him down. Shop manager Chrystabel glanced at that from the corner of his eyes while walking toward Akari-chan who was being dumbfounded.



Extremely thick eyebrows, arms, chest, torso, legs. Every part of his body was huge added with his thi~~ck face. No matter how one looked at him, he was a man of giga muscle lump, but his body was clad in frilly one piece clothes. His braided hair was fixed with a pink ribbon!



The shop manager who like usual was fiendish in various senses was pouring his gaze at Akari-chan.



A beat. Shop manager Chrystabel nodded as though he had comprehended something and his sparkling eyes turned at Akari-chan.



「You, it's fine for you to temper the beauty of your sword, but tempering your female beauty is also fine isn't it?」



「Eh? Err?」



Akari-chan was bewildered!



「Seeking beauty is something natural for human yahn. If it's Onee-san here, I will be able to make you shine even more!!」



Arms and legs that looked like log. Thick chest. Muscles that were obvious even through the clothes……. But with frilly one piece and ribbon.



Just what in the world this person was saying? Fudou-san was even more confused.



But, shop manager Chrystabel didn't stop. From his wriggling movement that looked like tentacle……



「Yes!」



Fro~om~hi~is Front Double Biceps!~



「Just!」



Fro~om~hi~is Most Muscular!~



「Like me here!」



Side Chest-!!



Shop manager Chrystabel was shining radiantly!



「Ah, no, I'm good.」



Akari-chan quickly prepared to go home. She politely said「Once more, I'm really sorry for all the trouble」 to Shizuku and walked away to exit the park. Her shoulder was gripped strongly.



「It's fine, don't be scared yahn.」



「No, you are scary.」



「It's fine pyon☆ Leave everything to Onee-san! This Onee-san's name is Chrystabel! The ally of every manly woman and maiden!」



「Ah, no, really, I'm already fine even if I stay like this so――wait, ah, don't shoulder me! What's with this person-, this dreadful strength!? Where are we going!? Helppp! Someoneee, Yaegashiii! Helpppp!!」



「Kaori-chaaan! Shizuku-chaaan! Please take care of the rest okaayy! Also Hajime-chaaan! Let's meet again laterrr!」



When they came back to their senses, both Akari-chan and shop manager Chrystabel were nowhere in sight.



A week later at Sunday.



A contact came from Chrystabel who had been out of contact until now. He said that he would return Fudou Akari who he kidnapped.



「So, she is alive……」 Hajime who was tense in this one week whispered so with an expression that was showing respect to Akari-chan's survival ability. Shizuku and Kaori glanced at such Hajime with their hands dragging him along because he was throwing tantrum 「I don't wanna go」 because he was also a concerned party while heading toward that small park.



By the way, Shizuku and Kaori dealt with Akari-chan's house and school. Their dealing method was by forceful suggestion using the demon king quality product artifact. The figure of Shizuku and Kaori nodding to each other with a desolate smile while saying 「We are completely infected huh」 might or might not happened.



And so they arrived at the public park like that. There wasn't any sign of people. Other than Hajime who was strangely nervous, there were only Shizuku and Kaori there.



「Fudou-san, is she fine I wonder.」



「Well, honestly I have something to say with how he was suddenly taking Fudou-san away that even caused her to be absent from school but……this is Chrystabel-san we are talking about, so I think it won't be anything bad.」



「I, guess. Chrystabel-san can be forceful sometimes but, he is a person with a good will.」



「Even though his gaze went toward my lower body each time we met?」



Hajime's words were treated like nothing. Hajime silently looked up to the sky. Who ever thought that the sky was this blue.



After ten minutes from the appointment time, the appearance of that huge body appeared. It was shop manager Chrystabel. As always he was really frilly. And then his arms and legs were all lethal weapon.



There was no one beside him. It seemed he was alone.



「My? Have I made you all wait I wonder?」



「No, we also came only just now……rather than that, Chrystabel-san. What about Fudou-san?」



Shizuku asked representing all of them.



「My my, don't be that impatient. Her remodel――cough-, beautifying was going really well yahn♡ It's the result of her heart's reformation! It's just as I thought, whether woman or man, if they work hard to become a figure that they thought to be beautiful, then it will come trueee! I too is feeling honored that I can be of help with that yahn!」



'Just now, did she say remodeling?' Before anyone could cut in even while thinking so, shop manager Chrystabel circled his hand at behind him. And then, he pulled out someone. It seemed that Fudou was only hiding behind the large body of shop manager Chrystabel.



Like that, the person that came out was――



「「「Who?」」」



「Uu, long time no see, although it might not be that long that I can say that. It looks like I have troubled all of you, like taking care of my family, or my school……that, thank you.」



Tall body, and extraordinary body style. Hair in princess cut that reached until the waist. A color of bashfulness could be seen vaguely on the person's well-featured face.



Really, just how was this? No, actually they already knew who. However, they simply didn't want to recognize the reality. Of this abnormal situation, this bizarre phenomenon!



The girl with hair in princess cut thrust the reality before the stiffened Shizuku and others!



「Err, I am, Fudou Akari you know?」



It seemed that was how it was.



Just what in the world happened that the girl who even resembled the Fudou Myouou could become a yamato nadeshiko like this……



Anyway, putting aside the dumbfounded Shizuku and Kaori, Hajime was――



「As I thought, you bastard cannot be let to live!」



Gun fire.



「Muhn」



Shop manager Chrystabel repelled everything with his chest!



「What the hell is that!? That ain't a problem of beautifying or anything anymore! Ain't her bone structure changed there! Just what in the world did you damned do! Metamorphosis magic!? Is that metamorphosis magic!?」



「That's a trade secret pyon♡ If you dee~epened your relationship with me, then I'll-teach-you♡」



Shop manager Chrystabel's full power wink and kissy gesture were thrown!



A blood vein snapped to the surface of Hajime's forehead. With a twirl the gun spin reload was carried on.



「I'm convinced right now. You cannot be left to do as you pleased in this world. If you are left as it is, this world will get infested with the bunches that received your demonic remodeling. This world, my birthplace, will be encroached!」



「My, speaking as though I am like a black bug in the kitchen! That's rudeee. And? What will Hajime-kyun do I wonder?」



「That's obvious.」



Hajime pressed Donner's barrel on his forehead and yelled his oath.



「I'll defeat you bastard-. Today, right here!」



「Fufu, fuhahahahah! Just try it if you can! My manly woman soul, is undying!」



The demon king-sama spoke something that sounded like what hero-sama would do, and then he charged toward the shop manager-san of clothing shop.



The result of the battle was……as could be easily guessed, Hajime received lap pillow from Shizuku in order to recover his scraped off SAN point. Anyway, Shizuku who was gently brushing Hajime who was making noise in his nightmare looked really happy.



By the way, about Fudou Akari-chan though, after that she made a name for herself in kendo world as a beautiful kendoka. Regarding the reaction of the surrounding about her transformation, so that the shop manager of the clothing store wouldn't be demanded for by anyone who became interested with the before-after of the girl, Hajime might or might not ran around to follow up with that……



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Overcoming complex by mental growth, I planned for such a story, but when I realized it had became a story with solution of fantasy and physically remodeling the body.



The plot of Shirakome is always not breathing……



By the way, I also put this in the activity report but, the comic version of Arifureta is updated.



No matter from where you look, you will be wanting to enjoy the cute Yue without fail, if it's fine with you please try to go take a look at Overlap-sama's homepage(Comic Gardo).



Please treat me well.





Chapter 262




*KUEEEEEE*, a high pitched shriek resounded.



Right after that, a squall that struck down from the sky rolled up cloud of dust and blocked the field of vision. Small pebbles of sand attacked the eyeball which would force anyone to narrow their eyes while covering their face with their arm.



As though waiting for that opening, rain poured down by mixing in among the squall.



However, it wasn't a rain of water. It was a rain that was made from stone needles. The stone needles with total length of around 15 centimeter approached the ground looking really like a heavy rain.



――Coatrice's stone needle



It was the characteristic magic that was fired by a huge black eagle monster, Coatrice. If someone got hit even by a single needle, they would be petrified in the blink of eye. And such needle was fired in a wide area by several hundred needles simultaneously, while the target's sight was blocked by the squall and cloud of dust.



「――"Wind Wall"」



A magic trigger with the chanting abbreviated was whispered with a small voice. Wind that whirled with the caster as the center blew away the cloud of dust.



What appeared was a young man. He had silky brown hair and well-featured face. His body was lean and tight despite being slender and tall. Wearing simple protectors that only protected his body's vital spots, his hands were holding a western sword that was shining faintly in a low stance.



That young man――Amanogawa Kouki didn't even look nervous facing the squall of stone needles, he calmly lifted the holy sword above his head and began rotating the sword fast with only the motion of his wrist.



The holy sword that was starting to rotate like a pinwheel in an instant looked like a round shield in addition with the radiance it was clad with.



Right after that, stone needles showered down on the round shield of holy sword. But, it seemed the stone needles couldn't slip through that shield because of its great momentum, the stone needles were easily repelled and scattered to the surrounding, piercing the ground around.



*KUEEEEE*, a shriek that was unpleasant to the ear resounded once more. It seemed the monster lost its temper from witnessing its characteristic magic gotten scattered.



The coatrice folded its wings that produced squall physically, and then its huge body rapidly swooped down.



「tsk――"Light Explosion"!」



Light exploded. Flash gushed out from the holy sword round shield like an explosion, and the shockwave blew away the remaining stone needles.



The stone needles stabbed the surrounding like thorns. If he moved recklessly to dodge the coatrice, he might get hit with petrification from below. Kouki picked this forceful option because of that.



Using "Ground Shrinker" skill, Kouki leaped out to the air in one go.



The coatric put forward the sharp claws at its legs.



「――"Light Severance"-」



Just before both sides crossed each other, Kouki created a simple barrier in midair using light element elementary magic. Using that barrier as a foothold, he changed his trajectory midair. At the same time, he swung his holy sword in a circle arc.



Coatrice and Kouki crossed over each other midair.



The coatrice charged toward the ground without decelerating at all. Its neck plopped off and flew like a joke, and its flesh made a graphic sound with its impact from crashing on the ground.



Kouki twirled midair while rotating his body to fix his stance, and then he landed on the ground. Just in case, he confirmed that there was no stone needle on the ground, but the needles were already crumbling as though weathering from age, so there would be no problem even if he landed on a stone needle.



「……」



Kouki confirmed the crumbling of the stone needles and the death of the coatrice, and then he let out a small exhalation to unravel his tension. At the same time, he held down something that was rising up inside.



His complexion didn't change at all. The change of his physical condition didn't show up outside. Even that condition that was becoming typical post-battle was already something he was used to.



(Not just getting used to it, I have to overcome it though……)



Kouki talked to himself inside his heart while using his spirit to push back the breakfast inside his stomach that was gradually rising up as though to say 「You calling?」. He unconsciously smiled bitterly at himself that was like that.



「What are you doing grinning like that, it's disgusting.」



「Nnguh!?」



The caustic words that stabbed at him like a throwing javelin caused the breakfast to rise up as though to say 「As I thought you are calling aren't you?」. Using spirit! He pushed it back!



The one who threw the javelin of words from the nearby rocky area was a female knight clad in Hairihi kingdom knight order's equipment. She looked good looking, and she could be seen like a noble's daughter if she shut up and wore a dress.



In fact, the girl was from the background of a noble family though……



Anyway, while Kouki was fighting the coatrice, the girl was hiding in the cover of rocky area and didn't come out at all. She didn't look like she was feeling bad at all about that, far from that, when the battle was over she came out with a violence of verbally attacking her ally while approaching near with a brisk pace.



「Nn, nnh. Err, isn't it going too far calling me disgusting?」



「A man grinning while standing in front of a corpse with its head and body separated from each other, at a scene that is drenched with blood, how could I not call him disgusting? My apologize, I cannot really follow hero-sama's sensitivity.」



「Ah, yea, sorry.」



Seeing the female knight backing away like in a rewind toward the nearby rocky area while her whole body was radiating aura 「It's creepy」, it caused Kouki to consent inside his heart 「Well certainly!」 in desperation while his mouth was apologizing.



「So, hero-sama. We more or less finished exterminating the monster in the request…….are we going back to the town? Or else, will you continue hunting like usual?」



The female knight asked while looking up to the sky. The sun hadn't even reached the zenith yet. This was a time period that was just right if they were going to go back to town to take lunch and reported to the guild about the request's completion.



Normally anyone would do that, but from how the female knight was asking like that instead, it could be imagined that usually Kouki wouldn't return to town in this case.



「The eyewitness report about the coatrice and also the extermination request we received said that there is only one of it but……there was also other eyewitness report of other monster. The monsters of 【Duvune Precincts】 are troublesome. And this place is also nearby Raisen grand canyon, there are a lot of hiding places here. We have time, so I'm thinking of investigating further.」



「……So it's like that.」



The female knight was turning a vaguely exasperated gaze at Kouki and she let out a small sigh.



Kouki and others had went back to earth and returned to school.



But, Kouki who was tormented by his sin persuaded his family and childhood friends and he dropped out of school by his own choice. He immediately crossed over to Tortus, and like this he moved around exterminating monsters as an adventurer to atone for his sin.



At the legendary decisive battle, the monster swarm that overflowed from 【Holy Precincts】 wasn't completely annihilated. Quite a number of them succeeded in escaping. The monsters of 【Holy Precincts】 were powerful. Every last one of them possessed the strength of the monster at the deep part of Orcus great labyrinth.



For the adventurers of this world, these monsters were severe if they weren't adventurer of "Gold" class.



It was for that reason that Kouki crossed over world without waiting to graduate from high school, and here he accepted monster extermination request especially against monsters from 【Holy Precincts】. He asked for cooperation from Liliana, he also appealed to all the branch heads of the adventurer guild, and like this time he was given the preference to receive information and request about such thing.



He was carrying on request with the highest degree of danger by his own wish. It was also wasn't rare for him to have consecutive battle every day. Indeed, there was no doubt that there would be enormous damage is these monsters were left alone, and rapid disposal of them was necessary and also something to be thankful for.



However, Liliana and some others were worried that if Kouki kept being reckless like this then it might brought fatal danger to him someday, they advised him to care for himself a bit more but……



At present, there wasn't any sign that Kouki's action pace would drop. This time too, Kouki seemed to be planning to search for monsters outside of the request and fought them just like usual.



(I wish he will also be considerate about me who is being dispatched as his watcher and also supporter……)



Altough fighting side-by-side with Kouki wasn't included in the range of the female knight's duty, just watching a battle against the monsters of 【Holy Precincts】 was nerve wracking.



At the battle against coatrice just now, it would be the end for the female knight just by getting grazed by the stone needle. Kouki and others of the another world group was in different level when it came to resistance against magic. Most likely, she would be completely petrified in a matter of seconds if she got hit.



Before this too, she felt uneasy only hiding in the cover of a rocky area, so she was hiding herself by creating a trench with godspeed hole digging.



「Aaa, I want to meet Onee-sama……」



「Hm~m, the periodic gate opening is still quite far away I think……」



The female knight whispered to herself while following behind the walking Kouki. Kouki smiled wryly while recalling the onee-sama that this female knight greatly respected, or rather she greatly loved to the degree that might be a bit too extreme――Yaegashi Shizuku.



「I know that already. Aa, I hate my own powerlessness. I thought that trivial thing like the world can be crossed using spirit and guts if it's for onee-sama's sake, but, nugugu」



「If the world can be crossed like that, just what is the meaning of Nagumo's hardships then.」



Kouki's wry smile deepened.



This female knight. Originally she was a royal guard that was attached to Liliana, a direct subordinate of the formerly royal guard commander and the present kingdom's knight order leader, Kuzeri Rail. But, why then she was now accompanying Kouki? If such question was asked――the short answer was, she was demoted.



She was one of the stepsister group that greatly loved Shizuku, she caused troubles over and over again because of her overflowing onee-sama love, and she turned out from royal guard knight -> normal knight directly under the leader -> normal knight -> this girl is no good already.



At the legendary decisive battle, Kouki was at the enemy side. That fact was a common knowledge also because of Kouki's own declaration.



And so, no matter even if it was for hunting the monsters of 【Holy Precincts】, naturally there was also opinions that were uneasy of leaving Kouki unregulated.



Although Liliana declared that such thing was unneeded but……Kuzeri consulted to Kouki with an exhausted expression 「That girl, I'm thinking of firing her」, that being the case in order to give peace to the heart of the people who was yelling their anxiety, let's attach a knight as a watcher, let's make it this girl! That was how it ended up.



「I wish that you won't speak of the name of that son of a bitch.」



「You will meet another painful experience if you keep saying such thing you know?」



「You mean, like hero-sama who got Shizuku-oneesama taken from him so thoroughly?」



「Gahah!?」



Kouki pressed his hand on his chest and fell down. He got on all fours with his head hanging down. It was a terrific counter.



「Good grief, putting aside Kaori-sama, I wished that you would at least protect Shizuku-oneesama to the death. Even I will be able to snatch away onee-sama if it's only from hero-sama……」



「Uguh」



「Rather than hero-sama, you are the loser-sama. You are chicken-sama!」



「Kafuh!?」



「Hey hey, how does it feel to be treated as "little brother" by a girl the same age with you? How does it feel? Hey hey」



「Uu, uuuuu」



The female knight poked repeatedly with the sheath of her knight sword at the crouching Kouki. She was venting her anger with her all, filled with the grief and lamentation toward the present situation where she couldn't even scratch that son of a bitch demon king.



But, it was at that time that a strong presence was transmitted from the direction of 【Raisen Grand Canyon】.



「……Looks like, I have a good luck today.」



Kouki stood up so easily it was unthinkable that he was getting so grandly humiliated until just now.



And then, he immediately walked forward while urging the female knight to follow with his gaze.



The female knight followed in a hurry. Kouki suddenly turned his face toward such her.



「Aah, that's right. I had asked this several times already but……can you stop with the "hero-sama"?」



「……」



Kouki said that with a small smile casually. The female knight spontaneously turned silent, and after thinking for a while,



「Then, I'll call you chicken-sama.」



「Can't you just call me Kouki normally!?」



Kouki spontaneously tsukkomi-ed. As expected it seemed he couldn't turn a blind eye at that.



The female knight slightly backed away and made a shuddering expression while she hugged her breast.



「Asking me so we can call each other by name……please stop, I'll get pregnant.」



「You won't! What are you saying so suddenly!?」



「It's Onee-sama's warning. I received that warning when I went to report to her that I am appointed with this duty. First he would create familiarity by calling each other by name, after that he would nonchalantly increase the body touch rate, for some reason some incident would occur and he would resolve it, and in the end he would smile pleasantly with sparkling teeth. That is that guy's modus operandi you know, be careful okay, onee-sama said to me.」



「SHIZUKUUUUUU-」



The tsukkomi of Kouki's heart burst out. The roar of monsters echoed from afar as though hailing in concert with that.



「Well, it's impossible for me to be infatuated to other person that is not onee-sama. Kouki-sama, I'm really sorry but, I hope you will give this up.」



「Why is it like I was confessing and then get rejected……wait, this is bad! Isn't this an aurora dragon!?」



Kouki felt exhausted, but right after that he saw the monster that showed up and he raised his voice in panic. The monster that flew out from 【Raisen Grand Canyon】was the dragon shaped monster that fired breath of extreme light that was once called as grey dragon. The white dragon had disappeared and right now they were called as dragon of extreme light.



Their original specs were high already, but now they were the 【Holy Precincts】 version and their level had been increased. It was a formidable enemy that wasn't really a laughing matter for adventurer.



Kouki gritted his teeth at the appearance of a monster that wasn't in the report while he turned his gaze behind him in order to give instruction so the female knight would retreat.



「Quick, get awa――wait, fast!? No, that's fine though!」



At that time the female knight had just leaped into the trench that she dug before this. It was a wonderful escape.



Kouki's expression was complicated feeling somehow not satisfied, but the next moment he twitched due to the light shining above and he turned around. And then,



「Uu, UOOOOOOH」



He faced the extreme light that was released at the same time and raised a war cry in desperation.



The female knight who was only showing out her face a tiny bit from the trench to observe such Kouki was,



(……Hmm. Even though he actually didn't mind even when he was ridiculed about his relationship with Shizuku-sama, but he cannot endure getting called "hero-sama". What a difficult person.)



Kouki's act before this. Despite his big reaction, but he easily returned to reality. From that it could be understood that he had already came to a clean decision about his relationship with Shizuku. Rather, he was accepting with the relationship where the two of them were like family of older sister and younger brother and felt satisfied with it.



But, in regard of getting called "hero-sama", Kouki smiled cheerfully and acted like it was nothing, but if one looked carefully they would clearly see that he had tense expression.



And then, the emotion that he was desperately hiding in front of the corpse of coatrice. That was……



(It was, fear. Now then, what in the world that fear is about……)



The female knight was watching Kouki who challenged the monster in midair battle with simple barrier as his foothold while pondering a bit.



The current Kouki wasn't wearing the "holy armor" artifact that was given to him from the palace. That was because Kouki returned it himself. He also returned all the artifacts he received from Hajime like "Air Force Boots" and others.



That was because of his guilty conscience that said that those items weren't something that could be possessed by him who wasn't a hero, at the same time it was also a decision that came from his determination to train himself back from zero without relying on artifact.



He was only carrying the holy sword wasn't because he wouldn't let go, but because he couldn't let go of it. For some reason, when Kouki left it behind, it would fly back to him when he moved a certain distance away from it. It was as though the sword was saying it had no user other than Kouki.



In any case, it didn't change that Kouki's defensive capability had declined remarkably, if he was hit by the breath of light then he clearly wouldn't get away unscathed.



Then, in that case, was that linked to his fear then……



The female knight had a hunch that there was no way that was all there was to it.



However,



(Well, it's something incosequential!)



The female knight easily abandoned that thought.



At the distance, it seemed Kouki had finally finished off the dragon. And then, right after that, three more aurora dragons appeared and he raised a shocked scream 「Whaat!?」.



(……Hmm. I guess I better make the trench a bit deeper.)



The female knight who actually was nonchalantly an expert in darkness element magic ignored Kouki who raised a war cry 「I, I WON'T LOSEEEEEEEE-」, and then she diligently worked hard in digging a hole.



「Uguu, I thought I was going to die……」



「How exaggerated. In the end other than getting knocked down by a tail, didn't you normally win without even getting particular wounded?」



「……Kaa-san, thank you for birthing me with a tough body.」



Kouki got a distant look and offered his feelings of gratitude toward his mother that was in different world.



As expected, it would be severe for Kouki and the female knight who had just underwent a mortal combat to continue searching for monster, so right now they returned at their base recently――【Brook Town】.



If one walked at the bustling street, aroma that really stimulated one's appetite would waft from the street stalls. Kouki's stomach was already empty too from his intense exercise. His breakfast that rose up even when he didn't call now didn't show any sign of showing up.



Kouki's gaze was unconsciously absorbed toward the numerous street stalls, but――



「Oi, that's」



「Ah? ……Chih, he is still in this town huh.」



「Is this alright? What if he is scheming something……」



The men who looked like adventurer that happened to pass by were talking whisperingly to each other when they saw Kouki. Their voices entered his ear.



The area around Kouki's chest slowly turned chilly. He unconsciously moved to cover his head with the hood of his cloak, but he stopped his hand from moving and kept his appearance without change.



Their expression that he caught in a glance was clearly feeling disgusted, along with color of anxiety that oozed out. Even though they understood that right now the hero was taking the initiative to hunt the monsters of 【Holy Precincts】, their disgust didn't really vanish. No matter how they couldn't wipe out their unease.



The traitor of mankind. The hero of betrayal. The envoy of evil god……



Would he bare his powerful fang toward mankind once more, could he be scheming something……



Trust that was lost once wouldn't return easily.



It was something he understood. It was something he was prepared for. That was why Kouki didn't hide his face. He looked forward, determined to accept it with resignation.



「Regaining trust is something really difficult.」



「Eh?」



The words that female knight suddenly let out caused Kouki's eyes to open wide. The female knight was staring straight ahead while further adding more words.



「It cannot be done in a day. Losing it is easy, but obtaining it is hard.」



「You're, right.」



「However, giving up is exactly what a "person that cannot be trusted" would do. Therefore, one must never give up.」



It felt like warmth was spreading slowly inside Kouki's chest. He was getting looked coldly at like this was him reaping what he sowed. At the time when he was needed the most, he instead prioritized his own emotion and betrayed everything.



But, like this there was also a person who was concerned for himse――



「Someday I will bloom a second time for sure at central! And then, I will be at Onee-sama's side……guheheh」



「Ah, yea, that's what you mean huh.」



A fatigue suddenly assaulted him. But he thought positively 'Well, my heart is lightened I think!' and fastened his steps.



The inn that the two of them used as their base came into view. The large wooden signboard had "Inn of Masaka" written on it. It was an inn that was used by that demon king and actually was considerably famous, to the degree that it became a bit of sightseeing spot. (TN: In Japan, 'masaka' meant 'don't tell me…')



After all the inn was brazenly advertizing in a big way by hanging down a banner that was written with "Demon king-sama's appointed inn! Your journey started from here!". It seemed the inn was also selling things like demon king manjuu and so on. They had a really good business spirit.



Kouki was making a complicated expression while opening the inn's door and entered inside.



The landlady of the inn welcomed the two of them with 「My, welcome back」 and a gentle smile. It seemed the people of this inn also didn't really think of anything particular toward Kouki. They were always attending to him with an attitude that was the same with other customer.



It was a really calming inn, with the exception of one thing.



Kouki and the female knight took their seat in order to have late lunch. They took the menu to take a look of what they would eat today. It was at that time,



「Today our recommendation is the teriyaki of Kururu bird you know?」



「Uoh!?」



「Nnnh」



The voice that suddenly resounded from nearby caused Kouki and the female knight to jump on the spot altogether.



The cause was one.



The inn's poster girl who was bringing the two of them water with a cheerful and charming smile on her face――Sohna Masaka-chan. The approach of that Sohna-chan wasn't noticed by the two until she called out at them. (TN: Sohna sounded like 'sonna' which could mean 'such thing', or 'no way'. Sohna Masaka, sounded like 'no way, don't tell me…')



Both Kouki and the female knight were people who served in battle. Kouki's Presence Detection was especially excellent to the degree that it could be said in extraordinary level, even if the other party possessed the skill of "Presence Isolation", as long as they weren't the same another world group like him, he would be able to detect them. The exception to that was like the rabbit eared bunches lurking in a certain sea of trees.



But, such Kouki didn't notice Sohna-chan when she approached him.



「So, Sohna-chan. Since when you were there……」



「Eh? I normally came out from the kitchen bringing water to you two just now though……」



She answered Kouki like that with a puzzled expression. Kouki cocked his head wondering whether it was just him feeling exhausted.



However, this kind of situation had happened several times, like when he walked in the corridor at midnight when he woke up to go to toilet, or when he came out from the bath's changing room, or when he was taking meal like this time, when he noticed she was already behind him. He really couldn't believe that it was just a coincidence.



「Sohna-chan, by any chance, do you have experience of receiving some kind of special training?」



The female knight unintentionally asked that.



Sohna-chan showed a puzzled expression toward that question, and the next moment she let out a chuckle. As though to say that she had heard a funny joke.



「Giggle, geez, what's with that question? What kind of special training that an inn girl would receive!?」



「Ah, no, it's just my feeling. My apologize, it seems that I was a bit confused.」



「You were working from the morning weren't you? Surely you are really tired now. Please eat a lot and get lively.」



Sohna-chan smiled sweetly. By no means that she was a beautiful girl that would make other people opened their eyes wide, but she possessed warm loveliness of a plain flower that resolutely bloomed fully.



Kouki and the female knight also forgot their shock just now and their expression turned warm. Surely, it was just as Sohna-chan said, they were only feeling a bit tired. Thinking that, they ordered their meal before looking at each other's face and exchanged a wry smile.



「Ah, that's right. Sohna-chan. About the dinner tho――ugh」



Sohna-chan wasn't there. It was after she took the two's order, and Kouki and the female knight looked at each other's face only for a moment. Yet despite so, when the two returned the gaze back, Sohna-chan wasn't there anymore. They didn't even feel any sign of her moving away.



「……」



「……」



Kouki and the female knight unintentionally fell silent.



「Did you call?」



Sohna-chan materialized.



「Ah, no. It's nothing at all……」



「Is that so? Then, please wait a bit until the cooking is finished okay!」



Sohna-chan vanished energetically.



It was like her presence was slippery…….



Kouki and the female knight waited for their meal silently for some reason. When Sohna-chan brought them their order, as expected they also couldn't grasp her presence.



Kouki and the female knight ate their meal silently.



When they finished their meal, Sohna-chan cleared up their empty plates.



But, at that time, Sohna-chan dropped something. A metal plate the size of a hand palm――a status plate.



「Ah, Sohna-chan, you drop――」



Kouki immediately picked it up and his gaze inadvertently moved toward the status plate. Originally, a status plate's content couldn't be seen as long as the owner didn't pour their magic power into it, but this status plate was shining faintly with its content visible, perhaps because Sohna-chan was displaying the content just now because of some kind reason.



Kouki stiffened when he saw the content. The female knight who unintentionally peeked at it also stiffened.



The status plate was quickly pulled away from Kouki's hand.



「Thank you very much, Kouki-san. But, seeing other person's status is a violation of manner you know?」



「Eh, ah, sorry.」



「No, no. It's me who is carelessly leaving it in its visible state after all. But, please be careful the next time okay.」



Sohna-chan smiled sweetly. The smile of a poster girl was dazzling.



The female knight whispered with a small voice while staring at the energetic back of Sohna-chan who was returning to her work.



「Just what is that girl?」



「No, even if you ask me that……」



A strange silence fell.



「We, well, it must be that. This is the appointed inn of the demon king after all!」



「Tha, that's true!」



The two who forcefully convinced themselves excitedly headed out for their afternoon work.



By the way, the status of Sohna-chan that the two saw was,



==========================================================



Sohna Masaka 16 years old Female Level 22



Vocation: None Occupation: 【Brook Town】 Inn of Masaka Employee



Strength: 9



Stamina: 15



Endurance: 6



Agility: 5



Magic Power: 3



Magic Resistance: 3



Skill: Accounting - Love Smell Sensing - Sharp Ear - Night Vision - Rope Descent - Wall Climbing - Infiltration - Diving - Elusive Phantom



==========================================================



It was a collection of skills that was really oriented toward spy except the first two skills. Or rather, as long as one wasn't from another world group, normally a person would only have about one or two skill. Most likely those skills bloomed later on through arduous training……



There was a monster in the inn of 【Brook Town】, perhaps.



In addition, in the evening of that day, a letter from Liliana reached Kouki. The next morning Kouki and the female knight returned back to the palace.



As expected, at that time too, Sohna-chan was behind the two of them to see them off with her presence beyond grasp even from hero. Both Kouki and the female knight couldn't hide their shudder.



Kouki and the female knight who arrived at the palace were welcomed by Liliana and knight order leader Kuzeri.



The moment she saw Kuzeri, the female knight scowled 「Gee!? Leader!?」. Her scruff was grasped by Kuzeri who had pulsing blood vein on her forehead and she was dragged away. It was a really natural flow of event without even any time to stop it, just like how water would flow from high place to low place.



「Eerr, for the time being, it's great that you return safely, Kouki-san.」



「Yeah, thanks, Lily. You wrote in your letter that there is a troublesome monster appearing at the outskirts of the capital but……」



Seeing Kouki who hurriedly gave his return greeting before quickly asking about the monster sighting caused Liliana to smiled bitterly thinking 'just like always huh'.



「About that. I think even the knight order can deal with this monster, but I called Kouki-san just in case. But even though I said that, there is only eyewitness report so far and the situation is nothing urgent. The knight order plan to depart tomorrow morning, so first please drink some tea and rest.」



「I see……. If that's how it is then I get it.」



Kouki who noticed that Liliana was being considerate at him also smiled wryly while he complied with Liliana's suggestion.



Like that, Liliana was about to ask about the problem Kouki was holding in his heart in a casual manner――it was at that time,



『I found you, hero-sama. Please I beg you, save my beloved world.』



From the sky, a gentle voice that gave off earnestness came down.



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



Both Kouki and Liliana stiffened in puzzlement. Right after that, a pattern of magic circle that looked like hieroglyph character they had never seen before stretched out on the ground below Kouki. The magic circle increased in radiance and overflowed with a power that was falsely similar with magic power.



「Do, don't tell me-」



「Ko, Kouki-san!?」



The face of Kouki who guessed what was happening was grandly twitching.



At the same time, the hieroglyph characters of the magic circle flashed fiercely. Liliana reached out her hand toward Kouki right away, but Kouki shook off that hand and pushed away Liliana instead.



「Lily-, tell everyon――」



「Kouki-san!」



Before Kouki could finish talking, the raging light settled down. And then, there was nobody there anymore.



「Thi, this is terrible! I have to tell Hajime-san!」



Liliana was dumbfounded for a while before she raised her voice 「It's terrible! Terrible!」 while rushing away in a feverish haste.



After the light completely blanketed his field of vision, Kouki tasted a sensation as though the gravity was changing direction every few tenth of second. Kouki who could only let his body getting carried away inside the darkness where he couldn't see anything finally found a streak of light.



He desperately reached out his hand to that. The light was rapidly approaching.



Kouki said 「Eei, to hell with this!」 and leaped into the light――



「Gaboh!? Ugogoooh!?」



He became panicked from the large amount of water that entered his trachea.



(I, I can't-, breath!? Wa, water!? Underwater!?)



Yes, the destination of the light he leaped into was underwater. At the corner of his sight, he could see the radiant sunlight and the beautifully swaying water surface.



But, he didn't even have the slightest bit of composure to enjoy such sight. He was unable to breath sufficiently, on top of that he spewed out a lot of oxygen because he suddenly coughed. His consciousness was already in red alert state. It wouldn't be funny if he died by drowning right after getting summoned.



He desperately struggled while trying to surface, but his sight was gradually locked into darkness. It felt like his consciousness was falling away.



While it was already getting hard to even think, the water surface suddenly shook.



His dazed mind was barely able to comprehend that a person leaped into the water.



The shining sunlight illuminated that person.



Long white hair. Chocolate colored skin. Sharp gaze that conveyed a strong will, jade colored eyes. Her approximate age might be a bit older than him. She had extraordinary figure that was wrapped with clothes with a lot of exposure, her body was painted with mysterious pattern.



(Beautiful……)



Kouki who was unable to even moved his limbs anymore could only think of such thing in amazement.



Right after that, that woman grasped Kouki and swam up to the surface with a staggering force. It took only a moment until they popped out of the water.



「Gahah, gehoh, –」



「Are you okay? Get a hold of yourself! Come on, spit the water out!」



Voluptuous breast pressed on Kouki while he was being carried. The woman who saved Kouki had a masculine way of talking in contrast with her appearance.



「Gefuh, tha, thank you. Yo, you saved me……」



「Don't mind it. I never thought that you would appear at the bottom of the spring. I was a bit late. Sorry.」



The white haired and brown skinned woman's sharp gaze softened a bit hearing Kouki who was thanking her even while coughing painfully.



From her words, it seemed that she grasped that Kouki would appear in this place, but it could be inferred that it was outside her expectation for Kouki to appear underwater.



To speak further, the voice that spoke from the sky before he was summoned sounded completely different than this woman's voice.



(There is no doubt that I'm summoned but……. It looks like this person isn't the summoner.)



While Kouki who recovered her thinking ability was thinking of such thing, he could hear countless splashing sound of people entering the water.



When he looked there, there were multiple men and women raising their voices saying things like 「Your majesty, you are safe!」, or 「Please leave something like this to us!」, or 「Suddenly jumping in like that, what are you thinking!」.



「There wasn't even a second to waste. It couldn't be helped. Rather than that, let's quickly pull him up.」



「Aah, geez-. It will be a scolding when we go home! Now, hero-sama. Please hold on to me.」



It appeared the woman who saved Kouki was called her majesty――in other words, it seemed she was a queen of a country somewhere. While feeling obliged that the queen personally jumped in to rescue him, a man past middle-aged with great physique and a look like a seasoned warrior grasped Kouki and lent him a hand.



When Kouki looked around, everyone's skin was similarly brown colored. Although, it was only the queen who was white haired.



Kouki who was pulled up to the bank reflexively sat down. The queen who stood imposingly in front of such Kouki opened her mouth with a powerful gaze directed at Kouki without looking bothered at all with the water dripping down her body.



「Now then, this had became an inconceivable first meeting, but for the time being, I'll introduce myself. I am Moana. Moana de Shelt Synclea. I am the one who is currently like the queen or whatever of Synclea kingdom.」



The people who seemed to be her subordinates made an expression that looked like they were feeling headache thinking 「What's with that 'like the queen or whatever'」.



Moana completely ignored them and her expression turned a bit hesitating.



「You might think that my way of talking is pompous, but this is what I'm used to due to my position. If it bother you, then I will try to talk as courteously as possible……」



「Ah, no, it's fine like that.」



Kouki immediately said that which caused tension to leave Moana's shoulders in relieve.



And then,



「I see. That saved me the trouble. Then once more, welcome to Synclea kingdom. O envoy of "the mother of all life" "the will of the great blessing" ――Foltina. We are imploring, so that your existence will become our salvation. Please treat us favorably.」



Saying that, she presented her hand slowly.



It was a feminine hand, but looking closer there were a lot of callus on her palm from the result of handling sword. Her skin also had small scars here and there. She was someone who fought. Was it normal in this world for the queen to fight personally, or was her country placed in a situation where she was forced to do so……



Seeing how he was summoned, and these people were looking for help, surely the situation was a fairly troublesome one.



Well, putting that aside, for the time being he had to ask this one question no matter what.



「Is that god-like person, really alright?」



Surely that god wasn't the last boss who enjoyed toying with human right? That was Kouki's question,



「Nnnn??」



It was obvious but, that question only served to make the queen confused.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Kouki arc.



First thing first, thinking that perhaps there will be reader who thought 'The queen's way of talking is different from the queen who showed up for a bit before this!', the supplementary explanation is that this queen's unadorned way of talking is like at the previous chapter after a fashion.



I'm not planning to continue Kouki arc for that long, but if it actually get long then sorry. I'll apologize in advance.



Now then, now is Golden Week huh.



How will everyone of Narou people will spend it?



Shirakome whose heart is moving into a certain village for the lonely people will surely get pursued with dealing with the piling up game.



If possible, I also wanted to upload a short story for Golden Week..



If nothing else, I pray so that everyone of Narou people will be able to enjoy Golden Week.



PS



I revised a few words at [The Obstinate Princess Lily] of the third world -> of the second world.



Thank you very much for pointing that out.





Chapter 263




AN: It's short, but if is okay for you readers, please use it to kill time.



――Month ○ Day x. Clear weather.



Tomorrow will be the first day of Golden Week. Everyone will go camping. I hear we are also going to have BBQ.



From what I heard, it seems that it's an event of grilling and eating meat outdoor.



……Just what in the world is interesting about that, I don't really understand. Even though we had been doing that all the time in our journey.



But, everyone is looking forward just to go have an outing. Perhaps, there is also a way to enjoy it that I don't know.



Very well. Oh camp, oh BBQ. Bring it on. I'll determine your caliber!



By the way, the members for the BBQ event will be Nagumo family, in addition there are Kaori, Shizuku, and Aiko (Lily has work and cannot come no matter what), other than them Kaori and Shizuku's family will also join us it seems.



I see. They are telling me, show us the power of the first wife if you can.



Very well. Oh family, oh Kaori. Bring it on. I'll teach all of you, the caliber of the first wife!



Now then, it looks like tomorrow will be really busy. This is a rare chance, so let's write the diary in real time, I'm thinking of developing a magic for automatic recording mode, thoughtography style.



……



I did it. As expected, me. But, it's thoughtography type, so it will be mostly like a live coverage. I'm uneasy whether the paper space will be enough, so I'm thinking of going with a brand new diary for the camp. Also, while the magic is in operation, there is the risk of things that I'm not planning to write or things that I thought about strongly will also get written. This point required special attention. Hajime, I love you.



Putting that aside, the weather is really warm recently, so Hajime's is gradually dressing lightly, I love it.



I am Yue. A woman who won't steal glances at what I want to see, but stare fixedly at it without any shame!



Hajime, sniff sniff. Rub rub. Kufuu~~



――Month ○ Day x. Clear weather



……Oops. I noticed it when I reread back, but my emotion leaked out a bit. I have to be careful, if not it will be disastrous for Hajime inside the diary.



Now then, today the weather for camping is clear. The temperature is also warm, a day that is really pleasant to spend it outside. Although, even if it actually rained, the weather can be manipulated to be clear so there will be no problem.



Any rain cloud that dare to hinder Hajime's plan, will be obliterated without any trace……fufu



Nnn. Just now, it feels like something leaked out. Just in case, I made it a secret that I'm writing diary, so I won't take it out in the middle of this camping. If something strange get written, I'll have to erase it when we go home……



Letters that is written by thoughtographys, can it be erased so easily?



……Anyway, let's think about it later.



The campsite was inside a forest three hours away from home by using car. It is in the foot of a mountain range, and there is also a river flowing nearby. So to speak it is a little-known good place, it looks like that it's not equipped with facilities as a camp site. However there is a suitable open space for camping inside the forest, something like that.



I believe the place isn't developed strangely, but a good place where one can feel the nature.



Are those the locals? Several families, and group of young men and women can be seen here and there, regardless of the Golden Week, this place doesn't feel crowded. That too make it easier to spend time here.



Though it seems Hajime found this place using the compass……



Good job, Hajime. I love you.



A while after we arrived in the campsite. The family of Kaori and Shizuku also arrived. The plan is to gather on-site, so it was a bit of worry that perhaps they might get lost, but it looks like they arrived safely without any incident.



The car of Shizuku's family is a black colored wagon type.



……The car looks like what a secret service agency in a movie or book would use as on-site base.



The car of Kaori's family is a normal car, so it looks all the more bizarre.



Shizuku and Kaori got down from their car. Both of them have a nice smile.



……Let's prank Kaori later. I'm going to distort that smile for sure. Kaori who is in indignation is funny after――cough-cough-. It feels like something leak out…….



Nnn.



Kaori's papa-san is looking at Hajime with an expression brimming with dreadful animosity. It feels like the caption [FIGHT] is going to appear anytime.



Oh? Hajime suddenly waved his hand. Is it a gesture toward Kaori's papa-san?



Oh? A small metallic rod stab the ground near Hajime's feet. If I remember correctly, that thing is called rod shuriken.



When I follow Hajime's gaze, Shizuku's papa-san and Ojii-san (TN: Grandpa) were there. Right now, it's only for a brief glance, but something is hidden inside their sleeve.



Ah, Shizuku's papa-san and Ojii-san were hit by Shizuku.



Ah, Kaori's papa get frightened by Kaori's hannya and get into dogeza.



Ah, Otou-sama (TN: written as father-in-law) is burning with rivalry for some reason and try to hug Hajime.



Ah, he get joint locked.



Fumu. I think it's really very well that the event started livelily.



Now then, this is not our first meeting, but for now, let's go there to teach both families that the first power is 530,000. It will be the end if the world of the wive~s get underestimated. Teyandeiberaboumee! (TN: The last gibberish, it seems to be a line that sometimes is used by old man that were born and raised in Edo. It roughly means, 'what the hell are you saying huh, this damned stupid bastard')



Everyone carried the camping tool and secured a spot. The gazes of the youngster group that seems to be the local keep glancing this way, but this happen every time so it's not worth worrying about. If they come for picking up girl then they only need to get washed into the river.



There is also a heated gaze coming from the family group. It's a boy about the same age with Myuu. It seems he is immensely interested with Myuu.



Oo, Myuu turned a bright smile and waved her hand to him. The boy became bright red! The boy waved back! However, at that time Myuu's gaze already moved toward Hajime papa! The boy fell on all four!



To toy with the opposite sex at this age……



Myuu, what a terrifying child-!



Putting that aside, Hajime papa's hand is wandering around his thigh. Today Donner-san has day off you know. Also, take off your gaze from the boy……



While the boy's mental state is in danger, the simple tents are set up, and the preparation for the meal is also being done.



The mama~s and papa~s are resting, also for thanks for their everyday work. It's BBQ, so we only need to cut vegetable though……



Because of Hajime and Otou-sama's insistence, it seems that it's no good unless there is curry while camping.



And then, it seems I'm not allowed to join in with the cooking duty……



Why? I cannot understand it. Just what had I done to deserve this?



Eh? It's no good because I'm trying to add originalityy~? Especially because what I'll put into pot cooking when they take off their eyes from me?



……I wish to profess that it's an extremely regrettable accusation.



Indeed, when we were in our journey I wasn't really well-acquainted with cooking, and perhaps there were a really fe~~~w times that I ruined Shia's cooking.



But, that is in the past. I am Yue. A woman that is always progressing. Right now, even cooking is something that I can normally――



Eh? Indeed there is no problem with my normal cooking? But, I'm not allowed to do pot cooking? Absolutely? Try to put my hand on my chest and think back of what I have done?



……Certainly, when I'm in front of a pot, there is itchiness in my soul. I can hear the voice of the ingredients appealing 「Now, throw me in!」 to me.



However! However still! That's――



Ah, yes, I'm sorry. It's nothing at all desu……



That's why, Shia. Stop looking at me with that eyes where the light is turned off. Even though you are sweetly making a cute smile, please stop shrinking your eyeballs, I beg you!



……Fumu.



If I'm not allowed to participate in the cooking duty, what should I do then……



The mama~s has quickly entered drinking bout time, but joining in that group is……



As expected, it feels awkward to enter among the papa~s who are all consoling Kaori's papa who is crying for some reason…….



When I focused my hearing, I can hear words 「My daughter you see, my daughter, recently, she is really cold to me……」 that sounded as though they are wringed out from his throat. Shizuku's papa and Shizuku's ojii-chan are nodding 'un un' in agreement. Otou-sama said 「Well, don't put it into mind!」 while his hand is tapping Kaori's papa shoulder, comforting him with absurdly light feeling――



Ah, Kaori's papa threw himself at Otou-sama. Ah, Otou-sama dodged. Furthermore he nonchalantly makes Shizuku's papa and ojii-chan into his shield. A game of tag that circled around those two is starting.



The look like children…….



Hm~m, as I thought, let's stop trying to enter the circle of the parent~s.



I'm bored.



What to do.



Oh, digital camera is discovered inside the luggage.



……



Fumu. How about taking the photographer role? Should I print it and stick the picture in the diary, making a picture diary?



……



Not bad.



From today I am paparazzi Yue.



Speaking about that, before I knows the figure of Hajime and Shia and Myuu has vanished. Where are they going?



Their presence is……



Shia is in the nearby river. Hajime is in the mountain. Myuu is at the upper stream?



When I thought that they are together, it turns out all of them are all over the place. They really are free spirited.



Anyway, let's follow Myuu for now. She is carrying the minimum equipment, so nothing should happen to her in the mountain and river around here, but as expected it's worrying that she is alone.



……



……



……



Myuu discovered. But, for some reason she looks strange. She is heading to upper stream following along the river, but sometimes she will tilt her head, and focused her hearing.



What could she be doing? Curious. Let's try following her a bit without calling at her.



……Nevertheless, the more we head to the upper stream, the more the ground became unstable, but the pace of Myuu who keep advancing is quite something.



Even though we are already in a place that can accurately be called as a mountain stream, Myuu is hopping 'pyon pyon' from rock to rock in a speed as though she is running on a flat ground.



It looks like she is activating the artifact for physical ability reinforcement but……



Even so, her body balance and choice of footsteps are quite something.



I have to praise her when she get back if it's like this.



Anyway, a photo of Myuu's lovely figure! One more time!



……



……



Nn~~. Perhaps I'll have to take her back soon. We have come until really far at the upper stream, the surrounding is also filled with trees growing in abundance.



I think Myuu is advancing with clear destination in mind somehow but……. Really, why is she going upper stream until this far?



……Oh? Myuu's legs stopped.



She is looking around restlessly. She crouched on the river bank, her head tilt……



……



Something came out!? From inside the river, something that looks like a child covered with scales all over its body came out!?



What is that!? UMA!?



Perhaps Myuu is in a pinch. Here I'll use Divine Existence and take Myuu――



Nn? It looks like they have amicable atmosphere. Ah, they handshake. The UMA waved and vanished into the river.



Myuu returned back in a good mood.



For some reason, it feels like I have seen something that must not be seen. Hajime once grumbled 「Even though Myuu is really strange but she is easy to get liked, so I've got to pay attention at her」, now I see, perhaps he referred to something like this.



Anyway, I hid and let Myuu walked past, and then I follow behind her. It seems she is already going back to the campsite.



I feel a bit relieved. If she is going deeper inside the mountain and try to deepen her relationship further with strange living thing, as expected, that's something I cannot just only observe from afar.



Nevertheless, just what in the world 「The Suiko Suu-chan」 means…… (TN: The kanji is . Google it if you want to see the picture. It's some kind of youkai in Japan and China.)



When I return to the campsite, Shia is shooting fish at the nearby river. Not fishing. Shooting.



Myuu happily dashed toward there. It seems Shia is flicking a fishing hook that is at the bigger side using her fingers, shot through fish inside the river, and then she pulled at the string that is tied to the hook and catchs the fish. It's to top up the BBQ ingredient.



There is a lot of fishes with split open head entered into the bucket beside Shia. Blood is scattered at the surrounding.



A father and a boy are fishing at the lower stream, but for some reason they are trembling all over with pale face. It's as though they had witnessed a gruesome scene. Perhaps because they are at the lower stream, a lot of red liquid is flowing their way.



Myuu is receiving Shia's teaching while learning fishing hook shot too, so the scene is turning even more gruesome. It looks like the father and boy there didn't really catch anything.



……Later, let's share some of the catch with them.



For now, the picture of Shia and Myuu happily shooting at the red scene 'kaclick'!



Nn. The picture is terribly cute.



When I return to the tent, Otou-sama and Kaori's papa are wailing while hugging each other. Seeing that, Shizuku's papa also looked moved and shed out tears, Shizuku's ojii-chan is nodding deeply feeling greatly impressed.



Just what in the world happened…….



As for the mama~s……they are completely drunk. Kaori's mama is drinking straight from a 1.8 liter bottle of Japanese sake, Shizuku's mam is also drinking from what looks like a whisky bottle. There is a mountain of beer can in front of Okaa-sama (TN: Read as mother-in-law)……



Nevertheless, Okaa-sama……. She really is a person that suited to be a boss lady. Her figure sitting with one knee drawn up and a cigarette held at the corner of her mouth is wild! Cool! Next time, let's try copying that. (TN: I don't really get the references in this paragraph, can someone check it and tell me later?)



Nn? Some kind of commotion is……



People who seem to be university students are looking here from afar while being noisy about something.



When I follow their gaze, I see……



Kaori is throwing vegetables. Shizuku is cutting them midair. And then, Remia catch them on a plate. By the way, one of Remia's hands is stirring the curry pot slo~wly slo~wly while doing that.



Why are they doing that kind of circus act? I don't get it but they are looking like they are having fun. That's what is most important. Click.



Surely, most likely, seeing how the men who seemed to approach to call at them are shrinking back, I think this is the method those three thought up to prepare for BBQ while also checking those men in place.



Beside the tent, Tio and Aiko are making some kind of rustling sound.



I see, it looks like they are setting up hammock.



It's a hammock type that is tied at trees, so Tio who is able to ascertain that it has been tied firmly is wiping her sweat with a really nice smile.



Oh, looks like she is quickly trying it out.



Aiko is holding the hammock in place while Tio is getting on it……



……The rope snapped because it cannot support the weight.



Tio is in daze while keep sitting on the ground. Click.



Aiko is getting all flustered while saying a follow up like 'Perhaps the rope is too old!' but…… At the corner of Tio's eyes, tears are……. No matter how anyone look at her, the cause of those tears isn't because of the pain from her butt hitting ground, looks like she received damage from the fact that the rope cannot endure her weight.



She sat on the floor hugging her knees and buried her face onto there.



Aiko is desperately consoling her while running her gaze restlessly around, then she dashed in a rush perhaps from finding something.



Looks like her aim is the vine twining around a tree. She take it into her hand, confirm at the surrounding with restless gaze and……ooh, the vine is lengthening slitheringly. It looks like she lengthen the vine with the power of farmer master and make it grow thicker.



With that she reinforced the hammock and tied it up on the tree again. Furthermore, she also apply her magic on the tree to fuse the vine on it and increase the toughness thoroughly.



Aiko help Tio who is still shutting herself inside her shell to stand up while talking at her gently. The dejected Tio nodded a bit.



She is gee~ntly, gee~ntly getting up on the hammock. For some reason, even my heart is also beating fast watching it.



Do, do your best-, Tio! You can get on it if it's you! Surely you can get on the hammock!



Ah, Tio's hand slipped! She got on the hammock face down!



The vine……



Ooh, it doesn't snap! It's perfectly supporting Tio! Aiko's face is amazingly smug!



But……



Tio keep laying face down. She is in an amazing posture like a shrimp with her body arching backward and both her hands held up. She wriggle and squirm in the attempt to face up somehow, but it doesn't go well……



Ah, she give up. She is unmoving on the hammock while still face down. She is really like a shrimp but, doesn't that hurt?



Aiko's smug face turned into a really complicated expression. When Aiko try to gently push, the backward shrimp Tio wavered *pura~n pura~n* like in a swing.



……Yep. Let's quietly leave.



Nn? Hajime's presence is nearing. I don't know why he entered into the mountain, but it looks like he safely finished his objective.



But, what is this I wonder? There is one more presence beside Hajime.



When I stared fixedly at the direction where Hajime is going to come out from……



Yes, the campsite panicked when they saw Hajime appeared with "that".



Beside Hajime, there is a one-eyed bear-san that looks really grim with the three straight scars on one of its eyes. It really look like the lord of the forest.



According to Hajime, he explained that 「I encountered the bear inside the forest. It impertinently attacked me so I finished him with a punch on the stomach and it got emotionally attached to me」.



I see, I completely don't get it. It seems, Hajime's reason is that even though there is no danger at the surrounding, just in case he checked inside the mountain but……



The daughter interacted with UMA, the father made a bear that looked really like the lord of the forest into his underling.



These parent and child are really similar.



The one-eyed bear-san laid down on the ground face up, exposing its stomach as though wanting to say 'I'm not dangerous at all!'. Myuu who returned from the fish shooting makes sparkly eyes and dive on its stomach.



The common people other than us who see that are screaming even louder.



The papa~s are in admiration, while the mama~s are cackling.



While Myuu is riding on its stomach, for some reason sparks scattered between the one-eyed bear-san and Shia.



The eyes of Shizuku and Kaori brightened at the fluffiness, while Remia is stirring the curry ro~und and ro~und while going 「My my, ufufu」.



Aiko is getting all flustered, and Tio keep being a backward shrimp.



Hajime is saying 「Let's start the BBQ soon yeah」 while glancing at the bear-san for some reason.



Bear-san shook *Twitch-!!*.



……Chaos visited the campsite.



Fumu. I'll deal with the other people who come here for camping, but for now,



Click.



I get the feeling that the first memory of the Golden Week will become something really lovely.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Yue's diary. Actually I wrote one for the extra story of the fifth volume.



I'm thinking to match it with the school arc and try to insert it sometimes for idle story.



Or rather, Myuu is again with something strange……



Just what in the world Shirakome is planning to do with Myuu? Even I myself don't know anymore.



The characters are moving as they pleased, that is really something that happen huh.



I wonder, should I just mix up legend, myth, urban legend into one big mess already to make something like「Behind Myuu, it become a swarm of Hyakki Yakkou nano!」……





Chapter 264




It was a place of large spring, surrounded by forest of trees. There was no sound that could be heard other than the rustling leaves.



It was Kouki's question that brought the silence. In front of Kouki who was crawling on all fours at the edge of the spring while coughing, there was queen Moana making a bewildered expression.



Suddenly the sanity of the existence that they greatly respected and loved was being questioned. The question was an extremely impolite one that normally it wouldn't be strange if they snapped toward the one who asked.



In fact, the atmosphere of the people standing around the queen――six men and women with warrior appearance, and two man and woman who didn't seem like warrior but looked used with fighting. And one woman whose clothing was different with the others, her attire somehow gave the impression that she was a lady attendant――was turning into one that couldn't be said to be pleasant.



Although, not even one of them tried to reproach Kouki's impolite statement, they didn't look like "fanatic". Was that because of healthy religious faith, or else was it because they were holding back because they were in front of the queen, the reason wasn't clear.



Kouki felt the atmosphere of the surrounding and saw the bewildered expression of Moana whose hand was still presented at him, and realized that his question was crude before he apologized in panic.



「I, I'm sorry, saying that so suddenly. I am a bit traumatized with an existence that is like a god……」



「Tra, trauma of god? Or rather, you had met that kind of existence before?」



The words of Kouki who was once involved with a supernatural existence that was called god caused Moana and her people to make expression of being struck with admiration. Was the young man before their eyes an existence so great that was also chosen by another great existence different from Foltina, they wondered.



But, Kouki's next words turned them speechless.



「……Yes. Though, it was when he was in a state of possessing an acquaintance. He thought nothing of human except as his pawn in a game, caused many wars, brainwashed people, and when he got bored he sent in his apostles to massacre mankind, that kind of god.」



「That's, not god. That's absolutely an evil something else right?」



A magnificent tsukkomi from the queen. Her way of talking changed. By any chance, that might be her unadorned way of talking.



Kouki smiled wryly while saying 「Perhaps」 and he took Moana's hand.



「Eerr. Let's see, Foltina, sama? I think you said that person was the one who summoned me but, I completely don't know anything……. But first thing first, I only wish to confirm ahead just one thing, can I return to my original place?」



From the hand of Kouki who returned a firm grip in his handshake, Moana felt the strength of someone who was similarly a fighter like her and she coughed once. She recovered her disordered mind and way of talking.



After that she lowered her eyebrows looking a bit troubled and,



「I'm sorry. But honestly, we too are currently also baffled. We have never heard the voice of Foltina-sama that clearly before, and someone like you who visit from a different world, it is like a fairy tale.」



「In other words……」



「Yes. It's just as you though, if the "original place" that you said us really in another world, then we don't have the method of how to return you back there. Or rather, you really came from another world huh?」



「Eerr, I think that's the case but……」



As a test, Kouki tried mentioning the name of the kingdom and empire but Moana and others gave no reaction. Perhaps this place was an unknown continent that was also in Tortus……such possibility couldn't be denied, but seeing that Moana and her people had no power of summoning, in the end he had no other method except making contact with this Foltina-sama, or searching for a method to go home by his own strength.



(Or perhaps, will that guy come here to pick me up? It feels like he might show up all of sudden with troublesome face after Shizuku and others begged him.)



Thinking of "that guy" that floated at the back of his mind――Hajime, caused Kouki to smiled wryly. If it was him who possessed both the method to cross over worlds and the method to find Kouki, then it wasn't something impossible.



Moana and her people made a worried expression seeing Kouki's state, they wondered whether he was cornered from feeling shock into a condition where he could do nothing but laughing.



Seeing the good character of Moana and others that somehow could be seen through from them, Kouki felt a bit relieved while smiling to show that he was fine.



「I'm sorry. Come to think of it, I haven't introduced myself. I am called Amanogawa Kouki. ――Just a mere swordsman.」



「Swordsman……」



Moana and her people made a bewildered expression once again, wondering why he didn't introduce himself as the hero. But, before that bewilderment could turn into spoken out question, Kouki stood up and continued his words.



「If this is another world, a place that doesn't know about my former world, and I cannot go home, then that can't be helped. Can I ask you to please teach me about various things. Including the reason why I was called here, your majesty the queen?」



「Ye, yeah. That's right. It looks like you were really suddenly tossed into the spring, we will give you explanation as much as we can. Also, you also don't need to worry about any basic necessities. Even like this, I am a queen after all. There won't be a problem with just providing for a single guest.」



Moana pulled herself together and said that while winking at him with playfulness. The atmosphere of that place softened slightly and the people who seemed to be her attendant also smiled slightly.



「And also, I don't mind if you call me Moana. You are a guest that Foltina-sama entrusted to us. It should be fine if you think of your status as higher than me. That's why, it's fine to not humble yourself like that.」



「Aa~, perhaps so. But there is also the matter about me being outsider so……, please let me call you Moana-sama. As for my language……for the moment, please let me keep using polite language as it is.」



「Mu, I see……」



Moana's shoulders dropped in a bit of disappointment. The expression of Moana's followers looked like they had headache right after Moana said to him to not act humbly, but their expression turned grateful when they heard Kouki's reply. Seeing that, Kouki felt relieved that his response wasn't mistaken.



It appeared that this queen had a really unconventional character, as could be seen from how she was so used to battlefield to the degree that she had scars on her body.



「Then, I'll have you let me call you Kouki. That will be fine I believe?」



「Yes, of course.」



「Right. Well then Kouki. There is a bit of problem with the safety of this area, if possible I want us to be on the move quickly. If we hurry we should be able to arrive at the capital before the sun set.」



Kouki nodded showing that he had no objection, to which Moana also nodded back 「Great」. And then, she moved her gaze at the woman in attendant attire beside her.



「Anneal. We cannot keep being like a drowned rat like this all the time. Please.」



「Yes, your majesty. ……I pray. For the grace of the sun and the wind――"Wind of Embrace"」



The woman who was called Anneal looked to be in her middle twenty from her appearance, a woman with slightly calm atmosphere. Her eyes were droopy, and when she replied her voice was also soft, which spurred such impression even more.



Different from the other followers, she wasn't carrying anything that looked like weapon, in exchange she was carrying a large satchel on her back and several bags that looked like shawl.



Whether it was Moana or her followers, they all were basically wearing pants and protectors above their clothes with white undertone. But it was only Anneal who was wearing something like an apron in the place of protector. That was the reason Kouki got the impression that she was like a lady attendant.



When that Anneal whispered in a faint voice, right away a part of the pattern on the back of her right hand shined faintly.



「This is……」



Kouki looked down on his body with a slight surprise. His clothes was swaying from receiving gentle warm wind. From the sensation of wind his skin felt, it seemed a warm wind was whirling with his body as the center. The same thing also happened with Moana and the followers that entered the water just now.



「Fumu, it seems it will also be necessary to explain about blessing art too. She is praying, or perhaps offering her wish to the power that dwell in nature――the blessing power, to have that power shared with her.」



Power was dwelling in all living things and the whole nature. Moana and others called that power as blessing power, and the technique that made use of that power by praying or vowing was named as blessing art.



The painting on their body was something that represented their prayer and vow as letters which made it possible to shorten the invocation procedure.



As for Fortina, she was thought to be the aggregation of those powers of nature, an existence that possessed will. Sometimes, there appeared people who felt "the will of the great blessing" like in the fairy tale, or heard her words.



By no means that existence could be confirmed clearly, people vaguely thought that such existence existed.



In the teaching since the ancient time, the sense of values of living while feeling gratitude to not just Foltina, but to the whole nature was planted into the people.



Therefore, rather than calling the people's feeling toward Foltina as religious faith, it should instead be called as ecological sense of values to treasure the nature.



Kouki listened to such story during the time of waiting until their clothes dried up.



(I see. Rather than faith, they are offering respect……or perhaps gratitude, something like that……)



Like that, his conviction that Moana and her people weren't fanatic was getting stronger inside Kouki. Although, Kouki still hadn't let go of his wariness toward Moana and others. His polite language and title of honor toward Moana displayed that.



When their clothes dried up completely, the explanation about blessing was also mostly over and Moana raised her voice.



「Now then, let's depart. We will keep talking about what we should teach to Kouki in the way. Spenser, I'll leave the vanguard post to you.」



「Understood, your majesty.」



The aging warrior that pulled up Kouki from the spring before this seemed to be called Spenser. He was the eldest among all the people here, his short black hair without any grey hair gave a youthful impression. Although, his body that was obviously trained even through his equipments and the glimpses of sharpness of a fighter deep in his eyes gave a weight that this person couldn't be underestimated by any means.



When Kouki asked, perhaps it should be said that it was just as expected, it seemed that other than Anneal, all of the people here should be called as the most elite warriors of Synclea kingdom, they were the royal guard of Moana. And Spenser was the leader of the royal guard force.



Following Spenser's lead, they advanced through the thick forest. The temperature and humidity also didn't feel unpleasant, the pillars of light created from the light through the gaps between leaves were beautiful. Kouki narrowed his eyes pleasantly thinking 'What a verdant world'.



Kouki talked toward Moana while they were advancing with the soldiers surrounding Kouki and Moana at the center.



「The nature is really abundant here. The spring before this too, even though it was quite deep, but the water ws really clear until the bottom. This is also thanks to Foltina-sama, no, to the blessing power that filled this world, right.」



「……That's correct.」



For some reason Moana's expression turned complicated. Inside his heart Kouki felt uneasy thinking if he had said something wrong while his gaze was looking around. There, he saw everyone including Spenser and Anneal were also making a complicated expression.



Kouki wracked his mind even harder to spot what he had said wrong. Moana showed a wry smile to such Kouki.



「No, forgive me. Kouki hasn't said anything wrong. It's just, I was thinking to explain it after this but……place abundant with nature like this, only numbered a little.」



「Eh?」



Kouki was perplexed. Moana's bitter smile deepened while she explained further.



「Outside this forest, there is a desert continuing as far as the eye can see. This place is special.」



「De, desert?」



「Yes. the blessing power is being stolen from the world. Because of those <Dark People>.」



<Dark People>――According to Moana, they were a grotesque race that emitted miasma, a power that neutralized the blessing power. They must be something like monster if a comparison was made with Tortus. It seemed they were called Dark People because they were constantly enveloped in miasma that looked like black mist.



They consumed <Blessing Power> just by existing, stealing life force from all living things. They were truly the natural enemy of not just mankind, but also nature.



「We don't understand what are they, and from where they came. But, let's see, if we are asked 'what is your history?', then we ought to answer "fighting the Dark People". That is just how long we have been fighting them since far in the past.」



It felt like inside the eyes of Moana who was having a distant look, there was deep and heavy something that couldn't be described with words dwelling inside. Kouki only stayed silent without saying anything, merely listening to what she said.



「A lot of nature lost blessing power. Because those Dark People are making blessing power their food, they are acting prudently from exploiting the nature compared to in the past. Because if blessing power disappear from the whole world, they too won't be able to keep living. However, they have a method so that they have no problem even while refraining from exploiting nature.」



They were raising human like livestock. The blessing power a single human possessed was in a different league compared to a single tree or a single animal. Therefore, the <Black People> liked to eat human.



Thanks to blessing power, the growth of plants and animals in this world was quick, and strong. But, even so the Black People's appetite was above that. Also, a lot of blessing power was consumed, or perhaps eaten in battle. If blessing power was lost to the degree that there was no prospect of recovery, nothing would remain in that place. The place would only become a world of sand.



The supply and demand weren't balanced, regulating their eating so that the blessing power wouldn't dry up meant that they would always be unable to obtain the feeling of full stomach.



That was why, so that it wouldn't be a problem even if the animal and plants were eaten until they ran out, the Black People raised human as livestock.



「This is a battle where our survival and dignity are on the line. Our great ancestors created means to oppose the miasma, diligently studied the blessing art, and like that life continue until it come to our time. ……But, perhaps that too has reached the limit already.」



Moana's vast gaze caught Kouki. The thing dwelling inside those eyes that reflected himself――Kouki gulped when he saw that.



「This world, the great mother nature, Foltina-sama is――that's why, they summoned you correct?」



Things like hope, didn't exist there. There was also no expectation. What was inside those eyes, was mortification, and then disappointment toward herself.



The personification of blessing power that should even be called as the will of the world――Foltina had made her judgment. That it was impossible to resist with just the human of this world. That was how much this world had been cornered.



The fact was, there was no other country around Synclea kingdom. There were only feudal lords in each territory, where they all answered to the kingdom. Countries that once called themselves as empire, federation, holy country, and so on, all of them were perished. Across several mountains, or at the continent across the sea, there were other countries that were still resisting, but it was unclear how long they would be able to keep at it.



'All of you is no good already', it couldn't be helped even if the world thought so about them……



Even though there wasn't any shadow on Moana's expression, but those eyes told of Moana's feeling more eloquently than anything else. In Kouki's eyes, it looked as though the queen before his eyes was smiling while crying.



――It's fine. I swear I'll save this world!



If, he said such thing without thinking of anything, surely Moana with her personality would laugh livelily while also saying 「That's really reliable!」 to him. While the inside of her eyes was looking like she was going to cry just like now, while feeling disappointed at herself, while getting hurt.



Kouki was glad that he didn't say anything like that. But, however, then, what should he say instead?



It's still not over yet? There should be something that you can do?



Foltina-sama isn't disappointed or anything at you?



It's just a coincidence that I was summoned you know?



He didn't understand.



Kouki didn't understand, what was the correct thing to say.



Kouki couldn't bear to look at Moana's eyes by more than this and he averted his gaze. Moana too also moved her gaze to the front as though there was nothing and she was going to continue her story about the <Black People>.



But, at that moment Kouki lifted his face in surprise and he stopped walking.



「Hm? Kouki, what's the matter? Is your condition――」



「……Err, there are a lot of presences that way. They are heading this way with really fast speed but, what is the possibility that they are your comrades?」



「-. Everyone, prepare to fight! At nine o'clock!」



Moana ignored Kouki's question and immediately raised her voice. Everyone, without a single exception and without even a moment of delay rearranged their formation to face toward the indicated direction. There was no hesitation and also no one asking for confirmation.



That movement that was without the slightest disarray was just like the group behavior that birds showed. Moana's instruction was also extremely fast, but even more than that, the proficiency of the most elite royal guard unit was also enough of a show.



「Kouki! Do you know their number and distance?」



「-, Yes! Their number is……16. Their distance is 80 meter――ten seconds until the contact! I believe they are large four-legged animals!」



For a moment Kouki thought whether they would understand when he spoke about the distance using the unit of meter, and so he restated it as the time until the contact with enemy.



Moana's eyes opened wide. Based from the information that Kouki brought to her, she had an idea of the existence that they could possibly encountered in this area.



But, what she was surprised about wasn't because that existence was approaching. She was shocked at the width of Kouki's detection range based that she deduced from that existence's moving speed and the time until the contact with enemy that Kouki estimated.



Although, her surprise only lasted for an instant.



「You all hear that! Assume it's the black wolf species! They will come to tear down our formation in their first attack! Neisan, Lilin, take the wind out of their sail!」



「「Understood」」



Spenser and others, the six soldiers unsheathed their sword. Their swords were single-edged sword with large curvature that looked like shamshir. The width of the sword was wide, and if seeing just from there then they could be categorized as large sword.



The man around his thirty who was called Neisan, and the woman her late teen who was called as Lilin, the two of them held their hands together in prayer behind the six soldiers. They must be art user that specialized as rear guard. Each time the prayer of the two was released to the world, a part of the patterns visible on their cheeks and nape was shining.



The monster of this unknown world finally came. Kouki was nervous and getting cold sweat while also drawing out the holy sword that was dangling from his waist. The holy sword that shined from reflecting the sunlight filtering through trees was so magnificent that everyone spontaneously wanted to let out a sigh of admiration.



Unconsciously Moana and Anneal took a second look.



It was right after that,



Violent killing intent and black miasma rapidly approached from inside the forest like a squall.



「――<Protruding Earth>」



「――<Smashing Raging Wind>」



Prayers of the casters reached the hearing at the same time. The pattern painted on Neisan's cheek until his nape shined, and at the front the earth protruded out matching the activation of that hieroglyph-like pattern. It was just like a wall of stone. The wall of stone had thickness of thirty centimeter, with width and height of two meter.



*zushin-*, the sound of something crashing on the stone wall rang out in succession.



Instantly, the pattern stretching from Lilin's shoulder until her neck also shined, and blowing down wind that should be called as super localized downburst struck at the other side of the stone wall.



*gusha-* Graphic sound and small voices of death agony leaked out from the other side.



Neisan's voice echoed even more.



「I pray. Seeking for the crumbling earth, smash apart――<Scattering Pellet>」



The stone wall was pulverized by itself and then its fragments shot out to the front like a directed explosive.



Black smoke was bursting in one after another――no, those were black wolves clad in that black smoke with body length of a meter, several of them were turning a somersault altogether.



Seeing that, two of the vanguard soldiers rushed out.



「「I pray! This body is a sword――<Soul of Strife>!」」



That was a blessing art that raised physical ability. It wasn't just a prayer, but a vow taken toward themselves, by doing that they were strengthened by the blessing power inside their body.



The first step of the two soldiers dented the ground. With that force they slaughtered with one slash two black wolves that only just stood up again somehow from the impact of the pebbles.



Aiming at the two soldiers that stuck out from the formation, more black wolves approached them, but Lilin's wind obstructed those wolves. When the black wolves regained their balance, the two soldiers retreated to the formation with brilliant speed.



The black wolves growled in irritation. As though to display their annoyance, they spewed out black smoke――miasma with even more thickness.



Right away, the surrounding vegetations wilted as though they lost their vitality, they dried up completely.



「Don't break formation. Keep up what are you doing.」



「We understand.」



The <Black People> that was called as black wolf species was a species that specialized in cooperation and melee, their attack power itself was relatively low except a part of the species. The soldiers firmly held the formation and accurately finished off the attacking wolves, while the rearguard's blessing art sniped from behind. That was the theory.



The captain of the royal guard Spenser narrowed his eyes like a hawk and when he spoke to make confirmation just in case, everyone else nodded firmly without any agitation.



(……Their appearance is monster just as I thought. Is the difference between the two is that one emitted miasma and the other isn't? These wolves resembled the four-eyed wolf but, I don't feel as much pressure from these wolves. I can also follow their movement enough. What's left, whether they have skill like characteristic magic or not.)



Kouki calmly analyzed the battle strength of the black wolf species. Seeing that calm attitude, Moana secretly sighed in relieve.



From the sensation of Kouki's hand, his sensing ability just now, and the minimum accurate information they shared before this, she assumed that Kouki possessed a lot of battle experience, but even so she was worried that he would panic when the time came that they faced the <Black People>.



But, at that time, a huge shadow appeared slowly behind the black wolves surrounding them.



『Hou, so it's as I thought that the information that the queen went out of her country is true……』



It felt like the air shook slightly. Clad in a miasma with thickness that was clearly different from the surrounding black wolves, it was a black wolf with a body built that must be more than two meter. That wolf was talking with a voice that sounded like it directly resonated inside the head.



「Eh?」



Kouki leaked out an astonished voice. His eyes opened wide.



On the other hand, Moana and her people didn't look surprised, they were glaring at the large black wolf with an expression as though they had bitten something sour. It seemed that it was something normal that the black wolf possessed intelligence and speech.



Wasn't the <Black People> beasts without any reasoning? Wasn't they the same like monster, a disaster that was mankind's natural enemy……?



While Kouki was confused, Moana raised the corner of her mouth and replied back with a fearless expression.



「We also scattered fake information so that we wouldn't get found out, and we planned to move quickly with only the minimum number though. It seems your side have an excellent observer. But, are you seriously thinking you will be able to kill us just with this number?」



『I'll take my chance. There is no way I'll hand over the achievement of taking the head of the queen to the other pack. I'll present your head to the king, and lift my name, Niebla!』



*UOOOOOOOOON* A howl that was even accompanied by physical shockwave burst. The black wolf that introduced itself as Niebla gushed out dreadful black miasma along with undulation of power that transmitted electrifying sensation to the skin.



The vegetations at the surrounding that were instantly enveloped by black miasma withered up one after another.



Naturally, that miasma also enveloped Kouki and others. Moana immediately snuggled close to Kouki that their skin touched. It wasn't because she was scared. It was to protect Kouki's body.



If the miasma came in contact with the blessing power of all living things――that was to say their life, Moana and others wouldn't come out unscathed. But, their state didn't look like they were enduring anything like that.



「Everyone, pay attention to the remaining capacity of the miasma stone! Lilin, scatter away the miasma while concentrate attacking Niebla!」



「Roger!」



Moana's instruction was given. Moana's hand reached out toward her chest seemingly unconsciously. There was a colorless and transparent cylinder shaped gem about five, six centimeter long attached there. That gem――miasma stone was faintly muddy black.



「Kouki, sorry. I should have handed this to you first. Put this miasma stone on your body. It will protect us from the miasma.」



It seemed miasma stone was something like how there was magic stone inside monster, it was an organ inside the body of <Black People>. After extracting the miasma inside it for about ten days, it was processed and put on the body, that miasma stone would absorb miasma within its capacity range, and by wearing it one could do activity even inside miasma for a period of time without getting affected.



Moana wrapped a miasma stone pendant around Kouki's wrist. At the same time the black wolves led by Niebla attacked simultaneously.



Niebla too, he couldn't join the cooperation attack because of Lilin holding him back and could only run around outside the formation in the attempt to perturb the soldiers.



Using that chance, Neisan's blessing art was decreasing the number of the black wolves by one, and then one more, it was only little by little, but it was continuing steadily.



『Chih. You are doing well with these number. As expected from the elite unit of the queen-』



Niebla whispered with a voice filled with bitterness.



Right after that, Niebla resolved himself and howled, he charged forward without stopping even while the wind blades that Lilin released carved his body and caused blood to spray out.



「He is coming! Push him back and then kill him!」



『Don't underestimate me-』



Spenser gave his instruction, at the same time Niebla's howl surged out. Right after that, miasma gushed out explosively from the ground below two warriors who were facing Niebla.



「Guah」



「Whaatt!?」



「Dario-. Fedri!」



The soldiers――Dario and Febri raised scream of shock and got blown away. Because Dario was considerable young even among the elite guard, unlike the veteran Fedri, he was unable to defend right away and crashed on the ground some distance away without even being able to apply ukemi.



The hole that was opened from the absent of the two was immediately closed by Spenser. He blocked the brutal claws of Niebla using his sword and he held his ground trying to halt the rush's momentum.



「Guh, you bastard-」



『You're in the way-』



Miasma converged beside Niebla and took shape. It was the shape of three huge claws.



Lilin fired <Smashing Raging Wind>, but Niebla who blew up miasma upward and neutralized it didn't pause and unleashed the three claws in a horizontal swept toward Spenser.



The other soldiers had their hand full facing the black wolves. They couldn't move right away.



「I won't let you」



It was queen Moana who cut in. She slipped into Niebla's bosom from really close to the ground as though she was crawling there, and struck her sword at his torso with a stunning slash.



Because Niebla immediately pulled back, the trajectory of the three large claws also shifted slightly. Spenser also wasted no time backing away and he got off with only his protector's surface torn.



『Chih. As expected, ordinary method won't work huh.』



Niebla spat that line out and plunged in the miasma claws. Spenser blocked that while Moana stepped toward Niebla.



But, Niebla seemed to also have predicted that movement.



「Dam――」



『First, I'll eat starting from that irritating caster!』



Niebla leaped over Moana's head and used the miasma claws he created himself as a foothold and leaped further, his sprang toward his objective――Lilin who was accurately slowing him down.



Lilin who was making prayer in order to back up Moana late to react just for a moment against Niebla's irregular movement. She wasted no time twisting her body while trying to pray for defense, but whatever the case it was impossible to completely dodge the attack.



It would be most satisfactory if she lost only an arm――she resolved herself for that but the next moment,



『――<Light Severance>-』



A light barrier that shined radiantly manifested in front of Lilin's eyes. Niebla's claws only raised unpleasant scraping sound *gigigi* and stopped before the light barrier.



「Wha, what!?」



『What's this!?』



Lilin's shocked voice and Niebla's surprised exclaim overlapped.



Niebla adroitly turned his body midair in a somersault and his legs stopped in front of the unknown technique. And then, he looked for the person that was the source of this with his atrocious beast eyes running at the surrounding.



It took a moment to specify the culprit.



『You, what the hell was that just now?』



*gururu* Niebla raised a growl that was brimming with killing intent and wariness while asking that.



The person his gaze was directed to was naturally



「Kouki!」



Moana's shout that was filled with shock and gratitude because he protected her comrade resounded.



But, her gaze, and then Niebla's beast eyes that were emitting killing intent were immediately narrowed in dubiousness.



Short and ragged breathing leaked out repeatedly could be heard.



Without any doubt, it was Kouki's breathing. It wasn't that he was adjusting his breathing. It even sounded like he was hyperventilating.



It was obvious even from Kouki's expression that he wasn't in a normal state.



Yes, it was something that even caused both enemy and ally to feel dubious――



Kouki's expression was pale, as though he was fearing something.



The tip of the holy sword his hand was holding was shaking a bit, while being pointed on the ground.



It wasn't――being pointed to Niebla, to the enemy in front of his gaze.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.





Chapter 265




AN: The story ain't progressing even after I wrote twelve thousand words……



He didn't understand.



Was he an enemy? Was there really no middle ground to talk with each other?



He didn't understand.



Were Moana's words the truth? Was justice really on her side?



He didn't understand.



Was it the correct thing to do, to cut down an existence with its own will while he was still not really understanding anything like this?



He didn't understand.



They were the enemy seeing how they came attacking. Enemy should be defeated. That decision should be correct. ……Was it really?



He didn't understand.



He should believe Moana and her people. ……Should he really?



He didn't understand.



Was his judgment really righteous? Was what he believed in correct? Was there something that he failed to notice? Was he averting his eyes from what he should see? Was there anything that he misread? Was he really not thinking conveniently?



He didn't understand. He didn't understand. He didn't understand.



『Hah, just a coward-』



Those thoughts rushed inside Kouki head for a moment in circles. A sneering voice that seemed to see through that caused Kouki to return to his senses in surprise.



When he noticed, brutal claws were approaching before his eyes.



「-!」



『Nuh』



Even when he was taken by surprise, the piled up experience and the greatest specs moved his body by itself. The holy sword that sprang up with a terrific speed shifted Niebla's claws upward.



Seeing his attack averted so easily caused Niebla to leak out a voice of shock. He could never imagine that a trembling young man with pale expression and ragged breathing from fear would be able to show a reaction this agile even in his wildest dream.



Although, Niebla's agitation only lasted a moment. The instant he passed Kouki by, he swung the miasma claws. He used his own body as camouflage to make the miasma claws attacked from Kouki's blind spot.



But, what resounded wasn't a scream of death agony or the graphic sound of flesh getting torn apart.



*shaaan* A single clear sound of scraping metals that didn't suit the battlefield. It was the sound of the miasma claws that were launched from the blind spot getting parried by Kouki's holy sword. He matched the motion of the miasma claws and averted only their trajectory.



『What-』



Niebla's agitation was clear to see this time. An impact ran through his stomach at that time.



『Gofuh!?』



An impact that made him thought whether his internal organs were being stirred blew away his consciousness for an instant. He crashed on the ground without even any awareness of up and down. When Niebla recovered his consciousness, his gaze ran toward Kouki.



He saw Kouki's figure raising one foot there and he finally understood that he got kicked flying.



It was a terrifying technique. While his reflex toward the first attack was also amazing, but even more than that was his sensing ability toward attack from a blind spot, technique that beautifully parried every attack instead of blocking, and then the perfect counterattack.



But, however,



(What's with that!? That man, just what's in the world is the deal with him!?)



Niebla felt more confused then scared. While this young man he was staring at possessed amazing technique like a veteran warrior, but he was still directing scared gaze toward Niebla even now.



Just a single kick pierced through Niebla's defense as though tearing through paper scrap and reduced him to a state where he still couldn't stand up right away. Just what in the world a man who could that was feeling scared at?



Or perhaps, he was merely acting? Niebla guessed, but seeing Kouki's state that was desperately stifling something inside himself, it didn't look like that at all.



That was why he didn't understand. Here was a warrior that might even surpassed Spenser, the royal guard of his sworn enemy the queen, and yet his attitude was too mismatched for someone like that, which made him unable to understand.



(Kuh, my underlings also cannot hold on for longer. Then, what I should prioritize is-)



Rather than focusing on a newcomer that he couldn't understand, he should prioritize attacking the enemy that would definitely caused collapse in the enemy side if that enemy was defeated, or even if he just wounded that enemy the enemy side would still be shaken. In that case, he would also be able to escape.



Niebla's eye glint moved away from Kouki and turned toward Moana.



『UOOOOOOOOOOOOON-!!』



It was a howl so loud that felt like the eardrum would get blown away from that. Right away, miasma with abnormal thickness and amount gushed out from Niebla's body.



The intense ejection of miasma that looked as though they would paint over the space itself like black ink was also a dangerous act for Niebla himself. Because it was an act that was equivalent with ejecting out his own life force.



But, in this battlefield where irregularity existed, the best choice was to escape with certainty. As though to show that, Niebla's ejected miasma transformed into several hundred tough claws.



「Your majesty-!」



「I pray-, this――」



「Kuh」



Anneal immediately leaped forward to protect Moana, Lilin was trying to use blessing art of protection while showing anxiety, and Moana resolved herself to intercept while sweating coldly, it was at that moment the miasma claws in the number that was absurd to even be counted attacked like a barrage.



「That's the only thing I won't let you do! ――<Heaven Severance>!」



Kouki cut in front of the tsunami of black and claws with a step-in that could be mistaken with a teleportation.



Moana called his name 「Kouki-」 with a voice that sounded concerned for him.



Were Moana words the truth? When he heard her voice, he couldn't imagine that she was deceiving him. This person who was worried for him when he was in danger even though they only met just now and she still hadn't ascertained his background, how could he think that she was using him or anything?



But,



(That's not it, that's not it at all. What I cannot believe is――)



His heart felt like it was being whipped and messed up inside a mixer. Even so, the feeling that he had to protect moved Kouki.



Among the skill that he could invoke swiftly, this light element defensive magic could protect at the widest range――<Heaven Severance>. This magic that could deploy several layers of shining defensive wall simultaneously blocked all the rapidly approaching miasma claws.



Inside the miasma so thick it gave hallucination that the darkness of night was descending, countless layer of radiance defensive wall flew around like the torch of hope. Such scene even looked fantastical.



The miasma was blocked with certainty, and then Kouki's holy sword swept it aside.



That figure that perfectly handled Niebla's fierce attack that caused veteran soldiers like Spenser and others to gulp caused them to comprehend it, indeed, this person was certainly an existence that was invited by a great being. He was a magnificent warrior.



Everyone was thinking so during the dispersal of the miasma. Everyone other than Moana who was currently at Kouki's side, seeing his face that was desperately defending against the attack with an expression that looked like he was going to collapse anytime now.



『You bastard-, how far you are going to be a hindrance-!! -Tsk, next time I'll definitely bring you do――』



「There won't be any next time.」



Niebla finally recovered from the impact of Kouki's attack and he tried to slip into the miasma to retreat, but it was at that timing that Spenser broke through that miasma and rushed near.



Niebla wasted no time to swing his claws, but Spenser moved with flowing movement like water and his sword finally caught up to Niebla's torso.



『Gugah!?』



「This is the end-」



Scream of fighting spirit surged out. Spenser's sword was enveloped in wing that possessed faint green radiance.



While Niebla's blood danced in the air, Spenser dodged the jaw attack that Niebla carried out in desperation and his beheading slash was sucked into Niebla's neck.



*zan-* Spenser's sword cut through. Niebla's huge body fell down. And then, Niebla's head rolled on the ground.



『The likes, of……livestock is-』



Niebla fighting spirit didn' vanish even with his head removed, however, because of the limit of his body, he fell silent after spitting out words of resentment at the end. The miasma dispersed and light vanished from Niebla's eyes.



Spenser huffed and he sheathed his sword, and then he raised a tense voice 「Situation report!」. Right away, the royal guards who in the end didn't lose even a single person reported one after another that they were all safe, that Niebla's underlings were annihilated, and that Dario wasn't seriously injured although the bone of his arm broke.



It seemed there were many small wounds, but by using blessing art to heighten their self-recovery strength, wounds until simple broken bone could be healed within a few minutes.



「Hero-dono! Thank you very much for protecting her majesty. I say, that was really as expected from the chosen warrior of Foltina-sama. Truly, that was a splendid skill.」



Spenser was facing Kouki with an expression that was filled with praise and gratitude without even a speck of malice in it. The other soldiers were also the same. Lilin and Neisan were showing him respect even while gazing at him full of curiosity. It couldn't be helped that they became curious with Kouki's magic.



「Ah, no, it's nothing really big……」



「Hahah, to be able to say that "it's nothing big" after enduring the fierce attack of a <Black Person> of that level when he was sacrificing his life force! How very reliable! Hero-dono, once more, please take care of us from here on too.」



Spenser looked for a handshake with a friendly smile. It seemed he was harboring impression of a likeable young man who was an outstanding warrior while also possessing humility toward Kouki.



But, even though Kouki was responding with the handshake request of such Spenser and also the soldiers who were gathering around him with similar expression like Spenser, his expression looked somewhat troubled throughout all that.



「Say, can I ask you all to call me by my name if possible? Don't call me hero. I don't mind if you call me Kouki.」



「Oo, what a happy thing to ask. Then I'll call you Kouki-dono. Only if you call me Spenser in return.」



The gaze of Spenser who perceived Kouki's words as another expression of friendliness was increasingly getting friendlier. The positivity level of the aging soldier was rising up steadily. And it seemed it was also the same with Lilin and others.



Kouki's expression was getting increasingly looked as though he was stuffing his cheeks with bitter food. However his expression was turning into one where it looked like he was desperately holding it so it wouldn't come out on his face.



「Kouki, let me also give you my words of thanks. That preeminent skill is really worthy of respect. I wish to express my gratitude with something but……in any case, we also cannot really be carefree after receiving the attack just now. I want to depart immediately though……」



「Ah, yes. I have no objection. It seems that the information of Moana-sama and others coming here was leaked out. Indeed, it's better for us to hurry.」



Moana entered between his conversation with Spenser and others looking somewhat as though she was putting a damper on things. Kouki let the tension bled out of his shoulders toward that interruption as though in relieve.



They once more advanced quickly as a party toward the edge of the forest with Spenser in the lead.



Before long they could see the border of the forest. Kouki saw multiple large silhouettes taking position in front of the border and his hand reached out toward his sheathed holy sword.



「Kouki, it's okay. Those are our mount animals.」



「……Your mount, is it? They look like large lizard though.」



「Right. They are called Arous. Their trait is their flat torso and long neck. Their running ability is high with little shaking. They are mainly eating fruit even though they look like that. They are really taking kindly to human you know?」



From the point of view of Kouki whose common sense when speaking about a transportation method using animal would think of horse, he felt a bit bewildered of mounting a lizard more than two meter long with atrocious face.



When he got nearer, he could see something like collar and U-shaped fetter and something like a stool to sit down attached on the animal's back. He guessed that the rider could stay standing or sitting by lying heavily on the stomach on the saddle.



From a glance, their atmosphere felt like 「Hyahhaa―! There is human! The food! I'm gonna eat them alive yeah!」 looking as though they were going to attack, but seeing the equipment attached on them then indeed, they certainly looked like a transportation method of this world.



(I see, they are like the monster that the devil race used as mount huh……. But, hm~m……



For the moment Kouki accepted that they weren't dangerous existence, but this time he became bothered by something else.



There were ten Arous in total, but the Arous with the best physique and style among those ten had a large ribbon tied on top of its head. A pink ribbon. The ribbon was really pink.



Brutal looking face, eyes that shined with fierce glint, the leaked out growling voice *guruu*, the imposing air……but, on its head was a pink ribbon.



What surrealism. Was this the fashion sense of this world's people? Or else, was that an indispensable equipment? No, other than this one Arous that looked like leader, the other Arous weren't wearing ribbon or anything……



Kouki was confused.



Moana followed Kouki's gaze and she guessed what he was staring at. And then looking a bit boastful she approached the Arous with ribbon.



「Fufu, what do you think? It's cute right? This child is my personal mount. His name is Haumu. The~re there, Haumu~, your master has returned back here~. Were you lonely?」



Moana caressed Haumu's head *rub rub, pat pat*. 'I see' Kouki realized, it looked like this Arous wasn't just a mount. Moana seemed to harbor a definite fondness to it. He guessed that this Arous was in a position of pet, or perhaps partner of Moana.



Both sides held trust at each other――



「Guryah」



「Ouch!?」



Haumu's headbutt was launched. Moana's head was thrown back hard. Kouki became flustered 「As I thought it's ferocious!?」, but whether Anneal or Spenser or the others, none of them paid that any attention and they kept preparing their own mount for their departure from here.



「Fufu, what, as I thought you were lonely alone? When we got home I'll give you a lot of care okay, so~――ouch!?」



'This cute cheeky guy!' When Moana tried to hug Haumu once more with that kind of feel, a jaw drop that was like a heel drop kick burst on the crown of Moana's head.



「……Excuse me, are you okay?」



「Ahaha, there is no problem at all here, Kouki. Haumu is a spoiled child since a long time ago you see. He would frolic at me right away when I approached him.」



「Guryuu」



「No, that, no matter how I look at it……」



When Moana turned her head toward Kouki, Haumu's mouth closed *snap* on her whole head. Moana was struggling and squirming. No matter how he looked at it, he could only think that she was being preyed on.



「Sto, stop it Haumu! Right now isn't the time for playing around! That's why, ah, it hurts! Haumu, it's a bit, no, it's really hurt here! Come on, you are a good child so let me――AA」



Moana tapped repeatedly *peshi peshi* at Haumu's head to say give up. Haumu was chewing on Moana as though to appeal of something, or perhaps as though to clear up a grudge of many years.



Kouki who couldn't bear to see that looked at Anneal asking for help. Anneal let out a sigh while pointing at Haumu's head with her finger motion.



Kouki fearfully approached Haumu.



「Err, Haumu?」



「Guruu」



When Kouki turned his gaze at Haumu's head, Haumu nodded as though to say 「Please」. His teeth dug into Moana. Those were the teeth of a herbivore, so the teeth didn't pierce through, but it must be still hurt. A small scream 「Au!?」 came from Moana.



Kouki slowly reached out his hand and took the ribbon from Haumu's hand.



Haumu conveyed his gratitude at Kouki with his gaze, and then he did 「Peh」 at Moana as though he was spitting out his spit.



「Uu, ge, geez Haumu. You're really a pampered child.」



Moana crumbled down on the ground as though she had been assaulted by hoodlum, and she wiped up her face that was slathered with saliva. Her way of talking was changing must be because she was a little shaken. She was averting her face shyly from Kouki who was looking down at her with a really complicated expression.



「The, then Kouki. You can sit behind me――cough, I wonder if it's agreeable for you to ride behind me?」



「Ah, yes.」



Moana was still slathered with saliva, however, in order to recover the dignity of queen, Moana changed her way of talking back. Following her, Kouki climbed on Haumu's back. As expected, it seemed the standard was to ride by standing. When Moana climbed up, it felt like 「Chih」 sound could be heard from Haumu but……that must be an imagination, there was no way he could clicked his tongue.



「Hm? Eh? The ribbon is……」



It seemed Moana noticed when he got on Haumu's back. Moana was looking around restlessly in a state seemed to say 'Where has the ribbon gone?'. The ribbon was in Kouki's hand.



Haumu turned his long neck and stared at Kouki. An earnest feeling that could be seen just from a glance was residing in those eyes. That was a feeling of, 「Do something about this woman!」.



「……Looks like it flew off somewhere just now. Moana-sama, there is also the matter about the attack, isn't it better if we depart soon rather than later?」



「I, I guess. Right, I'm sorry Kouki. That ribbon was Haumu's favorite but……this is not the time for saying anything like that isn't it.」



It felt like killing intent was residing in Haumu's gaze. Kouki understood. Haumu's gaze was declaring 「Who are you saying is pleased with that thing huh, idiottt! I'm gonna let you die someday, just you wait!」.



Kouki who somehow guessed the relationship between the queen and her personal mount was――slowly entering the ribbon into his pocket. In the world, there was also things that was better to be treated as not existing.



Haumu's eyes brightened. It seemed that his positivity level toward Kouki was steadily increasing. 「Guruu♪」 Perhaps it was just his imagination, but Haumu was raising a growl that sounded like he was in good mood.



「Fufu, are you happy being able to run together with me? This cute cheeky guy! But, we have guest today here. So run carefully out there okay.」



「Gurya!!」



Was that a simple reply, or was that a yell of denial 「Ain't no way I'm happy about, that, you idiottt!」, in any case with the powerful roar of Haumu as the signal, the party left the forest.



Right after they left the forest, what leaped into Kouki's sight was a sand colored world. There was the color of sand continuing until the horizon as far as his eyes could see. Moana's words that the forest behind them was something rare was certainly a fact.



「Compared with Guryuen……this is different huh.」



That was the impression of Kouki who saw this vast desert.



A great desert existed in Tortus. It was a world of brown color. A world that was filled with the same heat and sand like this place.



But, Kouki understood. The great desert of Guryuen and this desert were decisively different. He was unable to find any words that could express what was the difference accurately but, if he had to say it――



「It's dead.」



「……Right. It's just as you say. This is a dead world.」



Moana affirmed Kouki's words. Haumu was advancing through the sand with surprisingly little shaking and surprising speed. Above him, Moana who was holding on the U-shaped fetters while looking back across her shoulder at Kouki had eyes that were filled with grief.



「This is not just a desert. This is the result from blessing power, the power for the sake of living getting thoroughly stolen. Once, before the large scale war that occurred about a hundred years ago, it seemed that this area was also a verdant forest.」



「War……」



About a hundred years ago, a war, no, a decisive battle of the Nth time that occurred between mankind and the <Black People>.



The one who stood at the front as the leader was the king of Synclea kingdom at the time. At the end of the fierce battle, while great damage resulted for both humans and also nature, even so that king succeeded in bringing down the king of the <Black People> of that time.



「The honorable ancestor drove away the army of <Black People>. The compensation for that was nature was lost from 80% of the kingdom but……even so nature is still left behind at the surrounding of the unaltered capital. I believe that was an amazing war result.」



「The capital wasn't relocated after that?」



He understood from seeing this desert that could only be expressed as "dying". This was a place that human couldn't possibly live at. Eighty percent of the country territory died. He believed it was a matter of course for the capital to be relocated for the country's revival attempt.



Moana looked at faraway while opened her mouth in respond to Kouki's question.



「The king of <Black People>――because he looked completely black from the abnormal thickness of his miasma, we called him the <Black King>, but it is said that guy lived for long as the strongest existence among the <Black People> who were saving strength.」



「Black King……」



「Do you get it? We are not talking about lineage. He is not an existence that will end after being defeated once. The <Black King> exist in every era. Although there is variety in his strength each time though.」



Moana's gaze that was staring at far away ran through the vast desert. Kouki guessed what Moana wanted to say and he whispered.



「This place is still a battlefield isn't it? This is also the best place for it.」



「Yes. Because there is no blessing power that can be stolen from here. In this desert, those fellows can only use the miasma that they stored inside their body. The point where no blessing power cannot be obtained from the surrounding also apply to us, but even so, it's ideal that those fellow won't be able to get strengthened and destroy nature for more than now.」



That was why they didn't relocate the capital. Because the ruined territory was exactly the best battlefield there was. The soldiers of Synclea were remaining in this barren land for the sake of continuing battle. No matter how many months and years passed, Synclea kingdom was the front line battlefield.



「Of course, we are moving our people to place that still have nature remaining. We entrust the feudal lord of every area with autonomy. We are leaving the production of the main food and everything else to them.」



「What is the prospect of the enemy circling around this desert and aim at every other territory?」



Moana shook her head to answer Kouki's question.



According to her, the <Black People> were ruling the eastern land, the kingdom's territory was at the west with this great desert sandwiched in between. A sea was spreading at the north, and similar like a desert, in the sea there was nothing to block the sight, so if any Black People tried to come from there, the surveillance unit stationed at each territory would notice.



At the south there was mountain range area spreading, at the other side of the mountain area there was a large country that still remained and constructed their battlefield like Synclea, so if something happened then a notice would immediately reach them.



Therefore, it was impossible for the <Black People> to invade the western territory without Synclea kingdom noticing.



The desert and Synclea's capital were literally the last fortress and also the front line battlefield.



「……How admirable.」



「Thank you.」



Kouki put his hand on his chest and said that, toward all the soldiers, and then toward the young queen who led them. Moana smiled happily and nodded at such Kouki.



Silence continued for a while. Kouki pursed his lips into a straight line and turned his gaze downward, he was turning his thought toward the soldiers who he was told about.



Moana was glancing repeatedly across her shoulder to such Kouki. And then after she showed hesitation several times, she opened her mouth.



「Kouki. Can I ask you something?」



「? What is it?」



Kouki lifted his face. Moana's gaze wandered around, looking like she was choosing her words.



「That, is…….why, are you, a hero?」



「Eh?」



It felt like something cold was entering slowly into Kouki's chest. It felt like he was asked 'isn't it presumptuous for you to call yourself that?'. It felt like Kouki's weakness that was exposed at the fight against Niebla was seen through.



Seeing Kouki who was shaken and his face complexion worsened, Moana added more of her words in hurry.



「Ah, no, that's not what I meant. It's not that I'm ridiculing you. I'm only wondering that it's a curious way of calling you.」



「Curious, is it?」



Understanding that Moana's intention was different from what he thought, Kouki let out the tension from his stiffened face and tilted his head.



「Yes. I thought it's curious. When I heard from Foltina-sama that a hero is summoned, I don't really understand what kind of person would appear. Because, don't you think so too? Hero(yuusha)――if we take the literal meaning of that word, the meaning will be "a person with courage".」 (TN: The word yuusha is made from two kanji, the kanji of courage and person. Yuusha can mean hero, the brave, or man of valor in Japan.)



Moana threw a questioning gaze at Kouki to confirm that they were in the same page. Kouki nodded.



「If that's the case, then I can throw out my case and say with surety. That the soldiers of my country, are all "hero(yuusha)" without a single exception.」



「Ah……」



Kouki was taken aback and leaked out a small voice. Moana looked back and stared straight at Kouki.



「If by perchance, Kouki is a man who had accomplished some great exploits, and that was why you were chosen by Foltina-sama……then shouldn't such person be called as "hero(eiyuu)" instead?」 (TN: Eiyuu is made from kanji of 'Han' and man. In Japan it means hero, heroine, great person)



「That's……」



「Ah, no, it's not that I wish to trouble Kouki. I'm just wondering.」



Sensing Kouki's perplexity, Moana said 「Forgive me for asking something strange」 and she returned her gaze to the front.



But, Moana's words were clinging completely inside Kouki. Question was overflowing inside his mind.



Just what in the world a hero(yuusha) was.



(Thinking back now, just what is a hero? I called myself that because that's my vocation. But, still, hero――a person with courage……that's a person's nature, it cannot be called an "occupation" that showed a person's innate ability isn't it?)



He recalled. The vocation of his comrades.



Healer. Martial artist. Swordsman. Barrier user……



Yes, everyone had vocation that was connected to an actual occupation. It was only "hero(yuusha)" that was of a different disposition. Certainly, rather than a transcription of a work one had aptitude toward, it was a title that displayed one's character. So to speak, it was a transcription that wasn't any different with vocation of "pessimist", "optimist", or "good person" or "bad person".



If one wanted to describe a vocation that led the people and fought powerful enemy, then it should be better to call that vocation using "commander" or even "king" instead.



(Was it because in Tortus "hero(yuusha) is recognized as occupation? However, if it's the case of "a person that accomplished great exploits" just like Moana-sama mentioned, then it should be fine to use "hero(eiyuu)" instead. Why am I "a person with courage"? Just what am I……)



Why did he obtain the vocation of something like hero(yuusha)?



When he looked back at the events at Tortus, even himself was harboring doubt whether he even have possessed such nature in himself.



How many times he was unable to move in the crucial times? How many times he failed without even choosing anything? How many times he acted as he pleased and dragged his comrades into trouble?



Why was someone like him a "hero"?



――Why, are you, a hero?



「……I don't know. I really, don't know.」



That voice sounded wrung out from his throat, it sounded like it would vanish anytime.



Moana who understood that it was an answer toward her question just now looked back once more. And then, she peeked at Kouki who was looking down with a fixed stare.



「I see. ……It will be great if you understand it someday. Yep, surely the time will come when you understand the reason.」



「……Why, do you think so?」



In respond to Moana whose manly way of talking broke down, Kouki unconsciously also asked back with his plain way of talking.



Moana smiled. Her expression looked affectionate.



「Because, aren't you still struggling? Aren't you doing your best to find the answer? The world isn't so cold that it would trample down that kind of person.」



「……Is that so?」



「That's so.」



The world would surely smile at those who kept struggling without giving up. The one who said those words with conviction was a queen who was continuing to fight wholeheartedly in a world that was heading to ruin. For Kouki, those were words that were really heavy and really beautiful that caused him to be taken aback.



The two stared at each other. The eyes of Anneal and Lilin who were keeping pace beside them looked curious like cat. And then, the eyes of Spenser that were looking back from the front with a cold gaze.



「Nnh」



「Cough, ahem」



Moana and Kouki did something that looked like coughing or perhaps not while quietly taking distance from each other.



The lips of Anneal and Lilin crooked with the feel of 「Mufuu~」. Their maiden sensor might be reacting to the scene just now.



「Ho, how long until we reach the capital.」



「Ri, right. I believe we will arrive at the evening with our current pace.」



Kouki asked an information that he already heard before this to varnish over the matter, and Moana also answered in the same attempt.



They continued to advance while inside that really delicate atmosphere for a while. Slightly elevated hills were starting to get visible here and there.



But, at that time, like a rehash of the event inside the forest, Kouki suddenly reacted to something and looked up.



「Kouki?」



Moana asked Kouki while she raised her fist and commanded the unit to stop moving.



Right after that,



「-, something is falling here! Evacuate!」



「Advance! Rush ahe――」



Moana wasted no time responding at Kouki's warning, but multiple objects freefalling and crashing at their surrounding arrived faster than that.



*zudon-zudon-* What were crashing on the ground with that roaring sound that shook the ground were living things that looked like lizard, clad in thick miasma. They were wearing equipment that looked like protector, and from their bone structure it could be seen that they were mainly walking with two legs. From their appearance, they were what they called as Lizardman in RPG.



「-, scaled dragon species!? Just what in the world!?」



Moana's confused voice resounded. Her reaction was understandable. If this was an ambush, then she would just give instruction right away to form formation and prepare to intercept. In that case there wouldn't be any hesitation whatsoever and the royal guard would finish carrying out that order in a moment just like when facing Niebla and his underlings.



But, the lizardmen called scaled dragon species that fell from the sky――six of them were already dying. Naturally the cause of them dying was the impact from their fall. If it wasn't because of the thick protector they were wearing that wasn't suited for battle and also the impact reduction from their miasma, they might have died instantly.



These enemies launched a surprise attack yet they almost get annihilated at the same time with their entrance. Moana and her people could only look at the situation like that.



They weren't knowing that the objective of this surprise attack was exactly to take advantage of that confusion.



「「「GIIIIIAAAAAAAAAH」」」



「「「GUEEEEEEEEEEEEH」」」



Shrieks burst out. Those weren't screams from pain or suffering. They were the same scream like Niebla's scream. They were emitting miasma by staking their life. The six lizardmen were gushing out miasma that rivaled what Niebla did before.



「Impossible-, are they planning to suicide!?」



「Your majesty, please escape! Lilin, your wind!」



Moana leaked out voice of shock while Spenser roared angrily.



The six lizardmen were obviously of lower status than Niebla. Yet regardless of that they were scattering miasma that rivaled Niebla was because they were literally exchanging their life for it.



It was truly a suicide attack. An ambush of suicide bombing from the sky was something outside expectation.



The miasma that exploded and dyed the surrounding area black instantly didn't grant any time for escape, for Lilin to activate her wind, or even for Kouki to respond.



Everything was swallowed by blackness and vanished.



If it was seen from slight distance away, it looked like a tornado of black flame was generated. Moana and others were inside that tornado.



At that timing, a pterosaur descended down from the sky. At its back was a scaled dragon species that was conspicuously larger than normal. He was equipped with metallic protector and his hand was holding a large spear.



『Looks like it was worth it instigating Niebla. Although the miasma stone the queen is carrying is special, but it won't be able to endure that guy's miasma and the miasma of six underlings using up all their life.』



'Ge-ge-ge-' The scaled dragon species raised a weird laugh.



It seemed that the leaking out of the information that Moana and her people left the capital with few number and Niebla getting hold of that information were all the scheming of this scaled dragon species.



Everything was for the sake of reducing the capacity limit of the miasma stone that was the lifeline for Moana and her people. And then, he would deal the finishing blow easily when Moana and others became unable to move.



『With his my king's――』



The scaled dragon species was standing calmly while staring in pleasure at the miasma completely ruining Moana and her people, but the voice and phenomenon that suddenly occurred caused him to swallow back his own words.



「Turn this place into sanctuary, let none of god's enemy passed――<Sacred Severance>!!」



*GOU-* Pure white light burst up. The storm of miasma that could be mistaken as black flame ruptured from inside, and a dazzling light swelled up in half-sphere state.



Not the slightest bit of miasma existed at the inside of that light, the miasma that was blown away along with the light melted into the air and dispersed.



『Wha, what?』



At the end of the gaze of the scaled dragon species who couldn't hide his agitation, were the royal guards and Arous who collapsed at the other side of the shining barrier, and also the queen.



But, there was just one person, a man that looked unaffected at all even inside that much miasma was holding the limp Moana in his arms.



『You-, what the hell are you! How are you that calm even after getting bathed in that much miasma!?』



The scaled dragon species that somehow pulled himself back together from his confusion readied his large spear while yelling angrily.



Kouki softly put Moana to recline on Haumu and he whispered something while ignoring the scaled dragon species's angry yell. And then, something that looked like light particles showered down on everybody including Moana and enveloped them in a gentle light.



Seeing that――Kouki unsheathed his holy sword while turning his gaze t the scaled dragon species.



Kouki showed the same reaction at the scaled dragon species just like with Niebla.



Face that turned pale. Shaking body. Ragged breathing.



But, there already wasn't anyone else here that would finish the enemy while he was holding it in.



If he ran away, Moana and others would die.



Even if he prolonged it, as expected they would still die.



If he didn't choose, they would die.



The time for choosing, had came.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



I'm sorry that the gloomy story is continuing.



Next chapter the fundamental problem that Kouki is holding will become clear.



If possible, I hope I can make consecutive posting next week.



Even Shirakome also want to progress the story in one go until where the tale move in a big way. After that as expected it will be like musou game isn't it. (TN: Like playing in Dynasty Warrior or Samurai Warrior game)



Although, there are important parts more than just Kouki's growth, so I'll endeavor to not cut corners.



There are opinions 'Kouki arc is just, you know~' here and there, so I thought that the number of people reading will decrease by a lot, but the number of the PV or the review after reading isn't dropping. It feels like Shirakome will melt from the kindness of Narou people.



Thank you~





Chapter 266




AN: Serious-san has the principle of going home regularly.



My fingers moved by themselves……



The brilliant light enveloped the collapsed Moana and others in half-sphere state.



Their miasma stones that had the function of absorbing miasma that made it possible for human to act inside miasma for a period of time were dyed muddy black. The complexion of Moana and others went straight passed white and became ashen color.



Not just Moana and her people, Haumu and the other Arous., the mounted beasts also powerlessly splayed out their four limbs where they could only repeat breathing in short gasps.



They were only barely living. The blessing power inside the body of Moana and others were holding on to their life.



But, it was obvious that it wouldn't be long before the scythe of death god would touch them. Their time limit was near.



Kouki made Moana leaned on Haumu's body, and step by step he walked toward the lizardman who was the <Dark Being> that caused this situation. (TN: I changed the Black People into Dark Being cause it seemed those words could cause misunderstanding.)



The tip of the holy sword that was pointed to the ground was slightly trembling, and his breathing was ragged. The feeling of wanting to run away without choosing anything was clamoring inside himself like a locked beast that was trying to escape from its cage.



Kouki came to a stop after he got out and took a step away from the boundary of the highest class light element defensive magic <Sacred Severance>. An angry yell was thrown to such Kouki once more.



『You-, I'm asking what the hell are you! What's that strange light! How the hell you are able to stand!?』



Sharp dragon eyes. Dragon scales that looked harder than even steel armor. His whole body was bulging with muscles, and his hands were readying a long and large spear.



It was clear just from confronting this Dark Being face to face like this. That he was a strong one that had achieved considerable military achievement.



Yes,



(He isn't a beast.)



This opponent was a warrior that possessed intelligence.



As though finding a ray of hope, Kouki thought of the six beings that didn't give any reaction to his <Presence Detection> and asked back instead.



「……Weren't they, your comrade?」



『What?』



The lizardman didn't seem to understand what Kouki was asking him for a moment and he let out a voice of dubiousness. But, he immediately guessed that Kouki was speaking about his six compatriots that performed "suicide bombing" to scatter highly thick miasma by paying with their life as the compensation, and he answered with a snort.



『Obviously they were my underlings.』



「You, commanded them to die?」



『……Just what are you asking? What are you talking about since some time ago?』



The scaled dragon specious didn't understand the intention of Kouki's question and was getting more and more suspicious.



He must never even imagined that Kouki was getting desperate in trying to find even a bit more reason to make his "choice".



Because this was a guy that abandoned his comrades, because this was a guy that made light of life without any reason.



That was why, it should be fine to kill him, just like what he did all this time when facing against monster, something like that.



Kouki's expression distorted painfully while stringing his words together.



「If, this is only what if. What are you going to do if I say you can go to another world?」



『What?』



「If you can migrate together with flora and fauna too, to a new world that is filled with blessing power, and you can live there without fighting human……or it can also be the reverse, the human will be the one that move away. If you can live in a world without human, a world of only <Dark Being>――」



This was the last resort. Because this was a plan that completely relied on that man, it was a proposal without any positive proof. But, if there was that man's compass and crystal key, then perhaps they would be able to find an inhabited world. In addition, securing enough of the necessary blessing power would also be possible.



'That guy is different than me, surely there is nothing impossible for him, that's why', Kouki thought.



The long battle that passed between Moana and her people against the <Dark Being>.



Perhaps there wasn't any more ground for them to coexist together.



Perhaps there wasn't any more room to talk between them.



Then, was the only path left was where one of them conquered everything?



Was battle unavoidable, that one side had to be sunk into the abyss of despair?



Was there really no third path……



The suggestion of "separated living" by migrating to a new world.



That was an idea that was brought about from Kouki's pondering. <Dark Being> that possessed will and would go hungry if they didn't consume blessing power, and human that couldn't endure the miasma and unable to live without blessing power everywhere around them. That idea came because Kouki couldn't find a clearly correct "choice" like in a novel or drama where good was rewarded and evil was punished.



If it was about the compensation for that man, then he was determined to pay it in any kind of shape. That was the only thing that Kouki could decided promptly right now.



But, that desperate proposal of such Kouki was,



『Hah』



Kicked to the curb in rejection by a sneer and a violent "thrust".



Kouki caught his breath, but his reaction was quick. He parried the tip of the long spear using his holy sword. *gigigi* The sound of metals scraping each other resounded along with scattered sparks.



The lizardman immediately pulled back his long spear and launched repeated thrust like surging waves. Those thrusts that were controlled with immense physical strength and flexible muscle were uncommon.



Kouki handled the attack while he raised his voice further.



「Wait, listen to me! I came from another world! The barrier behind me is the proof of that! Even without human and <Dark Being> fighting, perhaps there is a way for a future where both sides can live without annihilating the other! That's why――」



The holy sword blocked a sweep of the spear. *gan* Impact sound resounded and a slight numbness ran through Kouki's arm. It became a situation of sword locking contest. In that situation, the lizardman showed a scorn in his dragon eyes and said his piece.



『That's shocking-. I never thought this kind of coward still exist! Aah, I'' recognize it! You are really a human of another world. There is no way someone like you is a warrior of this country!』



*gou* Miasma spouted out from the lizardman. No, perhaps it should be said instead that he released the miasma. The miasma that was released to blow at Kouki became a physical impact that made Kouki's feet left the ground. When that happened, naturally Kouki got blown away to the side due to the pressure from the sword locking contest.



Kouki bounced several times on the sand before he barely performed ukemi and rearranged his balance to stand on his knee. When he returned his gaze to the dragon scaled species, he saw the figure of the enemy ignoring him while rushing toward <Sacred Severance>.



The lizardman who was ignoring Kouki struck his long spear toward the barrier with a yell of fighting spirit.
